
--**--**--
 of good Landfalls.
 
 
 
 II.
 
 
 
 Some commanders of ships take their Departure from the home coast
 sadly, in a spirit of grief and discontent.  They have a wife,
 children perhaps, some affection at any rate, or perhaps only some
 pet vice, that must be left behind for a year or more.  I remember
 only one man who walked his deck with a springy step, and gave the
 first course of the passage in an elated voice.  But he, as I
 learned afterwards, was leaving nothing behind him, except a welter
 of debts and threats of legal proceedings.
 
 On the other hand, I have known many captains who, directly their
 ship had left the narrow waters of the Channel, would disappear
 from the sight of their ship's company altogether for some three
 days or more.  They would take a long dive, as it were, into their
 state-room, only to emerge a few days afterwards with a more or
 less serene brow.  Those were the men easy to get on with.
 Besides, such a complete retirement seemed to imply a satisfactory
 amount of trust in their officers, and to be trusted displeases no
 seaman worthy of the name.
 
 On my first voyage as chief mate with good Captain MacW- I remember
 that I felt quite flattered, and went blithely about my duties,
 myself a commander for all practical purposes.  Still, whatever the
 greatness of my illusion, the fact remained that the real commander
 was there, backing up my self-confidence, though invisible to my
 eyes behind a maple-wood veneered cabin-door with a white china
 handle.
 
 That is the time, after your Departure is taken, when the spirit of
 your commander communes with you in a muffled voice, as if from the
 sanctum sanctorum of a temple; because, call her a temple or a
--**--**--
 infliction.  He walks the poop darting gloomy glances, as though he
 wished to poison the sea, and snaps your head off savagely whenever
 you happen to blunder within earshot.  And these vagaries are the
 harder to bear patiently, as becomes a man and an officer, because
 no sailor is really good-tempered during the first few days of a
 voyage.  There are regrets, memories, the instinctive longing for
 the departed idleness, the instinctive hate of all work.  Besides,
 things have a knack of going wrong at the start, especially in the
 matter of irritating trifles.  And there is the abiding thought of
 a whole year of more or less hard life before one, because there
 was hardly a southern-going voyage in the yesterday of the sea
 which meant anything less than a twelvemonth.  Yes; it needed a few
 days after the taking of your departure for a ship's company to
 shake down into their places, and for the soothing deep-water ship
 routine to establish its beneficent sway.
 
 It is a great doctor for sore hearts and sore heads, too, your
 ship's routine, which I have seen soothe--at least for a time--the
 most turbulent of spirits.  There is health in it, and peace, and
 satisfaction of the accomplished round; for each day of the ship's
 life seems to close a circle within the wide ring of the sea
 horizon.  It borrows a certain dignity of sameness from the
 majestic monotony of the sea.  He who loves the sea loves also the
 ship's routine.
 
 Nowhere else than upon the sea do the days, weeks and months fall
 away quicker into the past.  They seem to be left astern as easily
 as the light air-bubbles in the swirls of the ship's wake, and
 vanish into a great silence in which your ship moves on with a sort
--**--**--
 impaired in the least.  It was a very anxious case, too, the land
 being made suddenly, close-to, on a wrong bearing, in thick
 weather, and during a fresh onshore gale.  Going below to speak to
 him soon after, I was unlucky enough to catch my captain in the
 very act of hasty cork-drawing.  The sight, I may say, gave me an
 awful scare.  I was well aware of the morbidly sensitive nature of
 the man.  Fortunately, I managed to draw back unseen, and, taking
 care to stamp heavily with my sea-boots at the foot of the cabin
 stairs, I made my second entry.  But for this unexpected glimpse,
 no act of his during the next twenty-four hours could have given me
 the slightest suspicion that all was not well with his nerve.
 
 
 
 III.
 
 
 
 Quite another case, and having nothing to do with drink, was that
 of poor Captain B-.  He used to suffer from sick headaches, in his
 young days, every time he was approaching a coast.  Well over fifty
 years of age when I knew him, short, stout, dignified, perhaps a
 little pompous, he was a man of a singularly well-informed mind,
 the least sailor-like in outward aspect, but certainly one of the
 best seamen whom it has been my good luck to serve under.  He was a
 Plymouth man, I think, the son of a country doctor, and both his
 elder boys were studying medicine.  He commanded a big London ship,
 fairly well known in her day.  I thought no end of him, and that is
 why I remember with a peculiar satisfaction the last words he spoke
 to me on board his ship after an eighteen months' voyage.  It was
 in the dock in Dundee, where we had brought a full cargo of jute
 from Calcutta.  We had been paid off that morning, and I had come
--**--**--
 tea, she only nodded at me silently, with the faintest ghost of a
 smile on her tight-set lips.  I imagine she must have been a maiden
 sister of Mrs. B- come to help nurse her brother-in-law.  His
 youngest boy, a late-comer, a great cricketer it seemed, twelve
 years old or thereabouts, chattered enthusiastically of the
 exploits of W. G. Grace.  And I remember his eldest son, too, a
 newly-fledged doctor, who took me out to smoke in the garden, and,
 shaking his head with professional gravity, but with genuine
 concern, muttered:  "Yes, but he doesn't get back his appetite.  I
 don't like that--I don't like that at all."  The last sight of
 Captain B- I had was as he nodded his head to me out of the bow
 window when I turned round to close the front gate.
 
 It was a distinct and complete impression, something that I don't
 know whether to call a Landfall or a Departure.  Certainly he had
 gazed at times very fixedly before him with the Landfall's vigilant
 look, this sea-captain seated incongruously in a deep-backed chair.
 He had not then talked to me of employment, of ships, of being
 ready to take another command; but he had discoursed of his early
 days, in the abundant but thin flow of a wilful invalid's talk.
 The women looked worried, but sat still, and I learned more of him
 in that interview than in the whole eighteen months we had sailed
 together.  It appeared he had "served his time" in the copper-ore
 trade, the famous copper-ore trade of old days between Swansea and
 the Chilian coast, coal out and ore in, deep-loaded both ways, as
 if in wanton defiance of the great Cape Horn seas--a work, this,
 for staunch ships, and a great school of staunchness for West-
--**--**--
 parts than the human body has limbs:  the ring, the stock, the
 crown, the flukes, the palms, the shank.  All this, according to
 the journalist, is "cast" when a ship arriving at an anchorage is
 brought up.
 
 This insistence in using the odious word arises from the fact that
 a particularly benighted landsman must imagine the act of anchoring
 as a process of throwing something overboard, whereas the anchor
 ready for its work is already overboard, and is not thrown over,
 but simply allowed to fall.  It hangs from the ship's side at the
 end of a heavy, projecting timber called the cat-head, in the bight
 of a short, thick chain whose end link is suddenly released by a
 blow from a top-maul or the pull of a lever when the order is
 given.  And the order is not "Heave over!" as the paragraphist
 seems to imagine, but "Let go!"
 
 As a matter of fact, nothing is ever cast in that sense on board
 ship but the lead, of which a cast is taken to search the depth of
 water on which she floats.  A lashed boat, a spare spar, a cask or
 what not secured about the decks, is "cast adrift" when it is
 untied.  Also the ship herself is "cast to port or starboard" when
 getting under way.  She, however, never "casts" her anchor.
 
 To speak with severe technicality, a ship or a fleet is "brought
 up"--the complementary words unpronounced and unwritten being, of
 course, "to an anchor."  Less technically, but not less correctly,
 the word "anchored," with its characteristic appearance and
 resolute sound, ought to be good enough for the newspapers of the
 greatest maritime country in the world.  "The fleet anchored at
 Spithead":  can anyone want a better sentence for brevity and
 seamanlike ring?  But the "cast-anchor" trick, with its affectation
--**--**--
 cable ranged, the windlass disconnected, the compressors opened;
 and there, after giving his own last order, "Stand clear of the
 cable!" he waits attentive, in a silent ship that forges slowly
 ahead towards her picked-out berth, for the sharp shout from aft,
 "Let go!"  Instantly bending over, he sees the trusty iron fall
 with a heavy plunge under his eyes, which watch and note whether it
 has gone clear.
 
 For the anchor "to go clear" means to go clear of its own chain.
 Your anchor must drop from the bow of your ship with no turn of
 cable on any of its limbs, else you would be riding to a foul
 anchor.  Unless the pull of the cable is fair on the ring, no
 anchor can be trusted even on the best of holding ground.  In time
 of stress it is bound to drag, for implements and men must be
 treated fairly to give you the "virtue" which is in them.  The
 anchor is an emblem of hope, but a foul anchor is worse than the
 most fallacious of false hopes that ever lured men or nations into
 a sense of security.  And the sense of security, even the most
 warranted, is a bad councillor.  It is the sense which, like that
 exaggerated feeling of well-being ominous of the coming on of
 madness, precedes the swift fall of disaster.  A seaman labouring
 under an undue sense of security becomes at once worth hardly half
 his salt.  Therefore, of all my chief officers, the one I trusted
 most was a man called B-.  He had a red moustache, a lean face,
 also red, and an uneasy eye.  He was worth all his salt.
 
 On examining now, after many years, the residue of the feeling
 which was the outcome of the contact of our personalities, I
--**--**--
 that Mr. B-'s sentiment was of a higher order.  Each of us, of
 course, was extremely anxious about the good appearance of the
 beloved object; and, though I was the one to glean compliments
 ashore, B- had the more intimate pride of feeling, resembling that
 of a devoted handmaiden.  And that sort of faithful and proud
 devotion went so far as to make him go about flicking the dust off
 the varnished teak-wood rail of the little craft with a silk
 pocket-handkerchief--a present from Mrs. B-, I believe.
 
 That was the effect of his love for the barque.  The effect of his
 admirable lack of the sense of security once went so far as to make
 him remark to me:  "Well, sir, you ARE a lucky man!"
 
 It was said in a tone full of significance, but not exactly
 offensive, and it was, I suppose, my innate tact that prevented my
 asking, "What on earth do you mean by that?"
 
 Later on his meaning was illustrated more fully on a dark night in
 a tight corner during a dead on-shore gale.  I had called him up on
 deck to help me consider our extremely unpleasant situation.  There
 was not much time for deep thinking, and his summing-up was:  "It
 looks pretty bad, whichever we try; but, then, sir, you always do
 get out of a mess somehow."
 
 
 
 VI.
 
 
 
 It is difficult to disconnect the idea of ships' anchors from the
 idea of the ship's chief mate--the man who sees them go down clear
 and come up sometimes foul; because not even the most unremitting
 care can always prevent a ship, swinging to winds and tide, from
 taking an awkward turn of the cable round stock or fluke.  Then the
 business of "getting the anchor" and securing it afterwards is
--**--**--
 his voice will not be heard raised about the decks, with that curt,
 austere accent of the man in charge, till, again, when the hatches
 are on, and in a silent and expectant ship, he shall speak up from
 aft in commanding tones:  "Man the windlass!"
 
 
 
 VII.
 
 
 
 The other year, looking through a newspaper of sound principles,
 but whose staff WILL persist in "casting" anchors and going to sea
 "on" a ship (ough!), I came across an article upon the season's
 yachting.  And, behold! it was a good article.  To a man who had
 but little to do with pleasure sailing (though all sailing is a
 pleasure), and certainly nothing whatever with racing in open
 waters, the writer's strictures upon the handicapping of yachts
 were just intelligible and no more.  And I do not pretend to any
 interest in the enumeration of the great races of that year.  As to
 the 52-foot linear raters, praised so much by the writer, I am
 warmed up by his approval of their performances; but, as far as any
 clear conception goes, the descriptive phrase, so precise to the
 comprehension of a yachtsman, evokes no definite image in my mind.
 
 The writer praises that class of pleasure vessels, and I am willing
 to endorse his words, as any man who loves every craft afloat would
 be ready to do.  I am disposed to admire and respect the 52-foot
 linear raters on the word of a man who regrets in such a
 sympathetic and understanding spirit the threatened decay of
 yachting seamanship.
 
 Of course, yacht racing is an organized pastime, a function of
 social idleness ministering to the vanity of certain wealthy
 inhabitants of these isles nearly as much as to their inborn love
 of the sea.  But the writer of the article in question goes on to
--**--**--
 that the seamanship on board racing yachts is not now what it used
 to be only a few, very few, years ago.
 
 For that was the gist of that article, written evidently by a man
 who not only knows but UNDERSTANDS--a thing (let me remark in
 passing) much rarer than one would expect, because the sort of
 understanding I mean is inspired by love; and love, though in a
 sense it may be admitted to be stronger than death, is by no means
 so universal and so sure.  In fact, love is rare--the love of men,
 of things, of ideas, the love of perfected skill.  For love is the
 enemy of haste; it takes count of passing days, of men who pass
 away, of a fine art matured slowly in the course of years and
 doomed in a short time to pass away too, and be no more.  Love and
 regret go hand in hand in this world of changes swifter than the
 shifting of the clouds reflected in the mirror of the sea.
 
 To penalize a yacht in proportion to the fineness of her
 performance is unfair to the craft and to her men.  It is unfair to
 the perfection of her form and to the skill of her servants.  For
 we men are, in fact, the servants of our creations.  We remain in
 everlasting bondage to the productions of our brain and to the work
 of our hands.  A man is born to serve his time on this earth, and
 there is something fine in the service being given on other grounds
 than that of utility.  The bondage of art is very exacting.  And,
 as the writer of the article which started this train of thought
 says with lovable warmth, the sailing of yachts is a fine art.
--**--**--
 their evolutions is a pleasure to the eye.  They are birds of the
 sea, whose swimming is like flying, and resembles more a natural
 function than the handling of man-invented appliances.  The fore-
 and-aft rig in its simplicity and the beauty of its aspect under
 every angle of vision is, I believe, unapproachable.  A schooner,
 yawl, or cutter in charge of a capable man seems to handle herself
 as if endowed with the power of reasoning and the gift of swift
 execution.  One laughs with sheer pleasure at a smart piece of
 manoeuvring, as at a manifestation of a living creature's quick wit
 and graceful precision.
 
 Of those three varieties of fore-and-aft rig, the cutter--the
 racing rig par excellence--is of an appearance the most imposing,
 from the fact that practically all her canvas is in one piece.  The
 enormous mainsail of a cutter, as she draws slowly past a point of
 land or the end of a jetty under your admiring gaze, invests her
 with an air of lofty and silent majesty.  At anchor a schooner
 looks better; she has an aspect of greater efficiency and a better
 balance to the eye, with her two masts distributed over the hull
 with a swaggering rake aft.  The yawl rig one comes in time to
 love.  It is, I should think, the easiest of all to manage.
 
 For racing, a cutter; for a long pleasure voyage, a schooner; for
 cruising in home waters, the yawl; and the handling of them all is
 indeed a fine art.  It requires not only the knowledge of the
 general principles of sailing, but a particular acquaintance with
 the character of the craft.  All vessels are handled in the same
 way as far as theory goes, just as you may deal with all men on
 broad and rigid principles.  But if you want that success in life
--**--**--
 by the nose with their eyes open.  But a ship is a creature which
 we have brought into the world, as it were on purpose to keep us up
 to the mark.  In her handling a ship will not put up with a mere
 pretender, as, for instance, the public will do with Mr. X, the
 popular statesman, Mr. Y, the popular scientist, or Mr. Z, the
 popular--what shall we say?--anything from a teacher of high
 morality to a bagman--who have won their little race.  But I would
 like (though not accustomed to betting) to wager a large sum that
 not one of the few first-rate skippers of racing yachts has ever
 been a humbug.  It would have been too difficult.  The difficulty
 arises from the fact that one does not deal with ships in a mob,
 but with a ship as an individual.  So we may have to do with men.
 But in each of us there lurks some particle of the mob spirit, of
 the mob temperament.  No matter how earnestly we strive against
 each other, we remain brothers on the lowest side of our intellect
 and in the instability of our feelings.  With ships it is not so.
 Much as they are to us, they are nothing to each other.  Those
 sensitive creatures have no ears for our blandishments.  It takes
 something more than words to cajole them to do our will, to cover
 us with glory.  Luckily, too, or else there would have been more
 shoddy reputations for first-rate seamanship.  Ships have no ears,
 I repeat, though, indeed, I think I have known ships who really
 seemed to have had eyes, or else I cannot understand on what ground
 a certain 1,000-ton barque of my acquaintance on one particular
 occasion refused to answer her helm, thereby saving a frightful
--**--**--
 of their temperament.  To get the best and truest effect from the
 infinitely varying moods of sky and sea, not pictorially, but in
 the spirit of their calling, was their vocation, one and all; and
 they recognised this with as much sincerity, and drew as much
 inspiration from this reality, as any man who ever put brush to
 canvas.  The diversity of temperaments was immense amongst those
 masters of the fine art.
 
 Some of them were like Royal Academicians of a certain kind.  They
 never startled you by a touch of originality, by a fresh audacity
 of inspiration.  They were safe, very safe.  They went about
 solemnly in the assurance of their consecrated and empty
 reputation.  Names are odious, but I remember one of them who might
 have been their very president, the P.R.A. of the sea-craft.  His
 weather-beaten and handsome face, his portly presence, his shirt-
 fronts and broad cuffs and gold links, his air of bluff
 distinction, impressed the humble beholders (stevedores, tally
 clerks, tide-waiters) as he walked ashore over the gangway of his
 ship lying at the Circular Quay in Sydney.  His voice was deep,
 hearty, and authoritative--the voice of a very prince amongst
 sailors.  He did everything with an air which put your attention on
 the alert and raised your expectations, but the result somehow was
 always on stereotyped lines, unsuggestive, empty of any lesson that
 one could lay to heart.  He kept his ship in apple-pie order, which
 would have been seamanlike enough but for a finicking touch in its
 details.  His officers affected a superiority over the rest of us,
 but the boredom of their souls appeared in their manner of dreary
 submission to the fads of their commander.  It was only his
 apprenticed boys whose irrepressible spirits were not affected by
 the solemn and respectable mediocrity of that artist.  There were
--**--**--
 But let that pass.  Some of the masters whose influence left a
 trace upon my character to this very day, combined a fierceness of
 conception with a certitude of execution upon the basis of just
 appreciation of means and ends which is the highest quality of the
 man of action.  And an artist is a man of action, whether he
 creates a personality, invents an expedient, or finds the issue of
 a complicated situation.
 
 There were masters, too, I have known, whose very art consisted in
 avoiding every conceivable situation.  It is needless to say that
 they never did great things in their craft; but they were not to be
 despised for that.  They were modest; they understood their
 limitations.  Their own masters had not handed the sacred fire into
 the keeping of their cold and skilful hands.  One of those last I
 remember specially, now gone to his rest from that sea which his
 temperament must have made a scene of little more than a peaceful
 pursuit.  Once only did he attempt a stroke of audacity, one early
 morning, with a steady breeze, entering a crowded roadstead.  But
 he was not genuine in this display which might have been art.  He
 was thinking of his own self; he hankered after the meretricious
 glory of a showy performance.
 
 As, rounding a dark, wooded point, bathed in fresh air and
 sunshine, we opened to view a crowd of shipping at anchor lying
 half a mile ahead of us perhaps, he called me aft from my station
 on the forecastle head, and, turning over and over his binoculars
 in his brown hands, said:  "Do you see that big, heavy ship with
 white lower masts?  I am going to take up a berth between her and
 the shore.  Now do you see to it that the men jump smartly at the
--**--**--
 by an active man in a ship's engine-room, but I remember moments
 when even to my supple limbs and pride of nimbleness the sailing-
 ship's machinery seemed to reach up to the very stars.
 
 For machinery it is, doing its work in perfect silence and with a
 motionless grace, that seems to hide a capricious and not always
 governable power, taking nothing away from the material stores of
 the earth.  Not for it the unerring precision of steel moved by
 white steam and living by red fire and fed with black coal.  The
 other seems to draw its strength from the very soul of the world,
 its formidable ally, held to obedience by the frailest bonds, like
 a fierce ghost captured in a snare of something even finer than
 spun silk.  For what is the array of the strongest ropes, the
 tallest spars and the stoutest canvas against the mighty breath of
 the infinite, but thistle stalks, cobwebs and gossamer?
 
 
 
 XI.
 
 
 
 Indeed, it is less than nothing, and I have seen, when the great
 soul of the world turned over with a heavy sigh, a perfectly new,
 extra-stout foresail vanish like a bit of some airy stuff much
 lighter than gossamer.  Then was the time for the tall spars to
 stand fast in the great uproar.  The machinery must do its work
 even if the soul of the world has gone mad.
 
 The modern steamship advances upon a still and overshadowed sea
 with a pulsating tremor of her frame, an occasional clang in her
 depths, as if she had an iron heart in her iron body; with a
 thudding rhythm in her progress and the regular beat of her
 propeller, heard afar in the night with an august and plodding
 sound as of the march of an inevitable future.  But in a gale, the
--**--**--
 
 And Mr. P-, who was not good at catching what was shouted in the
 wind, would say interrogatively:
 
 "Yes, sir?"
 
 Then in the increasing gale of the sea there would be a little
 private ship's storm going on in which you could detect strong
 language, pronounced in a tone of passion and exculpatory
 protestations uttered with every possible inflection of injured
 innocence.
 
 "By Heavens, Mr. P-!  I used to carry on sail in my time, but--"
 
 And the rest would be lost to me in a stormy gust of wind.
 
 Then, in a lull, P-'s protesting innocence would become audible:
 
 "She seems to stand it very well."
 
 And then another burst of an indignant voice:
 
 "Any fool can carry sail on a ship--"
 
 And so on and so on, the ship meanwhile rushing on her way with a
 heavier list, a noisier splutter, a more threatening hiss of the
 white, almost blinding, sheet of foam to leeward.  For the best of
 it was that Captain S- seemed constitutionally incapable of giving
 his officers a definite order to shorten sail; and so that
 extraordinarily vague row would go on till at last it dawned upon
 them both, in some particularly alarming gust, that it was time to
 do something.  There is nothing like the fearful inclination of
 your tall spars overloaded with canvas to bring a deaf man and an
 angry one to their senses.
 
 
 
 XII.
 
 
 
 So sail did get shortened more or less in time even in that ship,
 and her tall spars never went overboard while I served in her.
 However, all the time I was with them, Captain S- and Mr. P- did
 not get on very well together.  If P- carried on "like the very
 devil" because he was too deaf to know how much wind there was,
--**--**--
 young fellow to be trusted, apparently without any supervision, by
 such a commander as Captain S-; though, as far as I can remember,
 neither the tone, nor the manner, nor yet the drift of Captain S-'s
 remarks addressed to myself did ever, by the most strained
 interpretation, imply a favourable opinion of my abilities.  And he
 was, I must say, a most uncomfortable commander to get your orders
 from at night.  If I had the watch from eight till midnight, he
 would leave the deck about nine with the words, "Don't take any
 sail off her."  Then, on the point of disappearing down the
 companion-way, he would add curtly:  "Don't carry anything away."
 I am glad to say that I never did; one night, however, I was
 caught, not quite prepared, by a sudden shift of wind.
 
 There was, of course, a good deal of noise--running about, the,
 shouts of the sailors, the thrashing of the sails--enough, in fact,
 to wake the dead.  But S- never came on deck.  When I was relieved
 by the chief mate an hour afterwards, he sent for me.  I went into
 his stateroom; he was lying on his couch wrapped up in a rug, with
 a pillow under his head.
 
 "What was the matter with you up there just now?" he asked.
 
 "Wind flew round on the lee quarter, sir," I said.
 
 "Couldn't you see the shift coming?"
 
 "Yes, sir, I thought it wasn't very far off."
 
 "Why didn't you have your courses hauled up at once, then?" he
 asked in a tone that ought to have made my blood run cold.
 
 But this was my chance, and I did not let it slip.
 
 "Well, sir," I said in an apologetic tone, "she was going eleven
 knots very nicely, and I thought she would do for another half-hour
--**--**--
 quotes law cases where verdicts turned upon a point of stowage.  He
 is never pedantic, and, for all his close adherence to broad
 principles, he is ready to admit that no two ships can be treated
 exactly alike.
 
 Stevedoring, which had been a skilled labour, is fast becoming a
 labour without the skill.  The modern steamship with her many holds
 is not loaded within the sailor-like meaning of the word.  She is
 filled up.  Her cargo is not stowed in any sense; it is simply
 dumped into her through six hatchways, more or less, by twelve
 winches or so, with clatter and hurry and racket and heat, in a
 cloud of steam and a mess of coal-dust.  As long as you keep her
 propeller under water and take care, say, not to fling down barrels
 of oil on top of bales of silk, or deposit an iron bridge-girder of
 five ton or so upon a bed of coffee-bags, you have done about all
 in the way of duty that the cry for prompt despatch will allow you
 to do.
 
 
 
 XIV.
 
 
 
 The sailing-ship, when I knew her in her days of perfection, was a
 sensible creature.  When I say her days of perfection, I mean
 perfection of build, gear, seaworthy qualities and case of
 handling, not the perfection of speed.  That quality has departed
 with the change of building material.  No iron ship of yesterday
 ever attained the marvels of speed which the seamanship of men
 famous in their time had obtained from their wooden, copper-sheeted
 predecessors.  Everything had been done to make the iron ship
 perfect, but no wit of man had managed to devise an efficient
 coating composition to keep her bottom clean with the smooth
 cleanness of yellow metal sheeting.  After a spell of a few weeks
--**--**--
 knowledge of the language, since he managed invariably to interpret
 in the contrary sense everything that was said to him.
 
 Notwithstanding the little iron stove, the ink froze on the swing-
 table in the cabin, and I found it more convenient to go ashore
 stumbling over the arctic waste-land and shivering in glazed
 tramcars in order to write my evening letter to my owners in a
 gorgeous cafe in the centre of the town.  It was an immense place,
 lofty and gilt, upholstered in red plush, full of electric lights
 and so thoroughly warmed that even the marble tables felt tepid to
 the touch.  The waiter who brought me my cup of coffee bore, by
 comparison with my utter isolation, the dear aspect of an intimate
 friend.  There, alone in a noisy crowd, I would write slowly a
 letter addressed to Glasgow, of which the gist would be:  There is
 no cargo, and no prospect of any coming till late spring
 apparently.  And all the time I sat there the necessity of getting
 back to the ship bore heavily on my already half-congealed spirits-
 -the shivering in glazed tramcars, the stumbling over the snow-
 sprinkled waste ground, the vision of ships frozen in a row,
 appearing vaguely like corpses of black vessels in a white world,
 so silent, so lifeless, so soulless they seemed to be.
 
 With precaution I would go up the side of my own particular corpse,
 and would feel her as cold as ice itself and as slippery under my
 feet.  My cold berth would swallow up like a chilly burial niche my
 bodily shivers and my mental excitement.  It was a cruel winter.
 The very air seemed as hard and trenchant as steel; but it would
 have taken much more than this to extinguish my sacred fire for the
--**--**--
 
 
 So seemed to think the new captain, who arrived the day after we
 had finished loading, on the very eve of the day of sailing.  I
 first beheld him on the quay, a complete stranger to me, obviously
 not a Hollander, in a black bowler and a short drab overcoat,
 ridiculously out of tone with the winter aspect of the waste-lands,
 bordered by the brown fronts of houses with their roofs dripping
 with melting snow.
 
 This stranger was walking up and down absorbed in the marked
 contemplation of the ship's fore and aft trim; but when I saw him
 squat on his heels in the slush at the very edge of the quay to
 peer at the draught of water under her counter, I said to myself,
 "This is the captain."  And presently I descried his luggage coming
 along--a real sailor's chest, carried by means of rope-beckets
 between two men, with a couple of leather portmanteaus and a roll
 of charts sheeted in canvas piled upon the lid.  The sudden,
 spontaneous agility with which he bounded aboard right off the rail
 afforded me the first glimpse of his real character.  Without
 further preliminaries than a friendly nod, he addressed me:  "You
 have got her pretty well in her fore and aft trim.  Now, what about
 your weights?"
 
 I told him I had managed to keep the weight sufficiently well up,
 as I thought, one-third of the whole being in the upper part "above
 the beams," as the technical expression has it.  He whistled
 "Phew!" scrutinizing me from head to foot.  A sort of smiling
 vexation was visible on his ruddy face.
 
 "Well, we shall have a lively time of it this passage, I bet," he
 said.
 
 He knew.  It turned out he had been chief mate of her for the two
--**--**--
 cabin and the steward sprawling on the other, would observe,
 looking at me:  "That's your one-third above the beams.  The only
 thing that surprises me is that the sticks have stuck to her all
 this time."
 
 Ultimately some of the minor spars did go--nothing important:
 spanker-booms and such-like--because at times the frightful impetus
 of her rolling would part a fourfold tackle of new three-inch
 Manilla line as if it were weaker than pack-thread.
 
 It was only poetic justice that the chief mate who had made a
 mistake--perhaps a half-excusable one--about the distribution of
 his ship's cargo should pay the penalty.  A piece of one of the
 minor spars that did carry away flew against the chief mate's back,
 and sent him sliding on his face for quite a considerable distance
 along the main deck.  Thereupon followed various and unpleasant
 consequences of a physical order--"queer symptoms," as the captain,
 who treated them, used to say; inexplicable periods of
 powerlessness, sudden accesses of mysterious pain; and the patient
 agreed fully with the regretful mutters of his very attentive
 captain wishing that it had been a straightforward broken leg.
 Even the Dutch doctor who took the case up in Samarang offered no
 scientific explanation.  All he said was:  "Ah, friend, you are
 young yet; it may be very serious for your whole life.  You must
 leave your ship; you must quite silent be for three months--quite
 silent."
 
 Of course, he meant the chief mate to keep quiet--to lay up, as a
 matter of fact.  His manner was impressive enough, if his English
 was childishly imperfect when compared with the fluency of Mr.
 Hudig, the figure at the other end of that passage, and memorable
 enough in its way.  In a great airy ward of a Far Eastern hospital,
 lying on my back, I had plenty of leisure to remember the dreadful
--**--**--
 against every criticism.  One ship which I call to mind now had the
 reputation of killing somebody every voyage she made.  This was no
 calumny, and yet I remember well, somewhere far back in the late
 seventies, that the crew of that ship were, if anything, rather
 proud of her evil fame, as if they had been an utterly corrupt lot
 of desperadoes glorying in their association with an atrocious
 creature.  We, belonging to other vessels moored all about the
 Circular Quay in Sydney, used to shake our heads at her with a
 great sense of the unblemished virtue of our own well-loved ships.
 
 I shall not pronounce her name.  She is "missing" now, after a
 sinister but, from the point of view of her owners, a useful career
 extending over many years, and, I should say, across every ocean of
 our globe.  Having killed a man for every voyage, and perhaps
 rendered more misanthropic by the infirmities that come with years
 upon a ship, she had made up her mind to kill all hands at once
 before leaving the scene of her exploits.  A fitting end, this, to
 a life of usefulness and crime--in a last outburst of an evil
 passion supremely satisfied on some wild night, perhaps, to the
 applauding clamour of wind and wave.
 
 How did she do it?  In the word "missing" there is a horrible depth
 of doubt and speculation.  Did she go quickly from under the men's
 feet, or did she resist to the end, letting the sea batter her to
 pieces, start her butts, wrench her frame, load her with an
 increasing weight of salt water, and, dismasted, unmanageable,
 rolling heavily, her boats gone, her decks swept, had she wearied
 her men half to death with the unceasing labour at the pumps before
--**--**--
 regrets, with what words on their lips they died.  But there is
 something fine in the sudden passing away of these hearts from the
 extremity of struggle and stress and tremendous uproar--from the
 vast, unrestful rage of the surface to the profound peace of the
 depths, sleeping untroubled since the beginning of ages.
 
 
 
 XVIII.
 
 
 
 But if the word "missing" brings all hope to an end and settles the
 loss of the underwriters, the word "overdue" confirms the fears
 already born in many homes ashore, and opens the door of
 speculation in the market of risks.
 
 Maritime risks, be it understood.  There is a class of optimists
 ready to reinsure an "overdue" ship at a heavy premium.  But
 nothing can insure the hearts on shore against the bitterness of
 waiting for the worst.
 
 For if a "missing" ship has never turned up within the memory of
 seamen of my generation, the name of an "overdue" ship, trembling
 as it were on the edge of the fatal heading, has been known to
 appear as "arrived."
 
 It must blaze up, indeed, with a great brilliance the dull
 printer's ink expended on the assemblage of the few letters that
 form the ship's name to the anxious eyes scanning the page in fear
 and trembling.  It is like the message of reprieve from the
 sentence of sorrow suspended over many a home, even if some of the
 men in her have been the most homeless mortals that you may find
 among the wanderers of the sea.
 
 The reinsurer, the optimist of ill-luck and disaster, slaps his
 pocket with satisfaction.  The underwriter, who had been trying to
 minimize the amount of impending loss, regrets his premature
 pessimism.  The ship has been stauncher, the skies more merciful,
 the seas less angry, or perhaps the men on board of a finer temper
--**--**--
 upon a disabled ship, but to look at a sailing-vessel with her
 lofty spars gone is to look upon a defeated but indomitable
 warrior.  There is defiance in the remaining stumps of her masts,
 raised up like maimed limbs against the menacing scowl of a stormy
 sky; there is high courage in the upward sweep of her lines towards
 the bow; and as soon as, on a hastily-rigged spar, a strip of
 canvas is shown to the wind to keep her head to sea, she faces the
 waves again with an unsubdued courage.
 
 
 
 XIX.
 
 
 
 The efficiency of a steamship consists not so much in her courage
 as in the power she carries within herself.  It beats and throbs
 like a pulsating heart within her iron ribs, and when it stops, the
 steamer, whose life is not so much a contest as the disdainful
 ignoring of the sea, sickens and dies upon the waves.  The sailing-
 ship, with her unthrobbing body, seemed to lead mysteriously a sort
 of unearthly existence, bordering upon the magic of the invisible
 forces, sustained by the inspiration of life-giving and death-
 dealing winds.
 
 So that big steamer, dying by a sudden stroke, drifted, an unwieldy
 corpse, away from the track of other ships.  And she would have
 been posted really as "overdue," or maybe as "missing," had she not
 been sighted in a snowstorm, vaguely, like a strange rolling
 island, by a whaler going north from her Polar cruising ground.
 There was plenty of food on board, and I don't know whether the
 nerves of her passengers were at all affected by anything else than
 the sense of interminable boredom or the vague fear of that unusual
 situation.  Does a passenger ever feel the life of the ship in
 which he is being carried like a sort of honoured bale of highly
--**--**--
 It is difficult for a seaman to believe that his stranded ship does
 not feel as unhappy at the unnatural predicament of having no water
 under her keel as he is himself at feeling her stranded.
 
 Stranding is, indeed, the reverse of sinking.  The sea does not
 close upon the water-logged hull with a sunny ripple, or maybe with
 the angry rush of a curling wave, erasing her name from the roll of
 living ships.  No.  It is as if an invisible hand had been
 stealthily uplifted from the bottom to catch hold of her keel as it
 glides through the water.
 
 More than any other event does stranding bring to the sailor a
 sense of utter and dismal failure.  There are strandings and
 strandings, but I am safe to say that 90 per cent. of them are
 occasions in which a sailor, without dishonour, may well wish
 himself dead; and I have no doubt that of those who had the
 experience of their ship taking the ground, 90 per cent. did
 actually for five seconds or so wish themselves dead.
 
 "Taking the ground" is the professional expression for a ship that
 is stranded in gentle circumstances.  But the feeling is more as if
 the ground had taken hold of her.  It is for those on her deck a
 surprising sensation.  It is as if your feet had been caught in an
 imponderable snare; you feel the balance of your body threatened,
 and the steady poise of your mind is destroyed at once.  This
 sensation lasts only a second, for even while you stagger something
 seems to turn over in your head, bringing uppermost the mental
 exclamation, full of astonishment and dismay, "By Jove! she's on
 the ground!"
 
 And that is very terrible.  After all, the only mission of a
--**--**--
 acquisition, too, that feeling.  A man may be the better for it,
 but he will not be the same.  Damocles has seen the sword suspended
 by a hair over his head, and though a good man need not be made
 less valuable by such a knowledge, the feast shall not henceforth
 have the same flavour.
 
 Years ago I was concerned as chief mate in a case of stranding
 which was not fatal to the ship.  We went to work for ten hours on
 end, laying out anchors in readiness to heave off at high water.
 While I was still busy about the decks forward I heard the steward
 at my elbow saying:  "The captain asks whether you mean to come in,
 sir, and have something to eat to-day."
 
 I went into the cuddy.  My captain sat at the head of the table
 like a statue.  There was a strange motionlessness of everything in
 that pretty little cabin.  The swing-table which for seventy odd
 days had been always on the move, if ever so little, hung quite
 still above the soup-tureen.  Nothing could have altered the rich
 colour of my commander's complexion, laid on generously by wind and
 sea; but between the two tufts of fair hair above his ears, his
 skull, generally suffused with the hue of blood, shone dead white,
 like a dome of ivory.  And he looked strangely untidy.  I perceived
 he had not shaved himself that day; and yet the wildest motion of
 the ship in the most stormy latitudes we had passed through, never
 made him miss one single morning ever since we left the Channel.
 The fact must be that a commander cannot possibly shave himself
 when his ship is aground.  I have commanded ships myself, but I
 don't know; I have never tried to shave in my life.
--**--**--
 nature, by the mere putting forth of their might, become dangerous
 to-morrow, make for that sense of fellowship which modern seamen,
 good men as they are, cannot hope to know.  And, besides, your
 modern ship which is a steamship makes her passages on other
 principles than yielding to the weather and humouring the sea.  She
 receives smashing blows, but she advances; it is a slogging fight,
 and not a scientific campaign.  The machinery, the steel, the fire,
 the steam, have stepped in between the man and the sea.  A modern
 fleet of ships does not so much make use of the sea as exploit a
 highway.  The modern ship is not the sport of the waves.  Let us
 say that each of her voyages is a triumphant progress; and yet it
 is a question whether it is not a more subtle and more human
 triumph to be the sport of the waves and yet survive, achieving
 your end.
 
 In his own time a man is always very modern.  Whether the seamen of
 three hundred years hence will have the faculty of sympathy it is
 impossible to say.  An incorrigible mankind hardens its heart in
 the progress of its own perfectability.  How will they feel on
 seeing the illustrations to the sea novels of our day, or of our
 yesterday?  It is impossible to guess.  But the seaman of the last
 generation, brought into sympathy with the caravels of ancient time
 by his sailing-ship, their lineal descendant, cannot look upon
 those lumbering forms navigating the naive seas of ancient woodcuts
 without a feeling of surprise, of affectionate derision, envy, and
 admiration.  For those things, whose unmanageableness, even when
 represented on paper, makes one gasp with a sort of amused horror,
 were manned by men who are his direct professional ancestors.
--**--**--
 but still what a sailor would call manageable.  Under two lower
 topsails and a reefed foresail the barque seemed to race with a
 long, steady sea that did not becalm her in the troughs.  The
 solemn thundering combers caught her up from astern, passed her
 with a fierce boiling up of foam level with the bulwarks, swept on
 ahead with a swish and a roar:  and the little vessel, dipping her
 jib-boom into the tumbling froth, would go on running in a smooth,
 glassy hollow, a deep valley between two ridges of the sea, hiding
 the horizon ahead and astern.  There was such fascination in her
 pluck, nimbleness, the continual exhibition of unfailing
 seaworthiness, in the semblance of courage and endurance, that I
 could not give up the delight of watching her run through the three
 unforgettable days of that gale which my mate also delighted to
 extol as "a famous shove."
 
 And this is one of those gales whose memory in after-years returns,
 welcome in dignified austerity, as you would remember with pleasure
 the noble features of a stranger with whom you crossed swords once
 in knightly encounter and are never to see again.  In this way
 gales have their physiognomy.  You remember them by your own
 feelings, and no two gales stamp themselves in the same way upon
 your emotions.  Some cling to you in woebegone misery; others come
 back fiercely and weirdly, like ghouls bent upon sucking your
 strength away; others, again, have a catastrophic splendour; some
 are unvenerated recollections, as of spiteful wild-cats clawing at
 your agonized vitals; others are severe, like a visitation; and one
 or two rise up draped and mysterious, with an aspect of ominous
 menace.  In each of them there is a characteristic point at which
 the whole feeling seems contained in one single moment.  Thus there
--**--**--
 don't fancy that there had ever been much danger of that, but
 certainly the experience was noisy and particularly distracting--
 and yet it is the memory of a very quiet silence that survives.
 
 
 
 XXIV.
 
 
 
 For, after all, a gale of wind, the thing of mighty sound, is
 inarticulate.  It is man who, in a chance phrase, interprets the
 elemental passion of his enemy.  Thus there is another gale in my
 memory, a thing of endless, deep, humming roar, moonlight, and a
 spoken sentence.
 
 It was off that other cape which is always deprived of its title as
 the Cape of Good Hope is robbed of its name.  It was off the Horn.
 For a true expression of dishevelled wildness there is nothing like
 a gale in the bright moonlight of a high latitude.
 
 The ship, brought-to and bowing to enormous flashing seas,
 glistened wet from deck to trucks; her one set sail stood out a
 coal-black shape upon the gloomy blueness of the air.  I was a
 youngster then, and suffering from weariness, cold, and imperfect
 oilskins which let water in at every seam.  I craved human
 companionship, and, coming off the poop, took my place by the side
 of the boatswain (a man whom I did not like) in a comparatively dry
 spot where at worst we had water only up to our knees.  Above our
 heads the explosive booming gusts of wind passed continuously,
 justifying the sailor's saying "It blows great guns."  And just
 from that need of human companionship, being very close to the man,
 I said, or rather shouted:
 
 "Blows very hard, boatswain."
 
 His answer was:
 
 "Ay, and if it blows only a little harder things will begin to go.
 I don't mind as long as everything holds, but when things begin to
 go it's bad."
--**--**--
 dislodge, by the reason of his cold craftiness and profound
 duplicity.
 
 The narrow seas around these isles, where British admirals keep
 watch and ward upon the marches of the Atlantic Ocean, are subject
 to the turbulent sway of the West Wind.  Call it north-west or
 south-west, it is all one--a different phase of the same character,
 a changed expression on the same face.  In the orientation of the
 winds that rule the seas, the north and south directions are of no
 importance.  There are no North and South Winds of any account upon
 this earth.  The North and South Winds are but small princes in the
 dynasties that make peace and war upon the sea.  They never assert
 themselves upon a vast stage.  They depend upon local causes--the
 configuration of coasts, the shapes of straits, the accidents of
 bold promontories round which they play their little part.  In the
 polity of winds, as amongst the tribes of the earth, the real
 struggle lies between East and West.
 
 
 
 XXVI.
 
 
 
 The West Wind reigns over the seas surrounding the coasts of these
 kingdoms; and from the gateways of the channels, from promontories
 as if from watch-towers, from estuaries of rivers as if from
 postern gates, from passage-ways, inlets, straits, firths, the
 garrison of the Isle and the crews of the ships going and returning
 look to the westward to judge by the varied splendours of his
 sunset mantle the mood of that arbitrary ruler.  The end of the day
 is the time to gaze at the kingly face of the Westerly Weather, who
 is the arbiter of ships' destinies.  Benignant and splendid, or
 splendid and sinister, the western sky reflects the hidden purposes
 of the royal mind.  Clothed in a mantle of dazzling gold or draped
 in rags of black clouds like a beggar, the might of the Westerly
--**--**--
 horizon, a mysterious veiling of the shores with clouds that seem
 to make a low-vaulted dungeon around the running ship.  It is not
 blindness; it is a shortening of the sight.  The West Wind does not
 say to the seaman, "You shall be blind"; it restricts merely the
 range of his vision and raises the dread of land within his breast.
 It makes of him a man robbed of half his force, of half his
 efficiency.  Many times in my life, standing in long sea-boots and
 streaming oilskins at the elbow of my commander on the poop of a
 homeward-bound ship making for the Channel, and gazing ahead into
 the gray and tormented waste, I have heard a weary sigh shape
 itself into a studiously casual comment:
 
 "Can't see very far in this weather."
 
 And have made answer in the same low, perfunctory tone
 
 "No, sir."
 
 It would be merely the instinctive voicing of an ever-present
 thought associated closely with the consciousness of the land
 somewhere ahead and of the great speed of the ship.  Fair wind,
 fair wind!  Who would dare to grumble at a fair wind?  It was a
 favour of the Western King, who rules masterfully the North
 Atlantic from the latitude of the Azores to the latitude of Cape
 Farewell.  A famous shove this to end a good passage with; and yet,
 somehow, one could not muster upon one's lips the smile of a
 courtier's gratitude.  This favour was dispensed to you from under
 an overbearing scowl, which is the true expression of the great
 autocrat when he has made up his mind to give a battering to some
 ships and to hunt certain others home in one breath of cruelty and
 benevolence, equally distracting.
 
 "No, sir.  Can't see very far."
 
 Thus would the mate's voice repeat the thought of the master, both
--**--**--
 
 Heralded by the increasing fierceness of the squalls, sometimes by
 a faint flash of lightning like the signal of a lighted torch waved
 far away behind the clouds, the shift of wind comes at last, the
 crucial moment of the change from the brooding and veiled violence
 of the south-west gale to the sparkling, flashing, cutting, clear-
 eyed anger of the King's north-westerly mood.  You behold another
 phase of his passion, a fury bejewelled with stars, mayhap bearing
 the crescent of the moon on its brow, shaking the last vestiges of
 its torn cloud-mantle in inky-black squalls, with hail and sleet
 descending like showers of crystals and pearls, bounding off the
 spars, drumming on the sails, pattering on the oilskin coats,
 whitening the decks of homeward-bound ships.  Faint, ruddy flashes
 of lightning flicker in the starlight upon her mastheads.  A chilly
 blast hums in the taut rigging, causing the ship to tremble to her
 very keel, and the soaked men on her decks to shiver in their wet
 clothes to the very marrow of their bones.  Before one squall has
 flown over to sink in the eastern board, the edge of another peeps
 up already above the western horizon, racing up swift, shapeless,
 like a black bag full of frozen water ready to burst over your
 devoted head.  The temper of the ruler of the ocean has changed.
 Each gust of the clouded mood that seemed warmed by the heat of a
 heart flaming with anger has its counterpart in the chilly blasts
 that seem blown from a breast turned to ice with a sudden revulsion
 of feeling.  Instead of blinding your eyes and crushing your soul
 with a terrible apparatus of cloud and mists and seas and rain, the
 King of the West turns his power to contemptuous pelting of your
--**--**--
 a fair wind.  Like men racing blindfold for a gap in a hedge, we
 were finishing a splendidly quick passage from the Antipodes, with
 a tremendous rush for the Channel in as thick a weather as any I
 can remember, but his psychology did not permit him to bring the
 ship to with a fair wind blowing--at least not on his own
 initiative.  And yet he felt that very soon indeed something would
 have to be done.  He wanted the suggestion to come from me, so that
 later on, when the trouble was over, he could argue this point with
 his own uncompromising spirit, laying the blame upon my shoulders.
 I must render him the justice that this sort of pride was his only
 weakness.
 
 But he got no suggestion from me.  I understood his psychology.
 Besides, I had my own stock of weaknesses at the time (it is a
 different one now), and amongst them was the conceit of being
 remarkably well up in the psychology of the Westerly weather.  I
 believed--not to mince matters--that I had a genius for reading the
 mind of the great ruler of high latitudes.  I fancied I could
 discern already the coming of a change in his royal mood.  And all
 I said was:
 
 "The weather's bound to clear up with the shift of wind."
 
 "Anybody knows that much!" he snapped at me, at the highest pitch
 of his voice.
 
 "I mean before dark!" I cried.
 
 This was all the opening he ever got from me.  The eagerness with
 which he seized upon it gave me the measure of the anxiety he had
 been labouring under.
 
 "Very well," he shouted, with an affectation of impatience, as if
 giving way to long entreaties.  "All right.  If we don't get a
 shift by then we'll take that foresail off her and put her head
--**--**--
 with a thundering voice, distended cheeks and fierce blue eyes,
 urging the speed of his gales.  The other, the East king, the king
 of blood-red sunrises, I represent to myself as a spare Southerner
 with clear-cut features, black-browed and dark-eyed, gray-robed,
 upright in sunshine, resting a smooth-shaven cheek in the palm of
 his hand, impenetrable, secret, full of wiles, fine-drawn, keen--
 meditating aggressions.
 
 The West Wind keeps faith with his brother, the King of the
 Easterly weather.  "What we have divided we have divided," he seems
 to say in his gruff voice, this ruler without guile, who hurls as
 if in sport enormous masses of cloud across the sky, and flings the
 great waves of the Atlantic clear across from the shores of the New
 World upon the hoary headlands of Old Europe, which harbours more
 kings and rulers upon its seamed and furrowed body than all the
 oceans of the world together.  "What we have divided we have
 divided; and if no rest and peace in this world have fallen to my
 share, leave me alone.  Let me play at quoits with cyclonic gales,
 flinging the discs of spinning cloud and whirling air from one end
 of my dismal kingdom to the other:  over the Great Banks or along
 the edges of pack-ice--this one with true aim right into the bight
 of the Bay of Biscay, that other upon the fiords of Norway, across
 the North Sea where the fishermen of many nations look watchfully
 into my angry eye.  This is the time of kingly sport."
 
 And the royal master of high latitudes sighs mightily, with the
 sinking sun upon his breast and the double-edged sword upon his
 knees, as if wearied by the innumerable centuries of a strenuous
 rule and saddened by the unchangeable aspect of the ocean under his
--**--**--
 we had all starved to death in the held-up fleet--starved within
 sight, as it were, of plenty, within touch, almost, of the
 bountiful heart of the Empire.  There we were, dotting with our
 white dry sails the hard blueness of the deep sea.  There we were,
 a growing company of ships, each with her burden of grain, of
 timber, of wool, of hides, and even of oranges, for we had one or
 two belated fruit schooners in company.  There we were, in that
 memorable spring of a certain year in the late seventies, dodging
 to and fro, baffled on every tack, and with our stores running down
 to sweepings of bread-lockers and scrapings of sugar-casks.  It was
 just like the East Wind's nature to inflict starvation upon the
 bodies of unoffending sailors, while he corrupted their simple
 souls by an exasperation leading to outbursts of profanity as lurid
 as his blood-red sunrises.  They were followed by gray days under
 the cover of high, motionless clouds that looked as if carved in a
 slab of ash-coloured marble.  And each mean starved sunset left us
 calling with imprecations upon the West Wind even in its most
 veiled misty mood to wake up and give us our liberty, if only to
 rush on and dash the heads of our ships against the very walls of
 our unapproachable home.
 
 
 
 XXIX.
 
 
 
 In the atmosphere of the Easterly weather, as pellucid as a piece
 of crystal and refracting like a prism, we could see the appalling
 numbers of our helpless company, even to those who in more normal
 conditions would have remained invisible, sails down under the
 horizon.  It is the malicious pleasure of the East Wind to augment
 the power of your eyesight, in order, perhaps, that you should see
 better the perfect humiliation, the hopeless character of your
--**--**--
 Roumanian by virtue of his throne, or a Saxe-Coburg learns to put
 the dress of Bulgarian phrases upon his particular thoughts,
 whatever they are.
 
 The autocratic sway of the West Wind, whether forty north or forty
 south of the Equator, is characterized by an open, generous, frank,
 barbarous recklessness.  For he is a great autocrat, and to be a
 great autocrat you must be a great barbarian.  I have been too much
 moulded to his sway to nurse now any idea of rebellion in my heart.
 Moreover, what is a rebellion within the four walls of a room
 against the tempestuous rule of the West Wind?  I remain faithful
 to the memory of the mighty King with a double-edged sword in one
 hand, and in the other holding out rewards of great daily runs and
 famously quick passages to those of his courtiers who knew how to
 wait watchfully for every sign of his secret mood.  As we deep-
 water men always reckoned, he made one year in three fairly lively
 for anybody having business upon the Atlantic or down there along
 the "forties" of the Southern Ocean.  You had to take the bitter
 with the sweet; and it cannot be denied he played carelessly with
 our lives and fortunes.  But, then, he was always a great king, fit
 to rule over the great waters where, strictly speaking, a man would
 have no business whatever but for his audacity.
 
 The audacious should not complain.  A mere trader ought not to
 grumble at the tolls levied by a mighty king.  His mightiness was
 sometimes very overwhelming; but even when you had to defy him
 openly, as on the banks of the Agulhas homeward bound from the East
 Indies, or on the outward passage round the Horn, he struck at you
--**--**--
 spacious, inviting, hospitable at the first glance, with a strange
 air of mysteriousness which lingers about it to this very day.  The
 navigation of his craft must have engrossed all the Roman's
 attention in the calm of a summer's day (he would choose his
 weather), when the single row of long sweeps (the galley would be a
 light one, not a trireme) could fall in easy cadence upon a sheet
 of water like plate-glass, reflecting faithfully the classic form
 of his vessel and the contour of the lonely shores close on his
 left hand.  I assume he followed the land and passed through what
 is at present known as Margate Roads, groping his careful way along
 the hidden sandbanks, whose every tail and spit has its beacon or
 buoy nowadays.  He must have been anxious, though no doubt he had
 collected beforehand on the shores of the Gauls a store of
 information from the talk of traders, adventurers, fishermen,
 slave-dealers, pirates--all sorts of unofficial men connected with
 the sea in a more or less reputable way.  He would have heard of
 channels and sandbanks, of natural features of the land useful for
 sea-marks, of villages and tribes and modes of barter and
 precautions to take:  with the instructive tales about native
 chiefs dyed more or less blue, whose character for greediness,
 ferocity, or amiability must have been expounded to him with that
 capacity for vivid language which seems joined naturally to the
 shadiness of moral character and recklessness of disposition.  With
 that sort of spiced food provided for his anxious thought, watchful
 for strange men, strange beasts, strange turns of the tide, he
 would make the best of his way up, a military seaman with a short
 sword on thigh and a bronze helmet on his head, the pioneer post-
--**--**--
 factory chimneys come distinctly into view, tall and slender above
 the squat ranges of cement works in Grays and Greenhithe.  Smoking
 quietly at the top against the great blaze of a magnificent sunset,
 they give an industrial character to the scene, speak of work,
 manufactures, and trade, as palm-groves on the coral strands of
 distant islands speak of the luxuriant grace, beauty and vigour of
 tropical nature.  The houses of Gravesend crowd upon the shore with
 an effect of confusion as if they had tumbled down haphazard from
 the top of the hill at the back.  The flatness of the Kentish shore
 ends there.  A fleet of steam-tugs lies at anchor in front of the
 various piers.  A conspicuous church spire, the first seen
 distinctly coming from the sea, has a thoughtful grace, the
 serenity of a fine form above the chaotic disorder of men's houses.
 But on the other side, on the flat Essex side, a shapeless and
 desolate red edifice, a vast pile of bricks with many windows and a
 slate roof more inaccessible than an Alpine slope, towers over the
 bend in monstrous ugliness, the tallest, heaviest building for
 miles around, a thing like an hotel, like a mansion of flats (all
 to let), exiled into these fields out of a street in West
 Kensington.  Just round the corner, as it were, on a pier defined
 with stone blocks and wooden piles, a white mast, slender like a
 stalk of straw and crossed by a yard like a knitting-needle, flying
 the signals of flag and balloon, watches over a set of heavy dock-
 gates.  Mast-heads and funnel-tops of ships peep above the ranges
 of corrugated iron roofs.  This is the entrance to Tilbury Dock,
 the most recent of all London docks, the nearest to the sea.
--**--**--
 perhaps that superannuated fellow-craftsman was simply admiring the
 ship's perfect order aloft, I thought, with some secret pride; for
 the chief officer is responsible for his ship's appearance, and as
 to her outward condition, he is the man open to praise or blame.
 Meantime the old salt ("ex-coasting skipper" was writ large all
 over his person) had hobbled up alongside in his bumpy, shiny
 boots, and, waving an arm, short and thick like the flipper of a
 seal, terminated by a paw red as an uncooked beef-steak, addressed
 the poop in a muffled, faint, roaring voice, as if a sample of
 every North-Sea fog of his life had been permanently lodged in his
 throat:  "Haul 'em round, Mr. Mate!" were his words.  "If you don't
 look sharp, you'll have your topgallant yards through the windows
 of that 'ere warehouse presently!"  This was the only cause of his
 interest in the ship's beautiful spars.  I own that for a time I
 was struck dumb by the bizarre associations of yard-arms and
 window-panes.  To break windows is the last thing one would think
 of in connection with a ship's topgallant yard, unless, indeed, one
 were an experienced berthing-master in one of the London docks.
 This old chap was doing his little share of the world's work with
 proper efficiency.  His little blue eyes had made out the danger
 many hundred yards off.  His rheumaticky feet, tired with balancing
 that squat body for many years upon the decks of small coasters,
 and made sore by miles of tramping upon the flagstones of the dock
 side, had hurried up in time to avert a ridiculous catastrophe.  I
 answered him pettishly, I fear, and as if I had known all about it
 before.
 
 "All right, all right! can't do everything at once."
 
 He remained near by, muttering to himself till the yards had been
--**--**--
 the dock buildings stirs these captives fettered to rigid shores.
 It is as if the soul of a ship were impatient of confinement.
 Those masted hulls, relieved of their cargo, become restless at the
 slightest hint of the wind's freedom.  However tightly moored, they
 range a little at their berths, swaying imperceptibly the spire-
 like assemblages of cordage and spars.  You can detect their
 impatience by watching the sway of the mastheads against the
 motionless, the soulless gravity of mortar and stones.  As you pass
 alongside each hopeless prisoner chained to the quay, the slight
 grinding noise of the wooden fenders makes a sound of angry
 muttering.  But, after all, it may be good for ships to go through
 a period of restraint and repose, as the restraint and self-
 communion of inactivity may be good for an unruly soul--not,
 indeed, that I mean to say that ships are unruly; on the contrary,
 they are faithful creatures, as so many men can testify.  And
 faithfulness is a great restraint, the strongest bond laid upon the
 self-will of men and ships on this globe of land and sea.
 
 This interval of bondage in the docks rounds each period of a
 ship's life with the sense of accomplished duty, of an effectively
 played part in the work of the world.  The dock is the scene of
 what the world would think the most serious part in the light,
 bounding, swaying life of a ship.  But there are docks and docks.
 The ugliness of some docks is appalling.  Wild horses would not
 drag from me the name of a certain river in the north whose narrow
 estuary is inhospitable and dangerous, and whose docks are like a
 nightmare of dreariness and misery.  Their dismal shores are
 studded thickly with scaffold-like, enormous timber structures,
--**--**--
 being romantic in their usefulness.
 
 In their way they are as romantic as the river they serve is unlike
 all the other commercial streams of the world.  The cosiness of the
 St. Katherine's Dock, the old-world air of the London Docks, remain
 impressed upon the memory.  The docks down the river, abreast of
 Woolwich, are imposing by their proportions and the vast scale of
 the ugliness that forms their surroundings--ugliness so picturesque
 as to become a delight to the eye.  When one talks of the Thames
 docks, "beauty" is a vain word, but romance has lived too long upon
 this river not to have thrown a mantle of glamour upon its banks.
 
 The antiquity of the port appeals to the imagination by the long
 chain of adventurous enterprises that had their inception in the
 town and floated out into the world on the waters of the river.
 Even the newest of the docks, the Tilbury Dock, shares in the
 glamour conferred by historical associations.  Queen Elizabeth has
 made one of her progresses down there, not one of her journeys of
 pomp and ceremony, but an anxious business progress at a crisis of
 national history.  The menace of that time has passed away, and now
 Tilbury is known by its docks.  These are very modern, but their
 remoteness and isolation upon the Essex marsh, the days of failure
 attending their creation, invested them with a romantic air.
 Nothing in those days could have been more striking than the vast,
 empty basins, surrounded by miles of bare quays and the ranges of
 cargo-sheds, where two or three ships seemed lost like bewitched
 children in a forest of gaunt, hydraulic cranes.  One received a
 wonderful impression of utter abandonment, of wasted efficiency.
 From the first the Tilbury Docks were very efficient and ready for
--**--**--
 veins of the hands--were the symptoms of moral poison, they prowl
 about the quays with an underhand air of gloating over the broken
 spirit of noble captives.  They want more fenders, more breasting-
 ropes; they want more springs, more shackles, more fetters; they
 want to make ships with volatile souls as motionless as square
 blocks of stone.  They stand on the mud of pavements, these
 degraded sea-dogs, with long lines of railway-trucks clanking their
 couplings behind their backs, and run malevolent glances over your
 ship from headgear to taffrail, only wishing to tyrannize over the
 poor creature under the hypocritical cloak of benevolence and care.
 Here and there cargo cranes looking like instruments of torture for
 ships swing cruel hooks at the end of long chains.  Gangs of dock-
 labourers swarm with muddy feet over the gangways.  It is a moving
 sight this, of so many men of the earth, earthy, who never cared
 anything for a ship, trampling unconcerned, brutal and hob-nailed
 upon her helpless body.
 
 Fortunately, nothing can deface the beauty of a ship.  That sense
 of a dungeon, that sense of a horrible and degrading misfortune
 overtaking a creature fair to see and safe to trust, attaches only
 to ships moored in the docks of great European ports.  You feel
 that they are dishonestly locked up, to be hunted about from wharf
 to wharf on a dark, greasy, square pool of black water as a brutal
 reward at the end of a faithful voyage.
 
 A ship anchored in an open roadstead, with cargo-lighters alongside
 and her own tackle swinging the burden over the rail, is
 accomplishing in freedom a function of her life.  There is no
 restraint; there is space:  clear water around her, and a clear sky
 above her mastheads, with a landscape of green hills and charming
--**--**--
 square-stern type, that took their captivity, one imagines, as
 stolidly as they had faced the buffeting of the waves with their
 blunt, honest bows, and disgorged sugar, rum, molasses, coffee, or
 logwood sedately with their own winch and tackle.  But when I knew
 them, of exports there was never a sign that one could detect; and
 all the imports I have ever seen were some rare cargoes of tropical
 timber, enormous baulks roughed out of iron trunks grown in the
 woods about the Gulf of Mexico.  They lay piled up in stacks of
 mighty boles, and it was hard to believe that all this mass of dead
 and stripped trees had come out of the flanks of a slender,
 innocent-looking little barque with, as likely as not, a homely
 woman's name--Ellen this or Annie that--upon her fine bows.  But
 this is generally the case with a discharged cargo.  Once spread at
 large over the quay, it looks the most impossible bulk to have all
 come there out of that ship along-side.
 
 They were quiet, serene nooks in the busy world of docks, these
 basins where it has never been my good luck to get a berth after
 some more or less arduous passage.  But one could see at a glance
 that men and ships were never hustled there.  They were so quiet
 that, remembering them well, one comes to doubt that they ever
 existed--places of repose for tired ships to dream in, places of
 meditation rather than work, where wicked ships--the cranky, the
 lazy, the wet, the bad sea boats, the wild steerers, the
 capricious, the pig-headed, the generally ungovernable--would have
 full leisure to take count and repent of their sins, sorrowful and
 naked, with their rent garments of sailcloth stripped off them, and
 with the dust and ashes of the London atmosphere upon their
--**--**--
 steady seaman is forthcoming.  Ships' crews had the trick of
 melting away swiftly in those days.  So, probably on account of my
 youth, innocence, and pensive habits (which made me sometimes
 dilatory in my work about the rigging), I was suddenly nominated,
 in our chief mate Mr. B-'s most sardonic tones, to that enviable
 situation.  I do not regret the experience.  The night humours of
 the town descended from the street to the waterside in the still
 watches of the night:  larrikins rushing down in bands to settle
 some quarrel by a stand-up fight, away from the police, in an
 indistinct ring half hidden by piles of cargo, with the sounds of
 blows, a groan now and then, the stamping of feet, and the cry of
 "Time!" rising suddenly above the sinister and excited murmurs;
 night-prowlers, pursued or pursuing, with a stifled shriek followed
 by a profound silence, or slinking stealthily along-side like
 ghosts, and addressing me from the quay below in mysterious tones
 with incomprehensible propositions.  The cabmen, too, who twice a
 week, on the night when the A.S.N. Company's passenger-boat was due
 to arrive, used to range a battalion of blazing lamps opposite the
 ship, were very amusing in their way.  They got down from their
 perches and told each other impolite stories in racy language,
 every word of which reached me distinctly over the bulwarks as I
 sat smoking on the main-hatch.  On one occasion I had an hour or so
 of a most intellectual conversation with a person whom I could not
 see distinctly, a gentleman from England, he said, with a
 cultivated voice, I on deck and he on the quay sitting on the case
 of a piano (landed out of our hold that very afternoon), and
 smoking a cigar which smelt very good.  We touched, in our
--**--**--
 
 "Watchman!"
 
 "Sir."
 
 "Captain aboard?"
 
 "Yes, sir."
 
 Pause.
 
 "Dog aboard?"
 
 "Yes, sir."
 
 Pause.
 
 Our dog was a gaunt and unpleasant beast, more like a wolf in poor
 health than a dog, and I never noticed Mr. B- at any other time
 show the slightest interest in the doings of the animal.  But that
 question never failed.
 
 "Let's have your arm to steady me along."
 
 I was always prepared for that request.  He leaned on me heavily
 till near enough the cabin-door to catch hold of the handle.  Then
 he would let go my arm at once.
 
 "That'll do.  I can manage now."
 
 And he could manage.  He could manage to find his way into his
 berth, light his lamp, get into his bed--ay, and get out of it when
 I called him at half-past five, the first man on deck, lifting the
 cup of morning coffee to his lips with a steady hand, ready for
 duty as though he had virtuously slept ten solid hours--a better
 chief officer than many a man who had never tasted grog in his
 life.  He could manage all that, but could never manage to get on
 in life.
 
 Only once he failed to seize the cabin-door handle at the first
 grab.  He waited a little, tried again, and again failed.  His
 weight was growing heavier on my arm.  He sighed slowly.
 
 "D-n that handle!"
 
 Without letting go his hold of me he turned about, his face lit up
 bright as day by the full moon.
 
 "I wish she were out at sea," he growled savagely.
 
 "Yes, sir."
 
 I felt the need to say something, because he hung on to me as if
 lost, breathing heavily.
 
 "Ports are no good--ships rot, men go to the devil!"
 
 I kept still, and after a while he repeated with a sigh.
--**--**--
 "Ships!" exclaimed an elderly seaman in clean shore togs.  "Ships"-
 -and his keen glance, turning away from my face, ran along the
 vista of magnificent figure-heads that in the late seventies used
 to overhang in a serried rank the muddy pavement by the side of the
 New South Dock--"ships are all right; it's the men in 'em. . ."
 
 Fifty hulls, at least, moulded on lines of beauty and speed--hulls
 of wood, of iron, expressing in their forms the highest achievement
 of modern ship-building--lay moored all in a row, stem to quay, as
 if assembled there for an exhibition, not of a great industry, but
 of a great art.  Their colours were gray, black, dark green, with a
 narrow strip of yellow moulding defining their sheer, or with a row
 of painted ports decking in warlike decoration their robust flanks
 of cargo-carriers that would know no triumph but of speed in
 carrying a burden, no glory other than of a long service, no
 victory but that of an endless, obscure contest with the sea.  The
 great empty hulls with swept holds, just out of dry-dock, with
 their paint glistening freshly, sat high-sided with ponderous
 dignity alongside the wooden jetties, looking more like unmovable
 buildings than things meant to go afloat; others, half loaded, far
 on the way to recover the true sea-physiognomy of a ship brought
 down to her load-line, looked more accessible.  Their less steeply
 slanting gangways seemed to invite the strolling sailors in search
 of a berth to walk on board and try "for a chance" with the chief
 mate, the guardian of a ship's efficiency.  As if anxious to remain
 unperceived amongst their overtopping sisters, two or three
 "finished" ships floated low, with an air of straining at the leash
 of their level headfasts, exposing to view their cleared decks and
--**--**--
 the sea stretching to the last above the tumbling foam their fair,
 rounded arms; holding out their spears, swords, shields, tridents
 in the same unwearied, striving forward pose.  And nothing remains
 but lingering perhaps in the memory of a few men, the sound of
 their names, vanished a long time ago from the first page of the
 great London dailies; from big posters in railway-stations and the
 doors of shipping offices; from the minds of sailors, dockmasters,
 pilots, and tugmen; from the hail of gruff voices and the flutter
 of signal flags exchanged between ships closing upon each other and
 drawing apart in the open immensity of the sea.
 
 The elderly, respectable seaman, withdrawing his gaze from that
 multitude of spars, gave me a glance to make sure of our fellowship
 in the craft and mystery of the sea.  We had met casually, and had
 got into contact as I had stopped near him, my attention being
 caught by the same peculiarity he was looking at in the rigging of
 an obviously new ship, a ship with her reputation all to make yet
 in the talk of the seamen who were to share their life with her.
 Her name was already on their lips.  I had heard it uttered between
 two thick, red-necked fellows of the semi-nautical type at the
 Fenchurch Street Railway-station, where, in those days, the
 everyday male crowd was attired in jerseys and pilot-cloth mostly,
 and had the air of being more conversant with the times of high-
 water than with the times of the trains.  I had noticed that new
 ship's name on the first page of my morning paper.  I had stared at
 the unfamiliar grouping of its letters, blue on white ground, on
 the advertisement-boards, whenever the train came to a standstill
 alongside one of the shabby, wooden, wharf-like platforms of the
--**--**--
 temper needed for casual intercourse with one's fellow-creatures.
 
 "You can always put up with 'em," opined the respectable seaman
 judicially.
 
 He was not averse from talking, either.  If he had come down to the
 dock to look for a berth, he did not seem oppressed by anxiety as
 to his chances.  He had the serenity of a man whose estimable
 character is fortunately expressed by his personal appearance in an
 unobtrusive, yet convincing, manner which no chief officer in want
 of hands could resist.  And, true enough, I learned presently that
 the mate of the Hyperion had "taken down" his name for quarter-
 master.  "We sign on Friday, and join next day for the morning
 tide," he remarked, in a deliberate, careless tone, which
 contrasted strongly with his evident readiness to stand there
 yarning for an hour or so with an utter stranger.
 
 "Hyperion," I said.  "I don't remember ever seeing that ship
 anywhere.  What sort of a name has she got?"
 
 It appeared from his discursive answer that she had not much of a
 name one way or another.  She was not very fast.  It took no fool,
 though, to steer her straight, he believed.  Some years ago he had
 seen her in Calcutta, and he remembered being told by somebody
 then, that on her passage up the river she had carried away both
 her hawse-pipes.  But that might have been the pilot's fault.  Just
 now, yarning with the apprentices on board, he had heard that this
 very voyage, brought up in the Downs, outward bound, she broke her
 sheer, struck adrift, and lost an anchor and chain.  But that might
 have occurred through want of careful tending in a tideway.  All
 the same, this looked as though she were pretty hard on her ground-
 tackle.  Didn't it?  She seemed a heavy ship to handle, anyway.
--**--**--
 that swims in deep waters.  And I have heard curses launched at the
 unstable element itself, whose fascination, outlasting the
 accumulated experience of ages, had captured him as it had captured
 the generations of his forebears.
 
 For all that has been said of the love that certain natures (on
 shore) have professed to feel for it, for all the celebrations it
 had been the object of in prose and song, the sea has never been
 friendly to man.  At most it has been the accomplice of human
 restlessness, and playing the part of dangerous abettor of world-
 wide ambitions.  Faithful to no race after the manner of the kindly
 earth, receiving no impress from valour and toil and self-
 sacrifice, recognising no finality of dominion, the sea has never
 adopted the cause of its masters like those lands where the
 victorious nations of mankind have taken root, rocking their
 cradles and setting up their gravestones.  He--man or people--who,
 putting his trust in the friendship of the sea, neglects the
 strength and cunning of his right hand, is a fool!  As if it were
 too great, too mighty for common virtues, the ocean has no
 compassion, no faith, no law, no memory.  Its fickleness is to be
 held true to men's purposes only by an undaunted resolution and by
 a sleepless, armed, jealous vigilance, in which, perhaps, there has
 always been more hate than love.  Odi et amo may well be the
 confession of those who consciously or blindly have surrendered
 their existence to the fascination of the sea.  All the tempestuous
 passions of mankind's young days, the love of loot and the love of
 glory, the love of adventure and the love of danger, with the great
 love of the unknown and vast dreams of dominion and power, have
--**--**--
 extraordinary voice--a voice never heard before in our ship; the
 amazing voice of a stranger.  It gave the signal for a sudden
 tumult of shouts.  The watch below ran up the forecastle head in a
 body, the cook dashed out of the galley.  Everybody saw the poor
 fellows now.  They were there!  And all at once our ship, which had
 the well-earned name of being without a rival for speed in light
 winds, seemed to us to have lost the power of motion, as if the
 sea, becoming viscous, had clung to her sides.  And yet she moved.
 Immensity, the inseparable companion of a ship's life, chose that
 day to breathe upon her as gently as a sleeping child.  The clamour
 of our excitement had died out, and our living ship, famous for
 never losing steerage way as long as there was air enough to float
 a feather, stole, without a ripple, silent and white as a ghost,
 towards her mutilated and wounded sister, come upon at the point of
 death in the sunlit haze of a calm day at sea.
 
 With the binoculars glued to his eyes, the captain said in a
 quavering tone:  "They are waving to us with something aft there."
 He put down the glasses on the skylight brusquely, and began to
 walk about the poop.  "A shirt or a flag," he ejaculated irritably.
 "Can't make it out. . . Some damn rag or other!"  He took a few
 more turns on the poop, glancing down over the rail now and then to
 see how fast we were moving.  His nervous footsteps rang sharply in
 the quiet of the ship, where the other men, all looking the same
 way, had forgotten themselves in a staring immobility.  "This will
 never do!" he cried out suddenly.  "Lower the boats at once!  Down
--**--**--
 our regatta had we had the free choice of all the days that ever
 dawned upon the lonely struggles and solitary agonies of ships
 since the Norse rovers first steered to the westward against the
 run of Atlantic waves.  It was a very good race.  At the finish
 there was not an oar's length between the first and second boat,
 with Death coming in a good third on the top of the very next
 smooth swell, for all one knew to the contrary.  The scuppers of
 the brig gurgled softly all together when the water rising against
 her sides subsided sleepily with a low wash, as if playing about an
 immovable rock.  Her bulwarks were gone fore and aft, and one saw
 her bare deck low-lying like a raft and swept clean of boats,
 spars, houses--of everything except the ringbolts and the heads of
 the pumps.  I had one dismal glimpse of it as I braced myself up to
 receive upon my breast the last man to leave her, the captain, who
 literally let himself fall into my arms.
 
 It had been a weirdly silent rescue--a rescue without a hail,
 without a single uttered word, without a gesture or a sign, without
 a conscious exchange of glances.  Up to the very last moment those
 on board stuck to their pumps, which spouted two clear streams of
 water upon their bare feet.  Their brown skin showed through the
 rents of their shirts; and the two small bunches of half-naked,
 tattered men went on bowing from the waist to each other in their
 back-breaking labour, up and down, absorbed, with no time for a
 glance over the shoulder at the help that was coming to them.  As
 we dashed, unregarded, alongside a voice let out one, only one
 hoarse howl of command, and then, just as they stood, without caps,
--**--**--
 Neither angry, nor playful, nor smiling, it enveloped our distant
 ship growing bigger as she neared us, our boats with the rescued
 men and the dismantled hull of the brig we were leaving behind, in
 the large and placid embrace of its quietness, half lost in the
 fair haze, as if in a dream of infinite and tender clemency.  There
 was no frown, no wrinkle on its face, not a ripple.  And the run of
 the slight swell was so smooth that it resembled the graceful
 undulation of a piece of shimmering gray silk shot with gleams of
 green.  We pulled an easy stroke; but when the master of the brig,
 after a glance over his shoulder, stood up with a low exclamation,
 my men feathered their oars instinctively, without an order, and
 the boat lost her way.
 
 He was steadying himself on my shoulder with a strong grip, while
 his other arm, flung up rigidly, pointed a denunciatory finger at
 the immense tranquillity of the ocean.  After his first
 exclamation, which stopped the swing of our oars, he made no sound,
 but his whole attitude seemed to cry out an indignant "Behold!" . .
 . I could not imagine what vision of evil had come to him.  I was
 startled, and the amazing energy of his immobilized gesture made my
 heart beat faster with the anticipation of something monstrous and
 unsuspected.  The stillness around us became crushing.
 
 For a moment the succession of silky undulations ran on innocently.
 I saw each of them swell up the misty line of the horizon, far, far
 away beyond the derelict brig, and the next moment, with a slight
 friendly toss of our boat, it had passed under us and was gone.
 The lulling cadence of the rise and fall, the invariable gentleness
--**--**--
 hanging between his knees, he uttered no word, made no movement
 till the shadow of our ship's sails fell on the boat, when, at the
 loud cheer greeting the return of the victors with their prize, he
 lifted up his troubled face with a faint smile of pathetic
 indulgence.  This smile of the worthy descendant of the most
 ancient sea-folk whose audacity and hardihood had left no trace of
 greatness and glory upon the waters, completed the cycle of my
 initiation.  There was an infinite depth of hereditary wisdom in
 its pitying sadness.  It made the hearty bursts of cheering sound
 like a childish noise of triumph.  Our crew shouted with immense
 confidence--honest souls!  As if anybody could ever make sure of
 having prevailed against the sea, which has betrayed so many ships
 of great "name," so many proud men, so many towering ambitions of
 fame, power, wealth, greatness!
 
 As I brought the boat under the falls my captain, in high good-
 humour, leaned over, spreading his red and freckled elbows on the
 rail, and called down to me sarcastically, out of the depths of his
 cynic philosopher's beard:
 
 "So you have brought the boat back after all, have you?"
 
 Sarcasm was "his way," and the most that can be said for it is that
 it was natural.  This did not make it lovable.  But it is decorous
 and expedient to fall in with one's commander's way.  "Yes.  I
 brought the boat back all right, sir," I answered.  And the good
 man believed me.  It was not for him to discern upon me the marks
 of my recent initiation.  And yet I was not exactly the same
 youngster who had taken the boat away--all impatience for a race
 against death, with the prize of nine men's lives at the end.
--**--**--
 to be regarded at last as a half-mystic and glorious ceremony with
 certain fashionable rites and preliminary incantations, wherein the
 conception of its true nature has been lost.  To apprehend the true
 aspect, force, and morality of war as a natural function of mankind
 one requires a feather in the hair and a ring in the nose, or,
 better still, teeth filed to a point and a tattooed breast.
 Unfortunately, a return to such simple ornamentation is impossible.
 We are bound to the chariot of progress.  There is no going back;
 and, as bad luck would have it, our civilization, which has done so
 much for the comfort and adornment of our bodies and the elevation
 of our minds, has made lawful killing frightfully and needlessly
 expensive.
 
 The whole question of improved armaments has been approached by the
 governments of the earth in a spirit of nervous and unreflecting
 haste, whereas the right way was lying plainly before them, and had
 only to be pursued with calm determination.  The learned vigils and
 labours of a certain class of inventors should have been rewarded
 with honourable liberality as justice demanded; and the bodies of
 the inventors should have been blown to pieces by means of their
 own perfected explosives and improved weapons with extreme
 publicity as the commonest prudence dictated.  By this method the
 ardour of research in that direction would have been restrained
 without infringing the sacred privileges of science.  For the lack
 of a little cool thinking in our guides and masters this course has
 not been followed, and a beautiful simplicity has been sacrificed
 for no real advantage.  A frugal mind cannot defend itself from
 considerable bitterness when reflecting that at the Battle of
 Actium (which was fought for no less a stake than the dominion of
--**--**--
 monotonous and vibrating note was destined to grow into the
 intimacy of the heart, pass into blood and bone, accompany the
 thoughts and acts of two full decades, remain to haunt like a
 reproach the peace of the quiet fireside, and enter into the very
 texture of respectable dreams dreamed safely under a roof of
 rafters and tiles.  The wind was fair, but that day we ran no more.
 
 The thing (I will not call her a ship twice in the same half-hour)
 leaked.  She leaked fully, generously, overflowingly, all over--
 like a basket.  I took an enthusiastic part in the excitement
 caused by that last infirmity of noble ships, without concerning
 myself much with the why or the wherefore.  The surmise of my
 maturer years is that, bored by her interminable life, the
 venerable antiquity was simply yawning with ennui at every seam.
 But at the time I did not know; I knew generally very little, and
 least of all what I was doing in that galere.
 
 I remember that, exactly as in the comedy of Moliere, my uncle
 asked the precise question in the very words--not of my
 confidential valet, however, but across great distances of land, in
 a letter whose mocking but indulgent turn ill concealed his almost
 paternal anxiety.  I fancy I tried to convey to him my (utterly
 unfounded) impression that the West Indies awaited my coming.  I
 had to go there.  It was a sort of mystic conviction--something in
 the nature of a call.  But it was difficult to state intelligibly
 the grounds of this belief to that man of rigorous logic, if of
 infinite charity.
 
 The truth must have been that, all unversed in the arts of the wily
 Greek, the deceiver of gods, the lover of strange women, the evoker
 of bloodthirsty shades, I yet longed for the beginning of my own
--**--**--
 providing of the cradle necessary for that operation was entrusted
 by Fate to the most casual assemblage of irresponsible young men
 (all, however, older than myself) that, as if drunk with Provencal
 sunshine, frittered life away in joyous levity on the model of
 Balzac's "Histoire des Treize" qualified by a dash of romance de
 cape et d'epee.
 
 She who was my cradle in those years had been built on the River of
 Savona by a famous builder of boats, was rigged in Corsica by
 another good man, and was described on her papers as a 'tartane' of
 sixty tons.  In reality, she was a true balancelle, with two short
 masts raking forward and two curved yards, each as long as her
 hull; a true child of the Latin lake, with a spread of two enormous
 sails resembling the pointed wings on a sea-bird's slender body,
 and herself, like a bird indeed, skimming rather than sailing the
 seas.
 
 Her name was the Tremolino.  How is this to be translated?  The
 Quiverer?  What a name to give the pluckiest little craft that ever
 dipped her sides in angry foam!  I had felt her, it is true,
 trembling for nights and days together under my feet, but it was
 with the high-strung tenseness of her faithful courage.  In her
 short, but brilliant, career she has taught me nothing, but she has
 given me everything.  I owe to her the awakened love for the sea
 that, with the quivering of her swift little body and the humming
 of the wind under the foot of her lateen sails, stole into my heart
 with a sort of gentle violence, and brought my imagination under
 its despotic sway.  The Tremolino!  To this day I cannot utter or
 even write that name without a strange tightening of the breast and
--**--**--
 too much.  Ladies, too, were concerned (I am really afraid I am
 saying too much)--all sorts of ladies, some old enough to know
 better than to put their trust in princes, others young and full of
 illusions.
 
 One of these last was extremely amusing in the imitations, she gave
 us in confidence, of various highly-placed personages she was
 perpetually rushing off to Paris to interview in the interests of
 the cause--Por el Rey!  For she was a Carlist, and of Basque blood
 at that, with something of a lioness in the expression of her
 courageous face (especially when she let her hair down), and with
 the volatile little soul of a sparrow dressed in fine Parisian
 feathers, which had the trick of coming off disconcertingly at
 unexpected moments.
 
 But her imitations of a Parisian personage, very highly placed
 indeed, as she represented him standing in the corner of a room
 with his face to the wall, rubbing the back of his head and moaning
 helplessly, "Rita, you are the death of me!" were enough to make
 one (if young and free from cares) split one's sides laughing.  She
 had an uncle still living, a very effective Carlist, too, the
 priest of a little mountain parish in Guipuzcoa.  As the sea-going
 member of the syndicate (whose plans depended greatly on Dona
 Rita's information), I used to be charged with humbly affectionate
 messages for the old man.  These messages I was supposed to deliver
 to the Arragonese muleteers (who were sure to await at certain
 times the Tremolino in the neighbourhood of the Gulf of Rosas), for
 faithful transportation inland, together with the various unlawful
 goods landed secretly from under the Tremolino's hatches.
 
 Well, now, I have really let out too much (as I feared I should in
 the end) as to the usual contents of my sea-cradle.  But let it
--**--**--
 success had reached the faithful, I was seized round the neck and
 waist and whirled recklessly three times round the room, to the
 crash of upsetting furniture and the humming of a valse tune in a
 warm contralto voice.
 
 When released from the dizzy embrace, I sat down on the carpet--
 suddenly, without affectation.  In this unpretentious attitude I
 became aware that J. M. K. B. had followed me into the room,
 elegant, fatal, correct and severe in a white tie and large shirt-
 front.  In answer to his politely sinister, prolonged glance of
 inquiry, I overheard Dona Rita murmuring, with some confusion and
 annoyance, "Vous etes bete mon cher.  Voyons!  Ca n'a aucune
 consequence."  Well content in this case to be of no particular
 consequence, I had already about me the elements of some worldly
 sense.
 
 Rearranging my collar, which, truth to say, ought to have been a
 round one above a short jacket, but was not, I observed
 felicitously that I had come to say good-bye, being ready to go off
 to sea that very night with the Tremolino.  Our hostess, slightly
 panting yet, and just a shade dishevelled, turned tartly upon J. M.
 K. B., desiring to know when HE would be ready to go off by the
 Tremolino, or in any other way, in order to join the royal
 headquarters.  Did he intend, she asked ironically, to wait for the
 very eve of the entry into Madrid?  Thus by a judicious exercise of
 tact and asperity we re-established the atmospheric equilibrium of
 the room long before I left them a little before midnight, now
 tenderly reconciled, to walk down to the harbour and hail the
 Tremolino by the usual soft whistle from the edge of the quay.  It
 was our signal, invariably heard by the ever-watchful Dominic, the
--**--**--
 Dominic Cervoni, of Corsica, not Ithaca; and no king, son of kings,
 but of very respectable family--authentic Caporali, he affirmed.
 But that is as it may be.  The Caporali families date back to the
 twelfth century.
 
 For want of more exalted adversaries Dominic turned his audacity
 fertile in impious stratagems against the powers of the earth, as
 represented by the institution of Custom-houses and every mortal
 belonging thereto--scribes, officers, and guardacostas afloat and
 ashore.  He was the very man for us, this modern and unlawful
 wanderer with his own legend of loves, dangers, and bloodshed.  He
 told us bits of it sometimes in measured, ironic tones.  He spoke
 Catalonian, the Italian of Corsica and the French of Provence with
 the same easy naturalness.  Dressed in shore-togs, a white starched
 shirt, black jacket, and round hat, as I took him once to see Dona
 Rita, he was extremely presentable.  He could make himself
 interesting by a tactful and rugged reserve set off by a grim,
 almost imperceptible, playfulness of tone and manner.
 
 He had the physical assurance of strong-hearted men.  After half an
 hour's interview in the dining-room, during which they got in touch
 with each other in an amazing way, Rita told us in her best grande
 dame manner:  "Mais il esi parfait, cet homme."  He was perfect.
 On board the Tremolino, wrapped up in a black caban, the
 picturesque cloak of Mediterranean seamen, with those massive
 moustaches and his remorseless eyes set off by the shadow of the
 deep hood, he looked piratical and monkish and darkly initiated
 into the most awful mysteries of the sea.
 
 
 
 XLIII.
 
 
 
 Anyway, he was perfect, as Dona Rita had declared.  The only thing
 unsatisfactory (and even inexplicable) about our Dominic was his
 nephew, Cesar.  It was startling to see a desolate expression of
--**--**--
 in him than a snail.
 
 "Some cursed witch must have stolen my brother's child from the
 cradle and put that spawn of a starved devil in its place," Dominic
 would say to me.  "Look at him!  Just look at him!"
 
 To look at Cesar was not pleasant.  His parchment skin, showing
 dead white on his cranium through the thin wisps of dirty brown
 hair, seemed to be glued directly and tightly upon his big bones,
 Without being in any way deformed, he was the nearest approach
 which I have ever seen or could imagine to what is commonly
 understood by the word "monster."  That the source of the effect
 produced was really moral I have no doubt.  An utterly, hopelessly
 depraved nature was expressed in physical terms, that taken each
 separately had nothing positively startling.  You imagined him
 clammily cold to the touch, like a snake.  The slightest reproof,
 the most mild and justifiable remonstrance, would be met by a
 resentful glare and an evil shrinking of his thin dry upper lip, a
 snarl of hate to which he generally added the agreeable sound of
 grinding teeth.
 
 It was for this venomous performance rather than for his lies,
 impudence, and laziness that his uncle used to knock him down.  It
 must not be imagined that it was anything in the nature of a brutal
 assault.  Dominic's brawny arm would be seen describing
 deliberately an ample horizontal gesture, a dignified sweep, and
 Cesar would go over suddenly like a ninepin--which was funny to
 see.  But, once down, he would writhe on the deck, gnashing his
 teeth in impotent rage--which was pretty horrible to behold.  And
 it also happened more than once that he would disappear completely-
 -which was startling to observe.  This is the exact truth.  Before
 some of these majestic cuffs Cesar would go down and vanish.  He
--**--**--
 
 "I must try to make a man of him," Dominic answered hopelessly.
 
 I restrained the obvious retort that in this way he ran the risk of
 making, in the words of the immortal Mr. Mantalini, "a demnition
 damp, unpleasant corpse of him."
 
 "He wants to be a locksmith!" burst out Cervoni.  "To learn how to
 pick locks, I suppose," he added with sardonic bitterness.
 
 "Why not let him be a locksmith?" I ventured.
 
 "Who would teach him?" he cried.  "Where could I leave him?" he
 asked, with a drop in his voice; and I had my first glimpse of
 genuine despair.  "He steals, you know, alas!  Par ta Madonne!  I
 believe he would put poison in your food and mine--the viper!"
 
 He raised his face and both his clenched fists slowly to heaven.
 However, Cesar never dropped poison into our cups.  One cannot be
 sure, but I fancy he went to work in another way.
 
 This voyage, of which the details need not be given, we had to
 range far afield for sufficient reasons.  Coming up from the South
 to end it with the important and really dangerous part of the
 scheme in hand, we found it necessary to look into Barcelona for
 certain definite information.  This appears like running one's head
 into the very jaws of the lion, but in reality it was not so.  We
 had one or two high, influential friends there, and many others
 humble but valuable because bought for good hard cash.  We were in
 no danger of being molested; indeed, the important information
 reached us promptly by the hands of a Custom-house officer, who
 came on board full of showy zeal to poke an iron rod into the layer
 of oranges which made the visible part of our cargo in the
 hatchway.
 
 I forgot to mention before that the Tremolino was officially known
--**--**--
 
 XLIV.
 
 
 
 We slipped out to sea quietly at dusk, and all through the night
 everything went well.  The breeze was gusty; a southerly blow was
 making up.  It was fair wind for our course.  Now and then Dominic
 slowly and rhythmically struck his hands together a few times, as
 if applauding the performance of the Tremolino.  The balancelle
 hummed and quivered as she flew along, dancing lightly under our
 feet.
 
 At daybreak I pointed out to Dominic, amongst the several sail in
 view running before the gathering storm, one particular vessel.
 The press of canvas she carried made her loom up high, end-on, like
 a gray column standing motionless directly in our wake.
 
 "Look at this fellow, Dominic," I said.  "He seems to be in a
 hurry."
 
 The Padrone made no remark, but, wrapping his black cloak close
 about him, stood up to look.  His weather-tanned face, framed in
 the hood, had an aspect of authority and challenging force, with
 the deep-set eyes gazing far away fixedly, without a wink, like the
 intent, merciless, steady eyes of a sea-bird.
 
 "Chi va piano va sano," he remarked at last, with a derisive glance
 over the side, in ironic allusion to our own tremendous speed.
 
 The Tremolino was doing her best, and seemed to hardly touch the
 great burst of foam over which she darted.  I crouched down again
 to get some shelter from the low bulwark.  After more than half an
 hour of swaying immobility expressing a concentrated, breathless
 watchfulness, Dominic sank on the deck by my side.  Within the
 monkish cowl his eyes gleamed with a fierce expression which
 surprised me.  All he said was:
 
 "He has come out here to wash the new paint off his yards, I
 suppose."
 
 "What?" I shouted, getting up on my knees.  "Is she the
--**--**--
 only to reappear again, nearly black, resembling a post stuck
 upright against the slaty background of solid cloud.  Since first
 noticed she had not gained on us a foot.
 
 "She will never catch the Tremolino," I said exultingly.
 
 Dominic did not look at me.  He remarked absently, but justly, that
 the heavy weather was in our pursuer's favour.  She was three times
 our size.  What we had to do was to keep our distance till dark,
 which we could manage easily, and then haul off to seaward and
 consider the situation.  But his thoughts seemed to stumble in the
 darkness of some not-solved enigma, and soon he fell silent.  We
 ran steadily, wing-and-wing.  Cape San Sebastian nearly ahead
 seemed to recede from us in the squalls of rain, and come out again
 to meet our rush, every time more distinct between the showers.
 
 For my part I was by no means certain that this gabelou (as our men
 alluded to her opprobriously) was after us at all.  There were
 nautical difficulties in such a view which made me express the
 sanguine opinion that she was in all innocence simply changing her
 station.  At this Dominic condescended to turn his head.
 
 "I tell you she is in chase," he affirmed moodily, after one short
 glance astern.
 
 I never doubted his opinion.  But with all the ardour of a neophyte
 and the pride of an apt learner I was at that time a great nautical
 casuist.
 
 "What I can't understand," I insisted subtly, "is how on earth,
 with this wind, she has managed to be just where she was when we
 first made her out.  It is clear that she could not, and did not,
 gain twelve miles on us during the night.  And there are other
 impossibilities. . . ."
--**--**--
 small, with affected voices and stiff gestures, like a procession
 of rigid marionettes upon a toy stage.  I gave a start.  What was
 this?  A mysterious, remorseless whisper came from within the
 motionless black hood at my side.
 
 "Il faul la tuer."
 
 I heard it very well.
 
 "What do you say, Dominic?" I asked, moving nothing but my lips.
 
 And the whisper within the hood repeated mysteriously, "She must be
 killed."
 
 My heart began to beat violently.
 
 "That's it," I faltered out.  "But how?"
 
 "You love her well?"
 
 "I do."
 
 "Then you must find the heart for that work too.  You must steer
 her yourself, and I shall see to it that she dies quickly, without
 leaving as much as a chip behind."
 
 "Can you?" I murmured, fascinated by the black hood turned
 immovably over the stern, as if in unlawful communion with that old
 sea of magicians, slave-dealers, exiles and warriors, the sea of
 legends and terrors, where the mariners of remote antiquity used to
 hear the restless shade of an old wanderer weep aloud in the dark.
 
 "I know a rock," whispered the initiated voice within the hood
 secretly.  "But--caution!  It must be done before our men perceive
 what we are about.  Whom can we trust now?  A knife drawn across
 the fore halyards would bring the foresail down, and put an end to
 our liberty in twenty minutes.  And the best of our men may be
 afraid of drowning.  There is our little boat, but in an affair
 like this no one can be sure of being saved."
 
 The voice ceased.  We had started from Barcelona with our dinghy in
 tow; afterwards it was too risky to try to get her in, so we let
 her take her chance of the seas at the end of a comfortable scope
--**--**--
 broken open and the money-belt gone.  Last evening it was still
 there.
 
 "What did you want to do with it?" he asked me, trembling
 violently.
 
 "Put it round my waist, of course," I answered, amazed to hear his
 teeth chattering.
 
 "Cursed gold!" he muttered.  "The weight of the money might have
 cost you your life, perhaps."  He shuddered.  "There is no time to
 talk about that now."
 
 "I am ready."
 
 "Not yet.  I am waiting for that squall to come over," he muttered.
 And a few leaden minutes passed.
 
 The squall came over at last.  Our pursuer, overtaken by a sort of
 murky whirlwind, disappeared from our sight.  The Tremolino
 quivered and bounded forward.  The land ahead vanished, too, and we
 seemed to be left alone in a world of water and wind.
 
 "Prenez la barre, monsieur," Dominic broke the silence suddenly in
 an austere voice.  "Take hold of the tiller."  He bent his hood to
 my ear.  "The balancelle is yours.  Your own hands must deal the
 blow.  I--I have yet another piece of work to do."  He spoke up
 loudly to the man who steered.  "Let the signorino take the tiller,
 and you with the others stand by to haul the boat alongside quickly
 at the word."
 
 The man obeyed, surprised, but silent.  The others stirred, and
 pricked up their ears at this.  I heard their murmurs.  "What now?
 Are we going to run in somewhere and take to our heels?  The
 Padrone knows what he is doing."
 
 Dominic went forward.  He paused to look down at Cesar, who, as I
 have said before, was lying full length face down by the foremast,
 then stepped over him, and dived out of my sight under the
 foresail.  I saw nothing ahead.  It was impossible for me to see
--**--**--
 We landed in a familiar part of the country.  Dominic took one of
 the boat's oars with him.  I suppose he was thinking of the stream
 we would have presently to cross, on which there was a miserable
 specimen of a punt, often robbed of its pole.  But first of all we
 had to ascend the ridge of land at the back of the Cape.  He helped
 me up.  I was dizzy.  My head felt very large and heavy.  At the
 top of the ascent I clung to him, and we stopped to rest.
 
 To the right, below us, the wide, smoky bay was empty.  Dominic had
 kept his word.  There was not a chip to be seen around the black
 rock from which the Tremolino, with her plucky heart crushed at one
 blow, had slipped off into deep water to her eternal rest.  The
 vastness of the open sea was smothered in driving mists, and in the
 centre of the thinning squall, phantom-like, under a frightful
 press of canvas, the unconscious guardacosta dashed on, still
 chasing to the northward.  Our men were already descending the
 reverse slope to look for that punt which we knew from experience
 was not always to be found easily.  I looked after them with dazed,
 misty eyes.  One, two, three, four.
 
 "Dominic, where's Cesar?" I cried.
 
 As if repulsing the very sound of the name, the Padrone made that
 ample, sweeping, knocking-down gesture.  I stepped back a pace and
 stared at him fearfully.  His open shirt uncovered his muscular
 neck and the thick hair on his chest.  He planted the oar upright
 in the soft soil, and rolling up slowly his right sleeve, extended
 the bare arm before my face.
 
 "This," he began, with an extreme deliberation, whose superhuman
 restraint vibrated with the suppressed violence of his feelings,
--**--**--
 side by side in the twilight of an arid land, the unfortunate
 possessors of the secret lore of the sea, bearing the emblem of
 their hard calling on their shoulders, surrounded by silent and
 curious men:  even as I, too, having turned my back upon the sea,
 am bearing those few pages in the twilight, with the hope of
 finding in an inland valley the silent welcome of some patient
 listener.
 
 
 
 XLVI.
 
 
 
 "A fellow has now no chance of promotion unless he jumps into the
 muzzle of a gun and crawls out of the touch-hole."
 
 He who, a hundred years ago, more or less, pronounced the above
 words in the uneasiness of his heart, thirsting for professional
 distinction, was a young naval officer.  Of his life, career,
 achievements, and end nothing is preserved for the edification of
 his young successors in the fleet of to-day--nothing but this
 phrase, which, sailor-like in the simplicity of personal sentiment
 and strength of graphic expression, embodies the spirit of the
 epoch.  This obscure but vigorous testimony has its price, its
 significance, and its lesson.  It comes to us from a worthy
 ancestor.  We do not know whether he lived long enough for a chance
 of that promotion whose way was so arduous.  He belongs to the
 great array of the unknown--who are great, indeed, by the sum total
 of the devoted effort put out, and the colossal scale of success
 attained by their insatiable and steadfast ambition.  We do not
 know his name; we only know of him what is material for us to know-
 -that he was never backward on occasions of desperate service.  We
 have this on the authority of a distinguished seaman of Nelson's
 time.  Departing this life as Admiral of the Fleet on the eve of
 the Crimean War, Sir Thomas Byam Martin has recorded for us amongst
--**--**--
 an insatiable desire--he loved her with a masterful devotion and an
 infinite trustfulness.  In the plenitude of his passion he was an
 exacting lover.  And she never betrayed the greatness of his trust!
 She attended him to the end of his life, and he died pressing her
 last gift (nineteen prizes) to his heart.  "Anchor, Hardy--anchor!"
 was as much the cry of an ardent lover as of a consummate seaman.
 Thus he would hug to his breast the last gift of Fame.
 
 It was this ardour which made him great.  He was a flaming example
 to the wooers of glorious fortune.  There have been great officers
 before--Lord Hood, for instance, whom he himself regarded as the
 greatest sea officer England ever had.  A long succession of great
 commanders opened the sea to the vast range of Nelson's genius.
 His time had come; and, after the great sea officers, the great
 naval tradition passed into the keeping of a great man.  Not the
 least glory of the navy is that it understood Nelson.  Lord Hood
 trusted him.  Admiral Keith told him:  "We can't spare you either
 as Captain or Admiral."  Earl St. Vincent put into his hands,
 untrammelled by orders, a division of his fleet, and Sir Hyde
 Parker gave him two more ships at Copenhagen than he had asked for.
 So much for the chiefs; the rest of the navy surrendered to him
 their devoted affection, trust, and admiration.  In return he gave
 them no less than his own exalted soul.  He breathed into them his
 own ardour and his own ambition.  In a few short years he
 revolutionized, not the strategy or tactics of sea-warfare, but the
 very conception of victory itself.  And this is genius.  In that
 alone, through the fidelity of his fortune and the power of his
--**--**--
 as if about to go out suddenly, stricken to death by the touch of that
 gloom brooding over a crowd of men.
 
 Forthwith a change came over the waters, and the serenity became less
 brilliant but more profound. The old river in its broad reach rested
 unruffled at the decline of day, after ages of good service done to the
 race that peopled its banks, spread out in the tranquil dignity of a
 waterway leading to the uttermost ends of the earth. We looked at the
 venerable stream not in the vivid flush of a short day that comes and
 departs for ever, but in the august light of abiding memories. And
 indeed nothing is easier for a man who has, as the phrase goes,
 "followed the sea" with reverence and affection, than to evoke the
 great spirit of the past upon the lower reaches of the Thames. The tidal
 current runs to and fro in its unceasing service, crowded with memories
 of men and ships it had borne to the rest of home or to the battles
 of the sea. It had known and served all the men of whom the nation is
 proud, from Sir Francis Drake to Sir John Franklin, knights all, titled
 and untitled--the great knights-errant of the sea. It had borne all the
 ships whose names are like jewels flashing in the night of time, from
 the Golden Hind returning with her round flanks full of treasure, to be
 visited by the Queen's Highness and thus pass out of the gigantic tale,
 to the Erebus and Terror, bound on other conquests--and that never
 returned. It had known the ships and the men. They had sailed from
 Deptford, from Greenwich, from Erith--the adventurers and the settlers;
 kings' ships and the ships of men on 'Change; captains, admirals, the
--**--**--
 shell of a cracked nut. But Marlow was not typical (if his propensity
 to spin yarns be excepted), and to him the meaning of an episode was not
 inside like a kernel but outside, enveloping the tale which brought it
 out only as a glow brings out a haze, in the likeness of one of these
 misty halos that sometimes are made visible by the spectral illumination
 of moonshine.
 
 His remark did not seem at all surprising. It was just like Marlow.
 It was accepted in silence. No one took the trouble to grunt even; and
 presently he said, very slow--
 
 "I was thinking of very old times, when the Romans first came here,
 nineteen hundred years ago--the other day. . . . Light came out of this
 river since--you say Knights? Yes; but it is like a running blaze on
 a plain, like a flash of lightning in the clouds. We live in the
 flicker--may it last as long as the old earth keeps rolling! But
 darkness was here yesterday. Imagine the feelings of a commander of
 a fine--what d'ye call 'em?--trireme in the Mediterranean, ordered
 suddenly to the north; run overland across the Gauls in a hurry; put in
 charge of one of these craft the legionaries,--a wonderful lot of handy
 men they must have been too--used to build, apparently by the hundred,
 in a month or two, if we may believe what we read. Imagine him here--the
 very end of the world, a sea the color of lead, a sky the color of
 smoke, a kind of ship about as rigid as a concertina--and going up this
 river with stores, or orders, or what you like. Sandbanks, marshes,
 forests, savages,--precious little to eat fit for a civilized man,
 nothing but Thames water to drink. No Falernian wine here, no going
--**--**--
 be got. It was just robbery with violence, aggravated murder on a great
 scale, and men going at it blind--as is very proper for those who tackle
 a darkness. The conquest of the earth, which mostly means the taking
 it away from those who have a different complexion or slightly flatter
 noses than ourselves, is not a pretty thing when you look into it too
 much. What redeems it is the idea only. An idea at the back of it; not
 a sentimental pretense but an idea; and an unselfish belief in the
 idea--something you can set up, and bow down before, and offer a
 sacrifice to. . . ."
 
 He broke off. Flames glided in the river, small green flames, red
 flames, white flames, pursuing, overtaking, joining, crossing each
 other--then separating slowly or hastily. The traffic of the great city
 went on in the deepening night upon the sleepless river. We looked on,
 waiting patiently--there was nothing else to do till the end of
 the flood; but it was only after a long silence, when he said, in
 a hesitating voice, "I suppose you fellows remember I did once turn
 fresh-water sailor for a bit," that we knew we were fated, before
 the ebb began to run, to hear about one of Marlow's inconclusive
 experiences.
 
 "I don't want to bother you much with what happened to me personally,"
 he began, showing in this remark the weakness of many tellers of tales
 who seem so often unaware of what their audience would best like to
 hear; "yet to understand the effect of it on me you ought to know how I
 got out there, what I saw, how I went up that river to the place where I
 first met the poor chap. It was the farthest point of navigation and the
--**--**--
 since my boyhood with rivers and lakes and names. It had ceased to be
 a blank space of delightful mystery--a white patch for a boy to dream
 gloriously over. It had become a place of darkness. But there was in it
 one river especially, a mighty big river, that you could see on the map,
 resembling an immense snake uncoiled, with its head in the sea, its
 body at rest curving afar over a vast country, and its tail lost in the
 depths of the land. And as I looked at the map of it in a shop-window,
 it fascinated me as a snake would a bird--a silly little bird. Then I
 remembered there was a big concern, a Company for trade on that river.
 Dash it all! I thought to myself, they can't trade without using some
 kind of craft on that lot of fresh water--steamboats! Why shouldn't I
 try to get charge of one? I went on along Fleet Street, but could not
 shake off the idea. The snake had charmed me.
 
 "You understand it was a Continental concern, that Trading society; but
 I have a lot of relations living on the Continent, because it's cheap
 and not so nasty as it looks, they say.
 
 "I am sorry to own I began to worry them. This was already a fresh
 departure for me. I was not used to get things that way, you know. I
 always went my own road and on my own legs where I had a mind to go. I
 wouldn't have believed it of myself; but, then--you see--I felt somehow
 I must get there by hook or by crook. So I worried them. The men said
 'My dear fellow,' and did nothing. Then--would you believe it?--I tried
 the women. I, Charlie Marlow, set the women to work--to get a job.
--**--**--
 finding the Company's offices. It was the biggest thing in the town,
 and everybody I met was full of it. They were going to run an over-sea
 empire, and make no end of coin by trade.
 
 "A narrow and deserted street in deep shadow, high houses, innumerable
 windows with venetian blinds, a dead silence, grass sprouting between
 the stones, imposing carriage archways right and left, immense double
 doors standing ponderously ajar. I slipped through one of these cracks,
 went up a swept and ungarnished staircase, as arid as a desert, and
 opened the first door I came to. Two women, one fat and the other slim,
 sat on straw-bottomed chairs, knitting black wool. The slim one got up
 and walked straight at me--still knitting with downcast eyes--and only
 just as I began to think of getting out of her way, as you would for a
 somnambulist, stood still, and looked up. Her dress was as plain as an
 umbrella-cover, and she turned round without a word and preceded me
 into a waiting-room. I gave my name, and looked about. Deal table in
 the middle, plain chairs all round the walls, on one end a large shining
 map, marked with all the colors of a rainbow. There was a vast amount of
 red--good to see at any time, because one knows that some real work
 is done in there, a deuce of a lot of blue, a little green, smears of
 orange, and, on the East Coast, a purple patch, to show where the jolly
 pioneers of progress drink the jolly lager-beer. However, I wasn't going
 into any of these. I was going into the yellow. Dead in the center. And
 the river was there--fascinating--deadly--like a snake. Ough! A door
 opened, a white-haired secretarial head, but wearing a compassionate
 expression, appeared, and a skinny forefinger beckoned me into the
--**--**--
 over me. She seemed uncanny and fateful. Often far away there I thought
 of these two, guarding the door of Darkness, knitting black wool as for
 a warm pall, one introducing, introducing continuously to the unknown,
 the other scrutinizing the cheery and foolish faces with unconcerned old
 eyes. Ave! Old knitter of black wool. Morituri te salutant. Not many of
 those she looked at ever saw her again--not half, by a long way.
 
 "There was yet a visit to the doctor. 'A simple formality,' assured me
 the secretary, with an air of taking an immense part in all my sorrows.
 Accordingly a young chap wearing his hat over the left eyebrow, some
 clerk I suppose,--there must have been clerks in the business, though
 the house was as still as a house in a city of the dead,--came from
 somewhere up-stairs, and led me forth. He was shabby and careless, with
 ink-stains on the sleeves of his jacket, and his cravat was large and
 billowy, under a chin shaped like the toe of an old boot. It was a
 little too early for the doctor, so I proposed a drink, and thereupon he
 developed a vein of joviality. As we sat over our vermouths he glorified
 the Company's business, and by-and-by I expressed casually my surprise
 at him not going out there. He became very cool and collected all at
 once. 'I am not such a fool as I look, quoth Plato to his disciples,'
 he said sententiously, emptied his glass with great resolution, and we
 rose.
 
 "The old doctor felt my pulse, evidently thinking of something else
 the while. 'Good, good for there,' he mumbled, and then with a certain
 eagerness asked me whether I would let him measure my head. Rather
 surprised, I said Yes, when he produced a thing like calipers and got
--**--**--
 live in a world of their own, and there had never been anything like it,
 and never can be. It is too beautiful altogether, and if they were to
 set it up it would go to pieces before the first sunset. Some confounded
 fact we men have been living contentedly with ever since the day of
 creation would start up and knock the whole thing over.
 
 "After this I got embraced, told to wear flannel, be sure to write
 often, and so on--and I left. In the street--I don't know why--a queer
 feeling came to me that I was an impostor. Odd thing that I, who used to
 clear out for any part of the world at twenty-four hours' notice, with
 less thought than most men give to the crossing of a street, had a
 moment--I won't say of hesitation, but of startled pause, before this
 commonplace affair. The best way I can explain it to you is by saying
 that, for a second or two, I felt as though, instead of going to the
 center of a continent, I were about to set off for the center of the
 earth.
 
 "I left in a French steamer, and she called in every blamed port they
 have out there, for, as far as I could see, the sole purpose of landing
 soldiers and custom-house officers. I watched the coast. Watching a
 coast as it slips by the ship is like thinking about an enigma. There
 it is before you--smiling, frowning, inviting, grand, mean, insipid, or
 savage, and always mute with an air of whispering, 'Come and find out.'
 This one was almost featureless, as if still in the making, with
 an aspect of monotonous grimness. The edge of a colossal jungle, so
 dark-green as to be almost black, fringed with white surf, ran straight,
--**--**--
 earnestly there was a camp of natives--he called them enemies!--hidden
 out of sight somewhere.
 
 "We gave her her letters (I heard the men in that lonely ship were dying
 of fever at the rate of three a day) and went on. We called at some more
 places with farcical names, where the merry dance of death and trade
 goes on in a still and earthy atmosphere as of an overheated catacomb;
 all along the formless coast bordered by dangerous surf, as if Nature
 herself had tried to ward off intruders; in and out of rivers, streams
 of death in life, whose banks were rotting into mud, whose waters,
 thickened into slime, invaded the contorted mangroves, that seemed to
 writhe at us in the extremity of an impotent despair. Nowhere did we
 stop long enough to get a particularized impression, but the general
 sense of vague and oppressive wonder grew upon me. It was like a weary
 pilgrimage amongst hints for nightmares.
 
 "It was upward of thirty days before I saw the mouth of the big river.
 We anchored off the seat of the government. But my work would not begin
 till some two hundred miles farther on. So as soon as I could I made a
 start for a place thirty miles higher up.
 
 "I had my passage on a little sea-going steamer. Her captain was a
 Swede, and knowing me for a seaman, invited me on the bridge. He was a
 young man, lean, fair, and morose, with lanky hair and a shuffling gait.
 As we left the miserable little wharf, he tossed his head contemptuously
 at the shore. 'Been living there?' he asked. I said, 'Yes.' 'Fine lot
 these government chaps--are they not?' he went on, speaking English
 with great precision and considerable bitterness. 'It is funny what some
--**--**--
 he could not tell who I might be. He was speedily reassured, and with a
 large, white, rascally grin, and a glance at his charge, seemed to take
 me into partnership in his exalted trust. After all, I also was a part
 of the great cause of these high and just proceedings.
 
 "Instead of going up, I turned and descended to the left. My idea was to
 let that chain-gang get out of sight before I climbed the hill. You know
 I am not particularly tender; I've had to strike and to fend off.
 I've had to resist and to attack sometimes--that's only one way of
 resisting--without counting the exact cost, according to the demands
 of such sort of life as I had blundered into. I've seen the devil of
 violence, and the devil of greed, and the devil of hot desire; but, by
 all the stars! these were strong, lusty, red-eyed devils, that swayed
 and drove men--men, I tell you. But as I stood on this hillside, I
 foresaw that in the blinding sunshine of that land I would become
 acquainted with a flabby, pretending, weak-eyed devil of a rapacious and
 pitiless folly. How insidious he could be, too, I was only to find out
 several months later and a thousand miles farther. For a moment I
 stood appalled, as though by a warning. Finally I descended the hill,
 obliquely, towards the trees I had seen.
 
 "I avoided a vast artificial hole somebody had been digging on the
 slope, the purpose of which I found it impossible to divine. It wasn't
 a quarry or a sandpit, anyhow. It was just a hole. It might have
 been connected with the philanthropic desire of giving the criminals
 something to do. I don't know. Then I nearly fell into a very narrow
--**--**--
 glancing down, I saw a face near my hand. The black bones reclined at
 full length with one shoulder against the tree, and slowly the eyelids
 rose and the sunken eyes looked up at me, enormous and vacant, a kind of
 blind, white flicker in the depths of the orbs, which died out slowly.
 The man seemed young--almost a boy--but you know with them it's hard to
 tell. I found nothing else to do but to offer him one of my good Swede's
 ship's biscuits I had in my pocket. The fingers closed slowly on it and
 held--there was no other movement and no other glance. He had tied a
 bit of white worsted round his neck--Why? Where did he get it? Was it a
 badge--an ornament--a charm--a propitiatory act? Was there any idea at
 all connected with it? It looked startling round his black neck, this
 bit of white thread from beyond the seas.
 
 "Near the same tree two more bundles of acute angles sat with their legs
 drawn up. One, with his chin propped on his knees, stared at nothing,
 in an intolerable and appalling manner: his brother phantom rested its
 forehead, as if overcome with a great weariness; and all about others
 were scattered in every pose of contorted collapse, as in some picture
 of a massacre or a pestilence. While I stood horror-struck, one of these
 creatures rose to his hands and knees, and went off on all-fours towards
 the river to drink. He lapped out of his hand, then sat up in the
 sunlight, crossing his shins in front of him, and after a time let his
 woolly head fall on his breastbone.
 
 "I didn't want any more loitering in the shade, and I made haste towards
 the station. When near the buildings I met a white man, in such an
--**--**--
 true ivory-country, at 'the very bottom of there. Sends in as much ivory
 as all the others put together. . . .' He began to write again. The sick
 man was too ill to groan. The flies buzzed in a great peace.
 
 "Suddenly there was a growing murmur of voices and a great tramping of
 feet. A caravan had come in. A violent babble of uncouth sounds burst
 out on the other side of the planks. All the carriers were speaking
 together, and in the midst of the uproar the lamentable voice of the
 chief agent was heard 'giving it up' tearfully for the twentieth time
 that day. . . . He rose slowly. 'What a frightful row,' he said. He
 crossed the room gently to look at the sick man, and returning, said to
 me, 'He does not hear.' 'What! Dead?' I asked, startled. 'No, not yet,'
 he answered, with great composure. Then, alluding with a toss of the
 head to the tumult in the station-yard, 'When one has got to make
 correct entries, one comes to hate those savages--hate them to the
 death.' He remained thoughtful for a moment. 'When you see Mr. Kurtz,'
 he went on, 'tell him from me that everything here'--he glanced at the
 desk--'is very satisfactory. I don't like to write to him--with those
 messengers of ours you never know who may get hold of your letter--at
 that Central Station.' He stared at me for a moment with his mild,
 bulging eyes. 'Oh, he will go far, very far,' he began again. 'He
 will be a somebody in the Administration before long. They, above--the
 Council in Europe, you know--mean him to be.'
 
 "He turned to his work. The noise outside had ceased, and presently
 in going out I stopped at the door. In the steady buzz of flies the
--**--**--
 a hammock slung under a pole. As he weighed sixteen stone I had no end
 of rows with the carriers. They jibbed, ran away, sneaked off with their
 loads in the night--quite a mutiny. So, one evening, I made a speech in
 English with gestures, not one of which was lost to the sixty pairs of
 eyes before me, and the next morning I started the hammock off in front
 all right. An hour afterwards I came upon the whole concern wrecked in
 a bush--man, hammock, groans, blankets, horrors. The heavy pole had
 skinned his poor nose. He was very anxious for me to kill somebody,
 but there wasn't the shadow of a carrier near. I remembered the old
 doctor,--'It would be interesting for science to watch the mental
 changes of individuals, on the spot.' I felt I was becoming
 scientifically interesting. However, all that is to no purpose. On the
 fifteenth day I came in sight of the big river again, and hobbled into
 the Central Station. It was on a back water surrounded by scrub and
 forest, with a pretty border of smelly mud on one side, and on the three
 others inclosed by a crazy fence of rushes. A neglected gap was all the
 gate it had, and the first glance at the place was enough to let you see
 the flabby devil was running that show. White men with long staves in
 their hands appeared languidly from amongst the buildings, strolling up
 to take a look at me, and then retired out of sight somewhere. One of
 them, a stout, excitable chap with black mustaches, informed me with
 great volubility and many digressions, as soon as I told him who I was,
 that my steamer was at the bottom of the river. I was thunderstruck.
--**--**--
 station, he was heard to say, 'Men who come out here should have no
 entrails.' He sealed the utterance with that smile of his, as though
 it had been a door opening into a darkness he had in his keeping.
 You fancied you had seen things--but the seal was on. When annoyed at
 meal-times by the constant quarrels of the white men about precedence,
 he ordered an immense round table to be made, for which a special house
 had to be built. This was the station's mess-room. Where he sat was the
 first place--the rest were nowhere. One felt this to be his unalterable
 conviction. He was neither civil nor uncivil. He was quiet. He allowed
 his 'boy'--an overfed young negro from the coast--to treat the white
 men, under his very eyes, with provoking insolence.
 
 "He began to speak as soon as he saw me. I had been very long on the
 road. He could not wait. Had to start without me. The up-river stations
 had to be relieved. There had been so many delays already that he did
 not know who was dead and who was alive, and how they got on--and so on,
 and so on. He paid no attention to my explanations, and, playing with
 a stick of sealing-wax, repeated several times that the situation
 was 'very grave, very grave.' There were rumors that a very important
 station was in jeopardy, and its chief, Mr. Kurtz, was ill. Hoped it was
 not true. Mr. Kurtz was . . . I felt weary and irritable. Hang Kurtz,
 I thought. I interrupted him by saying I had heard of Mr. Kurtz on the
 coast. 'Ah! So they talk of him down there,' he murmured to himself.
 Then he began again, assuring me Mr. Kurtz was the best agent he had, an
--**--**--
 my life. And outside, the silent wilderness surrounding this cleared
 speck on the earth struck me as something great and invincible, like
 evil or truth, waiting patiently for the passing away of this fantastic
 invasion.
 
 "Oh, these months! Well, never mind. Various things happened. One
 evening a grass shed full of calico, cotton prints, beads, and I don't
 know what else, burst into a blaze so suddenly that you would have
 thought the earth had opened to let an avenging fire consume all that
 trash. I was smoking my pipe quietly by my dismantled steamer, and saw
 them all cutting capers in the light, with their arms lifted high, when
 the stout man with mustaches came tearing down to the river, a tin
 pail in his hand, assured me that everybody was 'behaving splendidly,
 splendidly,' dipped about a quart of water and tore back again. I
 noticed there was a hole in the bottom of his pail.
 
 "I strolled up. There was no hurry. You see the thing had gone off like
 a box of matches. It had been hopeless from the very first. The flame
 had leaped high, driven everybody back, lighted up everything--and
 collapsed. The shed was already a heap of embers glowing fiercely. A
 nigger was being beaten near by. They said he had caused the fire in
 some way; be that as it may, he was screeching most horribly. I saw him,
 later on, for several days, sitting in a bit of shade looking very sick
 and trying to recover himself: afterwards he arose and went out--and
 the wilderness without a sound took him into its bosom again. As I
 approached the glow from the dark I found myself at the back of two men,
 talking. I heard the name of Kurtz pronounced, then the words, 'take
--**--**--
 kick.
 
 "I had no idea why he wanted to be sociable, but as we chatted in there
 it suddenly occurred to me the fellow was trying to get at something--in
 fact, pumping me. He alluded constantly to Europe, to the people I was
 supposed to know there--putting leading questions as to my acquaintances
 in the sepulchral city, and so on. His little eyes glittered like
 mica discs--with curiosity,--though he tried to keep up a bit of
 superciliousness. At first I was astonished, but very soon I became
 awfully curious to see what he would find out from me. I couldn't
 possibly imagine what I had in me to make it worth his while. It was
 very pretty to see how he baffled himself, for in truth my body was full
 of chills, and my head had nothing in it but that wretched steamboat
 business. It was evident he took me for a perfectly shameless
 prevaricator. At last he got angry, and to conceal a movement of furious
 annoyance, he yawned. I rose. Then I noticed a small sketch in oils,
 on a panel, representing a woman, draped and blindfolded, carrying a
 lighted torch. The background was somber--almost black. The movement of
 the woman was stately, and the effect of the torchlight on the face was
 sinister.
 
 "It arrested me, and he stood by civilly, holding a half-pint champagne
 bottle (medical comforts) with the candle stuck in it. To my question he
 said Mr. Kurtz had painted this--in this very station more than a year
 ago--while waiting for means to go to his trading-post. 'Tell me, pray,'
 said I, 'who is this Mr. Kurtz?'
 
 "'The chief of the Inner Station,' he answered in a short tone, looking
 away. 'Much obliged,' I said, laughing. 'And you are the brickmaker of
 the Central Station. Everyone knows that.' He was silent for a while.
--**--**--
 the other followed me. I heard a scathing murmur at my ear, 'Heap
 of muffs--go to.' The pilgrims could be seen in knots gesticulating,
 discussing. Several had still their staves in their hands. I verily
 believe they took these sticks to bed with them. Beyond the fence the
 forest stood up spectrally in the moonlight, and through the dim stir,
 through the faint sounds of that lamentable courtyard, the silence of
 the land went home to one's very heart,--its mystery, its greatness,
 the amazing reality of its concealed life. The hurt nigger moaned feebly
 somewhere near by, and then fetched a deep sigh that made me mend my
 pace away from there. I felt a hand introducing itself under my arm.
 'My dear sir,' said the fellow, 'I don't want to be misunderstood, and
 especially by you, who will see Mr. Kurtz long before I can have that
 pleasure. I wouldn't like him to get a false idea of my
 disposition. . . .'
 
 
 "I let him run on, this _papier-mache_ Mephistopheles, and it seemed to
 me that if I tried I could poke my forefinger through him, and would find
 nothing inside but a little loose dirt, maybe. He, don't you see, had
 been planning to be assistant-manager by-and-by under the present man,
 and I could see that the coming of that Kurtz had upset them both not a
 little. He talked precipitately, and I did not try to stop him. I had my
 shoulders against the wreck of my steamer, hauled up on the slope like a
 carcass of some big river animal. The smell of mud, of primeval mud,
 by Jove! was in my nostrils, the high stillness of primeval forest was
 before my eyes; there were shiny patches on the black creek. The moon
 had spread over everything a thin layer of silver--over the rank grass,
--**--**--
 
 It had become so pitch dark that we listeners could hardly see one
 another. For a long time already he, sitting apart, had been no more
 to us than a voice. There was not a word from anybody. The others might
 have been asleep, but I was awake. I listened, I listened on the watch
 for the sentence, for the word, that would give me the clew to the
 faint uneasiness inspired by this narrative that seemed to shape itself
 without human lips in the heavy night-air of the river.
 
 ". . . Yes--I let him run on," Marlow began again, "and think what
 he pleased about the powers that were behind me. I did! And there was
 nothing behind me! There was nothing but that wretched, old, mangled
 steamboat I was leaning against, while he talked fluently about 'the
 necessity for every man to get on.' 'And when one comes out here, you
 conceive, it is not to gaze at the moon.' Mr. Kurtz was a 'universal
 genius,' but even a genius would find it easier to work with 'adequate
 tools--intelligent men.' He did not make bricks--why, there was a
 physical impossibility in the way--as I was well aware; and if he
 did secretarial work for the manager, it was because 'no sensible man
 rejects wantonly the confidence of his superiors.' Did I see it? I saw
 it. What more did I want? What I really wanted was rivets, by heaven!
 Rivets. To get on with the work--to stop the hole. Rivets I
 wanted. There were cases of them down at the coast--cases--piled
 up--burst--split! You kicked a loose rivet at every second step in that
 station yard on the hillside. Rivets had rolled into the grove of death.
 You could fill your pockets with rivets for the trouble of stooping
--**--**--
 his legs dangling over the mud. You see I rather chummed with the few
 mechanics there were in that station, whom the other pilgrims naturally
 despised--on account of their imperfect manners, I suppose. This was the
 foreman--a boiler-maker by trade--a good worker. He was a lank, bony,
 yellow-faced man, with big intense eyes. His aspect was worried, and his
 head was as bald as the palm of my hand; but his hair in falling seemed
 to have stuck to his chin, and had prospered in the new locality,
 for his beard hung down to his waist. He was a widower with six young
 children (he had left them in charge of a sister of his to come out
 there), and the passion of his life was pigeon-flying. He was an
 enthusiast and a connoisseur. He would rave about pigeons. After work
 hours he used sometimes to come over from his hut for a talk about his
 children and his pigeons; at work, when he had to crawl in the mud under
 the bottom of the steamboat, he would tie up that beard of his in a kind
 of white serviette he brought for the purpose. It had loops to go over
 his ears. In the evening he could be seen squatted on the bank rinsing
 that wrapper in the creek with great care, then spreading it solemnly on
 a bush to dry.
 
 "I slapped him on the back and shouted, 'We shall have rivets!' He
 scrambled to his feet exclaiming 'No! Rivets!' as though he couldn't
 believe his ears. Then in a low voice, 'You . . . eh?' I don't know why
 we behaved like lunatics. I put my finger to the side of my nose and
 nodded mysteriously. 'Good for you!' he cried, snapped his fingers above
--**--**--
 would think, they were lugging, after a raid, into the wilderness for
 equitable division. It was an inextricable mess of things decent in
 themselves but that human folly made look like the spoils of thieving.
 
 "This devoted band called itself the Eldorado Exploring Expedition, and
 I believe they were sworn to secrecy. Their talk, however, was the talk
 of sordid buccaneers: it was reckless without hardihood, greedy without
 audacity, and cruel without courage; there was not an atom of foresight
 or of serious intention in the whole batch of them, and they did not
 seem aware these things are wanted for the work of the world. To tear
 treasure out of the bowels of the land was their desire, with no more
 moral purpose at the back of it than there is in burglars breaking into
 a safe. Who paid the expenses of the noble enterprise I don't know; but
 the uncle of our manager was leader of that lot.
 
 "In exterior he resembled a butcher in a poor neighborhood, and his eyes
 had a look of sleepy cunning. He carried his fat paunch with ostentation
 on his short legs, and during the time his gang infested the station
 spoke to no one but his nephew. You could see these two roaming about
 all day long with their heads close together in an everlasting confab.
 
 "I had given up worrying myself about the rivets. One's capacity for
 that kind of folly is more limited than you would suppose. I said
 Hang!--and let things slide. I had plenty of time for meditation,
 and now and then I would give some thought to Kurtz. I wasn't very
 interested in him. No. Still, I was curious to see whether this man, who
 had come out equipped with moral ideas of some sort, would climb to the
--**--**--
 alone than have the kind of men you can dispose of with me." It was more
 than a year ago. Can you imagine such impudence!' 'Anything since
 then?' asked the other, hoarsely. 'Ivory,' jerked the nephew; 'lots
 of it--prime sort--lots--most annoying, from him.' 'And with that?'
 questioned the heavy rumble. 'Invoice,' was the reply fired out, so to
 speak. Then silence. They had been talking about Kurtz.
 
 "I was broad awake by this time, but, lying perfectly at ease, remained
 still, having no inducement to change my position. 'How did that ivory
 come all this way?' growled the elder man, who seemed very vexed. The
 other explained that it had come with a fleet of canoes in charge of an
 English half-caste clerk Kurtz had with him; that Kurtz had apparently
 intended to return himself, the station being by that time bare of goods
 and stores, but after coming three hundred miles, had suddenly decided
 to go back, which he started to do alone in a small dug-out with four
 paddlers, leaving the half-caste to continue down the river with the
 ivory. The two fellows there seemed astounded at anybody attempting such
 a thing. They were at a loss for an adequate motive. As to me, I seemed
 to see Kurtz for the first time. It was a distinct glimpse: the dug-out,
 four paddling savages, and the lone white man turning his back suddenly
 on the headquarters, on relief, on thoughts of home--perhaps; setting
 his face towards the depths of the wilderness, towards his empty and
 desolate station. I did not know the motive. Perhaps he was just simply
 a fine fellow who stuck to his work for its own sake. His name, you
 understand, had not been pronounced once. He was 'that man.' The
 half-caste, who, as far as I could see, had conducted a difficult
--**--**--
 river,--seemed to beckon with a dishonoring flourish before the sunlit
 face of the land a treacherous appeal to the lurking death, to the
 hidden evil, to the profound darkness of its heart. It was so startling
 that I leaped to my feet and looked back at the edge of the forest, as
 though I had expected an answer of some sort to that black display of
 confidence. You know the foolish notions that come to one sometimes. The
 high stillness confronted these two figures with its ominous patience,
 waiting for the passing away of a fantastic invasion.
 
 "They swore aloud together--out of sheer fright, I believe--then
 pretending not to know anything of my existence, turned back to the
 station. The sun was low; and leaning forward side by side, they seemed
 to be tugging painfully uphill their two ridiculous shadows of unequal
 length, that trailed behind them slowly over the tall grass without
 bending a single blade.
 
 "In a few days the Eldorado Expedition went into the patient wilderness,
 that closed upon it as the sea closes over a diver. Long afterwards the
 news came that all the donkeys were dead. I know nothing as to the fate
 of the less valuable animals. They, no doubt, like the rest of us, found
 what they deserved. I did not inquire. I was then rather excited at
 the prospect of meeting Kurtz very soon. When I say very soon I mean
 it comparatively. It was just two months from the day we left the creek
 when we came to the bank below Kurtz's station.
 
 "Going up that river was like traveling back to the earliest beginnings
 of the world, when vegetation rioted on the earth and the big trees were
 kings. An empty stream, a great silence, an impenetrable forest. The air
--**--**--
 very heart. You remember it, you dream of it, you wake up at night and
 think of it--years after--and go hot and cold all over. I don't pretend
 to say that steamboat floated all the time. More than once she had to
 wade for a bit, with twenty cannibals splashing around and pushing.
 We had enlisted some of these chaps on the way for a crew. Fine
 fellows--cannibals--in their place. They were men one could work with,
 and I am grateful to them. And, after all, they did not eat each other
 before my face: they had brought along a provision of hippo-meat
 which went rotten, and made the mystery of the wilderness stink in my
 nostrils. Phoo! I can sniff it now. I had the manager on board and three
 or four pilgrims with their staves--all complete. Sometimes we came upon
 a station close by the bank, clinging to the skirts of the unknown, and
 the white men rushing out of a tumble-down hovel, with great gestures of
 joy and surprise and welcome, seemed very strange,--had the appearance
 of being held there captive by a spell. The word ivory would ring in
 the air for a while--and on we went again into the silence, along empty
 reaches, round the still bends, between the high walls of our
 winding way, reverberating in hollow claps the ponderous beat of the
 stern-wheel. Trees, trees, millions of trees, massive, immense, running
 up high; and at their foot, hugging the bank against the stream, crept
 the little begrimed steamboat, like a sluggish beetle crawling on the
 floor of a lofty portico. It made you feel very small, very lost, and
 yet it was not altogether depressing, that feeling. After all, if you
 were small, the grimy beetle crawled on--which was just what you wanted
--**--**--
 
 "The earth seemed unearthly. We are accustomed to look upon the shackled
 form of a conquered monster, but there--there you could look at a thing
 monstrous and free. It was unearthly, and the men were--No, they were
 not inhuman. Well, you know, that was the worst of it--this suspicion of
 their not being inhuman. It would come slowly to one. They howled, and
 leaped, and spun, and made horrid faces; but what thrilled you was just
 the thought of their humanity--like yours--the thought of your remote
 kinship with this wild and passionate uproar. Ugly. Yes, it was ugly
 enough; but if you were man enough you would admit to yourself that
 there was in you just the faintest trace of a response to the terrible
 frankness of that noise, a dim suspicion of there being a meaning in it
 which you--you so remote from the night of first ages--could comprehend.
 And why not? The mind of man is capable of anything--because everything
 is in it, all the past as well as all the future. What was there after
 all? Joy, fear, sorrow, devotion, valor, rage--who can tell?--but
 truth--truth stripped of its cloak of time. Let the fool gape and
 shudder--the man knows, and can look on without a wink. But he must at
 least be as much of a man as these on the shore. He must meet that
 truth with his own true stuff--with his own inborn strength. Principles?
 Principles won't do. Acquisitions, clothes, pretty rags--rags that would
 fly off at the first good shake. No; you want a deliberate belief. An
 appeal to me in this fiendish row--is there? Very well; I hear; I admit,
 but I have a voice too, and for good or evil mine is the speech that
 cannot be silenced. Of course, a fool, what with sheer fright and fine
--**--**--
 table--a plank on two posts; a heap of rubbish reposed in a dark corner,
 and by the door I picked up a book. It had lost its covers, and the
 pages had been thumbed into a state of extremely dirty softness; but the
 back had been lovingly stitched afresh with white cotton thread, which
 looked clean yet. It was an extraordinary find. Its title was, 'An
 Inquiry into some Points of Seamanship,' by a man Tower, Towson--some
 such name--Master in his Majesty's Navy. The matter looked dreary
 reading enough, with illustrative diagrams and repulsive tables of
 figures, and the copy was sixty years old. I handled this amazing
 antiquity with the greatest possible tenderness, lest it should dissolve
 in my hands. Within, Towson or Towser was inquiring earnestly into the
 breaking strain of ships' chains and tackle, and other such matters. Not
 a very enthralling book; but at the first glance you could see there a
 singleness of intention, an honest concern for the right way of going
 to work, which made these humble pages, thought out so many years ago,
 luminous with another than a professional light. The simple old sailor,
 with his talk of chains and purchases, made me forget the jungle and
 the pilgrims in a delicious sensation of having come upon something
 unmistakably real. Such a book being there was wonderful enough; but
 still more astounding were the notes penciled in the margin, and plainly
 referring to the text. I couldn't believe my eyes! They were in cipher!
 Yes, it looked like cipher. Fancy a man lugging with him a book of that
 description into this nowhere and studying it--and making notes--in
 cipher at that! It was an extravagant mystery.
 
 "I had been dimly aware for some time of a worrying noise, and when I
--**--**--
 daylight--not at dusk, or in the dark. This was sensible enough. Eight
 miles meant nearly three hours' steaming for us, and I could also see
 suspicious ripples at the upper end of the reach. Nevertheless, I was
 annoyed beyond expression at the delay, and most unreasonably too, since
 one night more could not matter much after so many months. As we had
 plenty of wood, and caution was the word, I brought up in the middle
 of the stream. The reach was narrow, straight, with high sides like a
 railway cutting. The dusk came gliding into it long before the sun had
 set. The current ran smooth and swift, but a dumb immobility sat on
 the banks. The living trees, lashed together by the creepers and every
 living bush of the undergrowth, might have been changed into stone,
 even to the slenderest twig, to the lightest leaf. It was not sleep--it
 seemed unnatural, like a state of trance. Not the faintest sound of any
 kind could be heard. You looked on amazed, and began to suspect yourself
 of being deaf--then the night came suddenly, and struck you blind as
 well. About three in the morning some large fish leaped, and the loud
 splash made me jump as though a gun had been fired. When the sun rose
 there was a white fog, very warm and clammy, and more blinding than the
 night. It did not shift or drive; it was just there, standing all round
 you like something solid. At eight or nine, perhaps, it lifted as a
 shutter lifts. We had a glimpse of the towering multitude of trees,
 of the immense matted jungle, with the blazing little ball of the sun
 hanging over it--all perfectly still--and then the white shutter came
 down again, smoothly, as if sliding in greased grooves. I ordered the
--**--**--
 Certainly they had brought with them some rotten hippo-meat, which
 couldn't have lasted very long, anyway, even if the pilgrims hadn't, in
 the midst of a shocking hullabaloo, thrown a considerable quantity of it
 overboard. It looked like a high-handed proceeding; but it was really
 a case of legitimate self-defense. You can't breathe dead hippo waking,
 sleeping, and eating, and at the same time keep your precarious grip on
 existence. Besides that, they had given them every week three pieces of
 brass wire, each about nine inches long; and the theory was they were to
 buy their provisions with that currency in river-side villages. You can
 see how _that_ worked. There were either no villages, or the people were
 hostile, or the director, who like the rest of us fed out of tins, with
 an occasional old he-goat thrown in, didn't want to stop the steamer for
 some more or less recondite reason. So, unless they swallowed the wire
 itself, or made loops of it to snare the fishes with, I don't see what
 good their extravagant salary could be to them. I must say it was paid
 with a regularity worthy of a large and honorable trading company. For
 the rest, the only thing to eat--though it didn't look eatable in the
 least--I saw in their possession was a few lumps of some stuff like
 half-cooked dough, of a dirty lavender color, they kept wrapped in
 leaves, and now and then swallowed a piece of, but so small that it
 seemed done more for the looks of the thing than for any serious purpose
 of sustenance. Why in the name of all the gnawing devils of hunger they
 didn't go for us--they were thirty to five--and have a good tuck in for
 once, amazes me now when I think of it. They were big powerful men,
--**--**--
 imagine a more deadly place for a shipwreck. Whether drowned at once or
 not, we were sure to perish speedily in one way or another. 'I authorize
 you to take all the risks,' he said, after a short silence. 'I refuse to
 take any,' I said shortly; which was just the answer he expected, though
 its tone might have surprised him. 'Well, I must defer to your judgment.
 You are captain,' he said, with marked civility. I turned my shoulder to
 him in sign of my appreciation, and looked into the fog. How long would
 it last? It was the most hopeless look-out. The approach to this Kurtz
 grubbing for ivory in the wretched bush was beset by as many dangers as
 though he had been an enchanted princess sleeping in a fabulous castle.
 'Will they attack, do you think?' asked the manager, in a confidential
 tone.
 
 "I did not think they would attack, for several obvious reasons. The
 thick fog was one. If they left the bank in their canoes they would get
 lost in it, as we would be if we attempted to move. Still, I had also
 judged the jungle of both banks quite impenetrable--and yet eyes were
 in it, eyes that had seen us. The river-side bushes were certainly very
 thick; but the undergrowth behind was evidently penetrable.
 However, during the short lift I had seen no canoes anywhere in the
 reach--certainly not abreast of the steamer. But what made the idea of
 attack inconceivable to me was the nature of the noise--of the cries we
 had heard. They had not the fierce character boding of immediate hostile
 intention. Unexpected, wild, and violent as they had been, they had
 given me an irresistible impression of sorrow. The glimpse of the
 steamboat had for some reason filled those savages with unrestrained
--**--**--
 uninterrupted shoal, and to the right a high, steep bank heavily
 overgrown with bushes. Above the bush the trees stood in serried ranks.
 The twigs overhung the current thickly, and from distance to distance a
 large limb of some tree projected rigidly over the stream. It was then
 well on in the afternoon, the face of the forest was gloomy, and a
 broad strip of shadow had already fallen on the water. In this shadow
 we steamed up--very slowly, as you may imagine. I sheered her well
 inshore--the water being deepest near the bank, as the sounding-pole
 informed me.
 
 "One of my hungry and forbearing friends was sounding in the bows just
 below me. This steamboat was exactly like a decked scow. On the deck
 there were two little teak-wood houses, with doors and windows. The
 boiler was in the fore-end, and the machinery right astern. Over the
 whole there was a light roof, supported on stanchions. The funnel
 projected through that roof, and in front of the funnel a small cabin
 built of light planks served for a pilot-house. It contained a couch,
 two camp-stools, a loaded Martini-Henry leaning in one corner, a tiny
 table, and the steering-wheel. It had a wide door in front and a broad
 shutter at each side. All these were always thrown open, of course. I
 spent my days perched up there on the extreme fore-end of that roof,
 before the door. At night I slept, or tried to, on the couch. An
 athletic black belonging to some coast tribe, and educated by my poor
 predecessor, was the helmsman. He sported a pair of brass earrings, wore
 a blue cloth wrapper from the waist to the ankles, and thought all the
 world of himself. He was the most unstable kind of fool I had ever seen.
--**--**--
 sudden twist out of that steamboat. There was no room to turn even if I
 had wanted to, the snag was somewhere very near ahead in that confounded
 smoke, there was no time to lose, so I just crowded her into the
 bank--right into the bank, where I knew the water was deep.
 
 "We tore slowly along the overhanging bushes in a whirl of broken twigs
 and flying leaves. The fusillade below stopped short, as I had foreseen
 it would when the squirts got empty. I threw my head back to a glinting
 whizz that traversed the pilot-house, in at one shutter-hole and out
 at the other. Looking past that mad helmsman, who was shaking the empty
 rifle and yelling at the shore, I saw vague forms of men running bent
 double, leaping, gliding, distinct, incomplete, evanescent. Something
 big appeared in the air before the shutter, the rifle went overboard,
 and the man stepped back swiftly, looked at me over his shoulder in an
 extraordinary, profound, familiar manner, and fell upon my feet. The
 side of his head hit the wheel twice, and the end of what appeared
 a long cane clattered round and knocked over a little camp-stool. It
 looked as though after wrenching that thing from somebody ashore he had
 lost his balance in the effort. The thin smoke had blown away, we were
 clear of the snag, and looking ahead I could see that in another hundred
 yards or so I would be free to sheer off, away from the bank; but my
 feet felt so very warm and wet that I had to look down. The man had
 rolled on his back and stared straight up at me; both his hands clutched
 that cane. It was the shaft of a spear that, either thrown or lunged
--**--**--
 extreme disappointment, as though I had found out I had been striving
 after something altogether without a substance. I couldn't have been
 more disgusted if I had traveled all this way for the sole purpose of
 talking with Mr. Kurtz. Talking with. . . . I flung one shoe overboard,
 and became aware that that was exactly what I had been looking forward
 to--a talk with Kurtz. I made the strange discovery that I had never
 imagined him as doing, you know, but as discoursing. I didn't say to
 myself, 'Now I will never see him,' or 'Now I will never shake him by
 the hand,' but, 'Now I will never hear him.' The man presented himself
 as a voice. Not of course that I did not connect him with some sort of
 action. Hadn't I been told in all the tones of jealousy and admiration
 that he had collected, bartered, swindled, or stolen more ivory than all
 the other agents together? That was not the point. The point was in his
 being a gifted creature, and that of all his gifts the one that stood
 out pre-eminently, that carried with it a sense of real presence, was
 his ability to talk, his words--the gift of expression, the bewildering,
 the illuminating, the most exalted and the most contemptible, the
 pulsating stream of light, or the deceitful flow from the heart of an
 impenetrable darkness.
 
 "The other shoe went flying unto the devil-god of that river. I thought,
 'By Jove! it's all over. We are too late; he has vanished--the gift has
 vanished, by means of some spear, arrow, or club. I will never hear that
 chap speak after all,'--and my sorrow had a startling extravagance
 of emotion, even such as I had noticed in the howling sorrow of these
--**--**--
 caressed him, and--lo!--he had withered; it had taken him, loved him,
 embraced him, got into his veins, consumed his flesh, and sealed
 his soul to its own by the inconceivable ceremonies of some devilish
 initiation. He was its spoiled and pampered favorite. Ivory? I should
 think so. Heaps of it, stacks of it. The old mud shanty was bursting
 with it. You would think there was not a single tusk left either above
 or below the ground in the whole country. 'Mostly fossil,' the manager
 had remarked disparagingly. It was no more fossil than I am; but they
 call it fossil when it is dug up. It appears these niggers do bury
 the tusks sometimes--but evidently they couldn't bury this parcel
 deep enough to save the gifted Mr. Kurtz from his fate. We filled the
 steamboat with it, and had to pile a lot on the deck. Thus he could
 see and enjoy as long as he could see, because the appreciation of this
 favor had remained with him to the last. You should have heard him say,
 'My ivory.' Oh yes, I heard him. 'My Intended, my ivory, my station, my
 river, my--' everything belonged to him. It made me hold my breath in
 expectation of hearing the wilderness burst into a prodigious peal of
 laughter that would shake the fixed stars in their places. Everything
 belonged to him--but that was a trifle. The thing was to know what he
 belonged to, how many powers of darkness claimed him for their own. That
 was the reflection that made you creepy all over. It was impossible--it
 was not good for one either--trying to imagine. He had taken a high seat
 amongst the devils of the land--I mean literally. You can't understand.
 How could you?--with solid pavement under your feet, surrounded by kind
--**--**--
 father was half-French. All Europe contributed to the making of Kurtz;
 and by-and-by I learned that, most appropriately, the International
 Society for the Suppression of Savage Customs had intrusted him with the
 making of a report, for its future guidance. And he had written it too.
 I've seen it. I've read it. It was eloquent, vibrating with eloquence,
 but too high-strung, I think. Seventeen pages of close writing he had
 found time for! But this must have been before his--let us say--nerves,
 went wrong, and caused him to preside at certain midnight dances ending
 with unspeakable rites, which--as far as I reluctantly gathered
 from what I heard at various times--were offered up to him--do you
 understand?--to Mr. Kurtz himself. But it was a beautiful piece
 of writing. The opening paragraph, however, in the light of later
 information, strikes me now as ominous. He began with the argument
 that we whites, from the point of development we had arrived at, 'must
 necessarily appear to them [savages] in the nature of supernatural
 beings--we approach them with the might as of a deity,' and so on, and
 so on. 'By the simple exercise of our will we can exert a power for good
 practically unbounded,' &c., &c. From that point he soared and took me
 with him. The peroration was magnificent, though difficult to remember,
 you know. It gave me the notion of an exotic Immensity ruled by an
 august Benevolence. It made me tingle with enthusiasm. This was the
 unbounded power of eloquence--of words--of burning noble words. There
 were no practical hints to interrupt the magic current of phrases,
 unless a kind of note at the foot of the last page, scrawled evidently
 much later, in an unsteady hand, may be regarded as the exposition of
 a method. It was very simple, and at the end of that moving appeal to
--**--**--
 What they wanted to keep that body hanging about for I can't guess.
 Embalm it, maybe. But I had also heard another, and a very ominous,
 murmur on the deck below. My friends the wood-cutters were likewise
 scandalized, and with a better show of reason--though I admit that the
 reason itself was quite inadmissible. Oh, quite! I had made up my mind
 that if my late helmsman was to be eaten, the fishes alone should have
 him. He had been a very second-rate helmsman while alive, but now he was
 dead he might have become a first-class temptation, and possibly cause
 some startling trouble. Besides, I was anxious to take the wheel, the
 man in pink pyjamas showing himself a hopeless duffer at the business.
 
 "This I did directly the simple funeral was over. We were going
 half-speed, keeping right in the middle of the stream, and I listened
 to the talk about me. They had given up Kurtz, they had given up the
 station; Kurtz was dead, and the station had been burnt--and so on--and
 so on. The red-haired pilgrim was beside himself with the thought that
 at least this poor Kurtz had been properly revenged. 'Say! We must have
 made a glorious slaughter of them in the bush. Eh? What do you think?
 Say?' He positively danced, the bloodthirsty little gingery beggar.
 And he had nearly fainted when he saw the wounded man! I could not help
 saying, 'You made a glorious lot of smoke, anyhow.' I had seen, from the
 way the tops of the bushes rustled and flew, that almost all the shots
 had gone too high. You can't hit anything unless you take aim and fire
 from the shoulder; but these chaps fired from the hip with their eyes
 shut. The retreat, I maintained--and I was right--was caused by the
--**--**--
 teeth, had gone to the house, this chap came on board. 'I say, I
 don't like this. These natives are in the bush,' I said. He assured me
 earnestly it was all right. 'They are simple people,' he added; 'well,
 I am glad you came. It took me all my time to keep them off.' 'But you
 said it was all right,' I cried. 'Oh, they meant no harm,' he said; and
 as I stared he corrected himself, 'Not exactly.' Then vivaciously, 'My
 faith, your pilot-house wants a clean up!' In the next breath he advised
 me to keep enough steam on the boiler to blow the whistle in case of any
 trouble. 'One good screech will do more for you than all your rifles.
 They are simple people,' he repeated. He rattled away at such a rate
 he quite overwhelmed me. He seemed to be trying to make up for lots of
 silence, and actually hinted, laughing, that such was the case. 'Don't
 you talk with Mr. Kurtz?' I said. 'You don't talk with that man--you
 listen to him,' he exclaimed with severe exaltation. 'But now--' He
 waved his arm, and in the twinkling of an eye was in the uttermost
 depths of despondency. In a moment he came up again with a jump,
 possessed himself of both my hands, shook them continuously, while he
 gabbled: 'Brother sailor . . . honor . . . pleasure . . . delight . . .
 introduce myself . . . Russian . . . son of an arch-priest . . .
 Government of Tambov . . . What? Tobacco! English tobacco; the excellent
 English tobacco! Now, that's brotherly. Smoke? Where's a sailor that
 does not smoke?'
 
 "The pipe soothed him, and gradually I made out he had run away from
--**--**--
 appearance indestructible solely by the virtue of his few years and
 of his unreflecting audacity. I was seduced into something like
 admiration--like envy. Glamour urged him on, glamour kept him unscathed.
 He surely wanted nothing from the wilderness but space to breathe in and
 to push on through. His need was to exist, and to move onwards at
 the greatest possible risk, and with a maximum of privation. If the
 absolutely pure, uncalculating, unpractical spirit of adventure had ever
 ruled a human being, it ruled this be-patched youth. I almost envied
 him the possession of this modest and clear flame. It seemed to have
 consumed all thought of self so completely, that, even while he was
 talking to you, you forgot that it was he--the man before your eyes--who
 had gone through these things. I did not envy him his devotion to Kurtz,
 though. He had not meditated over it. It came to him, and he accepted it
 with a sort of eager fatalism. I must say that to me it appeared about
 the most dangerous thing in every way he had come upon so far.
 
 "They had come together unavoidably, like two ships becalmed near
 each other, and lay rubbing sides at last. I suppose Kurtz wanted an
 audience, because on a certain occasion, when encamped in the forest,
 they had talked all night, or more probably Kurtz had talked. 'We talked
 of everything,' he said, quite transported at the recollection. 'I
 forgot there was such a thing as sleep. The night did not seem to last
 an hour. Everything! Everything! . . . Of love too.' 'Ah, he talked to
 you of love!' I said, much amused. 'It isn't what you think,' he cried,
 almost passionately. 'It was in general. He made me see things--things.'
 
 "He threw his arms up. We were on deck at the time, and the headman
--**--**--
 he could do so, and had a fancy for it, and there was nothing on earth
 to prevent him killing whom he jolly well pleased. And it was true too.
 I gave him the ivory. What did I care! But I didn't clear out. No, no. I
 couldn't leave him. I had to be careful, of course, till we got friendly
 again for a time. He had his second illness then. Afterwards I had to
 keep out of the way; but I didn't mind. He was living for the most part
 in those villages on the lake. When he came down to the river, sometimes
 he would take to me, and sometimes it was better for me to be careful.
 This man suffered too much. He hated all this, and somehow he couldn't
 get away. When I had a chance I begged him to try and leave while there
 was time; I offered to go back with him. And he would say yes, and then
 he would remain; go off on another ivory hunt; disappear for weeks;
 forget himself amongst these people--forget himself--you know.' 'Why!
 he's mad,' I said. He protested indignantly. Mr. Kurtz couldn't be mad.
 If I had heard him talk, only two days ago, I wouldn't dare hint at
 such a thing. . . . I had taken up my binoculars while we talked and was
 looking at the shore, sweeping the limit of the forest at each side and
 at the back of the house. The consciousness of there being people in
 that bush, so silent, so quiet--as silent and quiet as the ruined house
 on the hill--made me uneasy. There was no sign on the face of nature
 of this amazing tale that was not so much told as suggested to me in
 desolate exclamations, completed by shrugs, in interrupted phrases, in
--**--**--
 head that had appeared near enough to be spoken to seemed at once to
 have leaped away from me into inaccessible distance.
 
 "The admirer of Mr. Kurtz was a bit crestfallen. In a hurried,
 indistinct voice he began to assure me he had not dared to take
 these--say, symbols--down. He was not afraid of the natives; they would
 not stir till Mr. Kurtz gave the word. His ascendency was extraordinary.
 The camps of these people surrounded the place, and the chiefs came
 every day to see him. They would crawl. . . . 'I don't want to know
 anything of the ceremonies used when approaching Mr. Kurtz,' I shouted.
 Curious, this feeling that came over me that such details would be more
 intolerable than those heads drying on the stakes under Mr. Kurtz's
 windows. After all, that was only a savage sight, while I seemed at
 one bound to have been transported into some lightless region of subtle
 horrors, where pure, uncomplicated savagery was a positive relief, being
 something that had a right to exist--obviously--in the sunshine. The
 young man looked at me with surprise. I suppose it did not occur to him
 Mr. Kurtz was no idol of mine. He forgot I hadn't heard any of these
 splendid monologues on, what was it? on love, justice, conduct of
 life--or what not. If it had come to crawling before Mr. Kurtz, he
 crawled as much as the veriest savage of them all. I had no idea of the
 conditions, he said: these heads were the heads of rebels. I shocked him
 excessively by laughing. Rebels! What would be the next definition I
 was to hear? There had been enemies, criminals, workers--and these
 were rebels. Those rebellious heads looked very subdued to me on their
 sticks. 'You don't know how such a life tries a man like Kurtz,' cried
--**--**--
 the clearing by the dark-faced and pensive forest. The bushes shook, the
 grass swayed for a time, and then everything stood still in attentive
 immobility.
 
 "'Now, if he does not say the right thing to them we are all done for,'
 said the Russian at my elbow. The knot of men with the stretcher had
 stopped too, half-way to the steamer, as if petrified. I saw the man on
 the stretcher sit up, lank and with an uplifted arm, above the shoulders
 of the bearers. 'Let us hope that the man who can talk so well of love
 in general will find some particular reason to spare us this time,' I
 said. I resented bitterly the absurd danger of our situation, as if
 to be at the mercy of that atrocious phantom had been a dishonoring
 necessity. I could not hear a sound, but through my glasses I saw the
 thin arm extended commandingly, the lower jaw moving, the eyes of
 that apparition shining darkly far in its bony head that nodded with
 grotesque jerks. Kurtz--Kurtz--that means short in German--don't it?
 Well, the name was as true as everything else in his life--and death.
 He looked at least seven feet long. His covering had fallen off, and his
 body emerged from it pitiful and appalling as from a winding-sheet. I
 could see the cage of his ribs all astir, the bones of his arm waving.
 It was as though an animated image of death carved out of old ivory had
 been shaking its hand with menaces at a motionless crowd of men made of
 dark and glittering bronze. I saw him open his mouth wide--it gave him
 a weirdly voracious aspect, as though he had wanted to swallow all the
 air, all the earth, all the men before him. A deep voice reached
--**--**--
 colossal body of the fecund and mysterious life seemed to look at her,
 pensive, as though it had been looking at the image of its own tenebrous
 and passionate soul.
 
 "She came abreast of the steamer, stood still, and faced us. Her long
 shadow fell to the water's edge. Her face had a tragic and fierce
 aspect of wild sorrow and of dumb pain mingled with the fear of some
 struggling, half-shaped resolve. She stood looking at us without a
 stir and like the wilderness itself, with an air of brooding over an
 inscrutable purpose. A whole minute passed, and then she made a step
 forward. There was a low jingle, a glint of yellow metal, a sway of
 fringed draperies, and she stopped as if her heart had failed her. The
 young fellow by my side growled. The pilgrims murmured at my back.
 She looked at us all as if her life had depended upon the unswerving
 steadiness of her glance. Suddenly she opened her bared arms and threw
 them up rigid above her head, as though in an uncontrollable desire to
 touch the sky, and at the same time the swift shadows darted out on the
 earth, swept around on the river, gathering the steamer into a shadowy
 embrace. A formidable silence hung over the scene.
 
 "She turned away slowly, walked on, following the bank, and passed into
 the bushes to the left. Once only her eyes gleamed back at us in the
 dusk of the thickets before she disappeared.
 
 "'If she had offered to come aboard I really think I would have tried to
 shoot her,' said the man of patches, nervously. 'I had been risking my
 life every day for the last fortnight to keep her out of the house. She
 got in one day and kicked up a row about those miserable rags I picked
--**--**--
 I waited. For him evidently Mr. Kurtz was not in his grave; I suspect
 that for him Mr. Kurtz was one of the immortals. 'Well!' said I at last,
 'speak out. As it happens, I am Mr. Kurtz's friend--in a way.'
 
 "He stated with a good deal of formality that had we not been 'of the
 same profession,' he would have kept the matter to himself without
 regard to consequences. 'He suspected there was an active ill-will
 towards him on the part of these white men that--' 'You are right,' I
 said, remembering a certain conversation I had overheard. 'The manager
 thinks you ought to be hanged.' He showed a concern at this intelligence
 which amused me at first. 'I had better get out of the way quietly,' he
 said, earnestly. 'I can do no more for Kurtz now, and they would soon
 find some excuse. What's to stop them? There's a military post three
 hundred miles from here.' 'Well, upon my word,' said I, 'perhaps you
 had better go if you have any friends amongst the savages near by.'
 'Plenty,' he said. 'They are simple people--and I want nothing, you
 know.' He stood biting his lips, then: 'I don't want any harm to happen
 to these whites here, but of course I was thinking of Mr. Kurtz's
 reputation--but you are a brother seaman and--' 'All right,' said I,
 after a time. 'Mr. Kurtz's reputation is safe with me.' I did not know
 how truly I spoke.
 
 "He informed me, lowering his voice, that it was Kurtz who had ordered
 the attack to be made on the steamer. 'He hated sometimes the idea of
 being taken away--and then again. . . . But I don't understand these
 matters. I am a simple man. He thought it would scare you away--that you
--**--**--
 
 "I think I would have raised an outcry if I had believed my eyes. But I
 didn't believe them at first--the thing seemed so impossible. The fact
 is I was completely unnerved by a sheer blank fright, pure abstract
 terror, unconnected with any distinct shape of physical danger. What
 made this emotion so overpowering was--how shall I define it?--the moral
 shock I received, as if something altogether monstrous, intolerable to
 thought and odious to the soul, had been thrust upon me unexpectedly.
 This lasted of course the merest fraction of a second, and then the
 usual sense of commonplace, deadly danger, the possibility of a sudden
 onslaught and massacre, or something of the kind, which I saw impending,
 was positively welcome and composing. It pacified me, in fact, so much,
 that I did not raise an alarm.
 
 "There was an agent buttoned up inside an ulster and sleeping on a chair
 on deck within three feet of me. The yells had not awakened him; he
 snored very slightly; I left him to his slumbers and leaped ashore. I
 did not betray Mr. Kurtz--it was ordered I should never betray him--it
 was written I should be loyal to the nightmare of my choice. I was
 anxious to deal with this shadow by myself alone,--and to this day I
 don't know why I was so jealous of sharing with anyone the peculiar
 blackness of that experience.
 
 "As soon as I got on the bank I saw a trail--a broad trail through the
 grass. I remember the exultation with which I said to myself, 'He can't
 walk--he is crawling on all-fours--I've got him.' The grass was wet
 with dew. I strode rapidly with clenched fists. I fancy I had some vague
 notion of falling upon him and giving him a drubbing. I don't know. I
--**--**--
 case,' I affirmed, steadily. I did not want to have the throttling of
 him, you understand--and indeed it would have been very little use for
 any practical purpose. I tried to break the spell--the heavy, mute spell
 of the wilderness--that seemed to draw him to its pitiless breast by the
 awakening of forgotten and brutal instincts, by the memory of gratified
 and monstrous passions. This alone, I was convinced, had driven him out
 to the edge of the forest, to the bush, towards the gleam of fires, the
 throb of drums, the drone of weird incantations; this alone had beguiled
 his unlawful soul beyond the bounds of permitted aspirations. And, don't
 you see, the terror of the position was not in being knocked on the
 head--though I had a very lively sense of that danger too--but in this,
 that I had to deal with a being to whom I could not appeal in the
 name of anything high or low. I had, even like the niggers, to invoke
 him--himself his own exalted and incredible degradation. There was
 nothing either above or below him, and I knew it. He had kicked himself
 loose of the earth. Confound the man! he had kicked the very earth to
 pieces. He was alone, and I before him did not know whether I stood
 on the ground or floated in the air. I've been telling you what we
 said--repeating the phrases we pronounced,--but what's the good? They
 were common everyday words,--the familiar, vague sounds exchanged on
 every waking day of life. But what of that? They had behind them, to my
 mind, the terrific suggestiveness of words heard in dreams, of phrases
 spoken in nightmares. Soul! If anybody had ever struggled with a soul,
 I am the man. And I wasn't arguing with a lunatic either. Believe me
--**--**--
 suddenly, were like the response of some satanic litany.
 
 "We had carried Kurtz into the pilot-house: there was more air there.
 Lying on the couch, he stared through the open shutter. There was an
 eddy in the mass of human bodies, and the woman with helmeted head and
 tawny cheeks rushed out to the very brink of the stream. She put out her
 hands, shouted something, and all that wild mob took up the shout in a
 roaring chorus of articulated, rapid, breathless utterance.
 
 "'Do you understand this?' I asked.
 
 "He kept on looking out past me with fiery, longing eyes, with a mingled
 expression of wistfulness and hate. He made no answer, but I saw a
 smile, a smile of indefinable meaning, appear on his colorless lips
 that a moment after twitched convulsively. 'Do I not?' he said slowly,
 gasping, as if the words had been torn out of him by a supernatural
 power.
 
 "I pulled the string of the whistle, and I did this because I saw the
 pilgrims on deck getting out their rifles with an air of anticipating a
 jolly lark. At the sudden screech there was a movement of abject terror
 through that wedged mass of bodies. 'Don't! Don't you frighten them
 away,' cried someone on deck disconsolately. I pulled the string
 time after time. They broke and ran, they leaped, they crouched, they
 swerved, they dodged the flying terror of the sound. The three red chaps
 had fallen flat, face down on the shore, as though they had been shot
 dead. Only the barbarous and superb woman did not so much as flinch,
 and stretched tragically her bare arms after us over the somber and
 glittering river.
 
 "And then that imbecile crowd down on the deck started their little fun,
 and I could see nothing more for smoke.
--**--**--
 for the papers and meant to do so again, 'for the furthering of my
 ideas. It's a duty.'
 
 "His was an impenetrable darkness. I looked at him as you peer down at
 a man who is lying at the bottom of a precipice where the sun never
 shines. But I had not much time to give him, because I was helping the
 engine-driver to take to pieces the leaky cylinders, to straighten a
 bent connecting-rod, and in other such matters. I lived in an
 infernal mess of rust, filings, nuts, bolts, spanners, hammers,
 ratchet-drills--things I abominate, because I don't get on with them. I
 tended the little forge we fortunately had aboard; I toiled wearily in a
 wretched scrap-heap--unless I had the shakes too bad to stand.
 
 "One evening coming in with a candle I was startled to hear him say a
 little tremulously, 'I am lying here in the dark waiting for death.'
 The light was within a foot of his eyes. I forced myself to murmur, 'Oh,
 nonsense!' and stood over him as if transfixed.
 
 "Anything approaching the change that came over his features I have
 never seen before, and hope never to see again. Oh, I wasn't touched.
 I was fascinated. It was as though a veil had been rent. I saw on that
 ivory face the expression of somber pride, of ruthless power, of craven
 terror--of an intense and hopeless despair. Did he live his life again
 in every detail of desire, temptation, and surrender during that supreme
 moment of complete knowledge? He cried in a whisper at some image, at
 some vision,--he cried out twice, a cry that was no more than a breath--
 
 "'The horror! The horror!'
 
 "I blew the candle out and left the cabin. The pilgrims were dining in
 the mess-room, and I took my place opposite the manager, who lifted his
--**--**--
 foot. And perhaps in this is the whole difference; perhaps all the
 wisdom, and all truth, and all sincerity, are just compressed into that
 inappreciable moment of time in which we step over the threshold of the
 invisible. Perhaps! I like to think my summing-up would not have been
 a word of careless contempt. Better his cry--much better. It was
 an affirmation, a moral victory paid for by innumerable defeats, by
 abominable terrors, by abominable satisfactions. But it was a victory!
 That is why I have remained loyal to Kurtz to the last, and even beyond,
 when a long time after I heard once more, not his own voice, but
 the echo of his magnificent eloquence thrown to me from a soul as
 translucently pure as a cliff of crystal.
 
 "No, they did not bury me, though there is a period of time which I
 remember mistily, with a shuddering wonder, like a passage through some
 inconceivable world that had no hope in it and no desire. I found myself
 back in the sepulchral city resenting the sight of people hurrying
 through the streets to filch a little money from each other, to devour
 their infamous cookery, to gulp their unwholesome beer, to dream their
 insignificant and silly dreams. They trespassed upon my thoughts. They
 were intruders whose knowledge of life was to me an irritating pretense,
 because I felt so sure they could not possibly know the things I knew.
 Their bearing, which was simply the bearing of commonplace individuals
 going about their business in the assurance of perfect safety, was
 offensive to me like the outrageous flauntings of folly in the face of
 a danger it is unable to comprehend. I had no particular desire to
 enlighten them, but I had some difficulty in restraining myself from
--**--**--
 confessed his opinion that Kurtz really couldn't write a bit--'but
 heavens! how that man could talk! He electrified large meetings. He had
 faith--don't you see?--he had the faith. He could get himself to believe
 anything--anything. He would have been a splendid leader of an extreme
 party.' 'What party?' I asked. 'Any party,' answered the other. 'He
 was an--an--extremist.' Did I not think so? I assented. Did I know, he
 asked, with a sudden flash of curiosity, 'what it was that had induced
 him to go out there?' 'Yes,' said I, and forthwith handed him the
 famous Report for publication, if he thought fit. He glanced through it
 hurriedly, mumbling all the time, judged 'it would do,' and took himself
 off with this plunder.
 
 "Thus I was left at last with a slim packet of letters and the girl's
 portrait. She struck me as beautiful--I mean she had a beautiful
 expression. I know that the sunlight can be made to lie too, yet one
 felt that no manipulation of light and pose could have conveyed the
 delicate shade of truthfulness upon those features. She seemed ready to
 listen without mental reservation, without suspicion, without a thought
 for herself. I concluded I would go and give her back her portrait
 and those letters myself. Curiosity? Yes; and also some other feeling
 perhaps. All that had been Kurtz's had passed out of my hands: his soul,
 his body, his station, his plans, his ivory, his career. There remained
 only his memory and his Intended--and I wanted to give that up too to
 the past, in a way,--to surrender personally all that remained of him
 with me to that oblivion which is the last word of our common fate. I
 don't defend myself. I had no clear perception of what it was I really
--**--**--
 "The dusk was falling. I had to wait in a lofty drawing-room with three
 long windows from floor to ceiling that were like three luminous and
 bedraped columns. The bent gilt legs and backs of the furniture shone in
 indistinct curves. The tall marble fireplace had a cold and monumental
 whiteness. A grand piano stood massively in a corner, with dark gleams
 on the flat surfaces like a somber and polished sarcophagus. A high door
 opened--closed. I rose.
 
 "She came forward, all in black, with a pale head, floating towards
 me in the dusk. She was in mourning. It was more than a year since his
 death, more than a year since the news came; she seemed as though she
 would remember and mourn for ever. She took both my hands in hers and
 murmured, 'I had heard you were coming.' I noticed she was not very
 young--I mean not girlish. She had a mature capacity for fidelity, for
 belief, for suffering. The room seemed to have grown darker, as if all
 the sad light of the cloudy evening had taken refuge on her forehead.
 This fair hair, this pale visage, this pure brow, seemed surrounded by
 an ashy halo from which the dark eyes looked out at me. Their glance was
 guileless, profound, confident, and trustful. She carried her sorrowful
 head as though she were proud of that sorrow, as though she would say,
 'I--I alone know how to mourn for him as he deserves. But while we were
 still shaking hands, such a look of awful desolation came upon her
 face that I perceived she was one of those creatures that are not the
 playthings of Time. For her he had died only yesterday. And, by Jove!
 the impression was so powerful that for me too he seemed to have died
--**--**--
 wasn't rich enough or something. And indeed I don't know whether he had
 not been a pauper all his life. He had given me some reason to infer
 that it was his impatience of comparative poverty that drove him out
 there.
 
 "'. . . Who was not his friend who had heard him speak once?' she was
 saying. 'He drew men towards him by what was best in them.' She looked
 at me with intensity. 'It is the gift of the great,' she went on, and
 the sound of her low voice seemed to have the accompaniment of all
 the other sounds, full of mystery, desolation, and sorrow, I had ever
 heard--the ripple of the river, the soughing of the trees swayed by the
 wind, the murmurs of wild crowds, the faint ring of incomprehensible
 words cried from afar, the whisper of a voice speaking from beyond the
 threshold of an eternal darkness. 'But you have heard him! You know!'
 she cried.
 
 "'Yes, I know,' I said with something like despair in my heart, but
 bowing my head before the faith that was in her, before that great and
 saving illusion that shone with an unearthly glow in the darkness, in
 the triumphant darkness from which I could not have defended her--from
 which I could not even defend myself.
 
 "'What a loss to me--to us!'--she corrected herself with beautiful
 generosity; then added in a murmur, 'To the world.' By the last gleams
 of twilight I could see the glitter of her eyes, full of tears--of tears
 that would not fall.
 
 "'I have been very happy--very fortunate--very proud,' she went on. 'Too
 fortunate. Too happy for a little while. And now I am unhappy for--for
 life.'
 
 "She stood up; her fair hair seemed to catch all the remaining light in
--**--**--
 
 "'To the very end,' I said, shakily. 'I heard his very last words. . . .'
 I stopped in a fright.
 
 "'Repeat them,' she said in a heart-broken tone. 'I want--I
 want--something--something--to--to live with.'
 
 "I was on the point of crying at her, 'Don't you hear them?' The dusk
 was repeating them in a persistent whisper all around us, in a whisper
 that seemed to swell menacingly like the first whisper of a rising wind.
 'The horror! The horror!'
 
 "'His last word--to live with,' she murmured. 'Don't you understand I
 loved him--I loved him--I loved him!'
 
 "I pulled myself together and spoke slowly.
 
 "'The last word he pronounced was--your name.'
 
 "I heard a light sigh, and then my heart stood still, stopped dead short
 by an exulting and terrible cry, by the cry of inconceivable triumph and
 of unspeakable pain. 'I knew it--I was sure!' . . . She knew. She was
 sure. I heard her weeping; she had hidden her face in her hands. It
 seemed to me that the house would collapse before I could escape, that
 the heavens would fall upon my head. But nothing happened. The heavens
 do not fall for such a trifle. Would they have fallen, I wonder, if I
 had rendered Kurtz that justice which was his due? Hadn't he said he
 wanted only justice? But I couldn't. I could not tell her. It would have
 been too dark--too dark altogether. . . ."
 
 Marlow ceased, and sat apart, indistinct and silent, in the pose of a
 meditating Buddha. Nobody moved for a time. "We have lost the first of
 the ebb," said the Director, suddenly. I raised my head. The offing was
 barred by a black bank of clouds, and the tranquil waterway leading
 to the uttermost ends of the earth flowed somber under an overcast
--**--**--
 If anything could induce me to revisit Sulaco (I should hate to see all
 these changes) it would be Antonia. And the true reason for that--why
 not be frank about it?--the true reason is that I have modelled her on
 my first love. How we, a band of tallish schoolboys, the chums of
 her two brothers, how we used to look up to that girl just out of the
 schoolroom herself, as the standard-bearer of a faith to which we all
 were born but which she alone knew how to hold aloft with an unflinching
 hope! She had perhaps more glow and less serenity in her soul than
 Antonia, but she was an uncompromising Puritan of patriotism with no
 taint of the slightest worldliness in her thoughts. I was not the only
 one in love with her; but it was I who had to hear oftenest her scathing
 criticism of my levities--very much like poor Decoud--or stand the
 brunt of her austere, unanswerable invective. She did not quite
 understand--but never mind. That afternoon when I came in, a shrinking
 yet defiant sinner, to say the final good-bye I received a hand-squeeze
 that made my heart leap and saw a tear that took my breath away. She was
 softened at the last as though she had suddenly perceived (we were such
 children still!) that I was really going away for good, going very far
 away--even as far as Sulaco, lying unknown, hidden from our eyes in the
 darkness of the Placid Gulf.
 
 That's why I long sometimes for another glimpse of the "beautiful
 Antonia" (or can it be the Other?) moving in the dimness of the great
 cathedral, saying a short prayer at the tomb of the first and last
 Cardinal-Archbishop of Sulaco, standing absorbed in filial devotion
 before the monument of Don Jose Avellanos, and, with a lingering,
--**--**--
 coasting port with a fairly large local trade in ox-hides and indigo.
 The clumsy deep-sea galleons of the conquerors that, needing a brisk
 gale to move at all, would lie becalmed, where your modern ship built on
 clipper lines forges ahead by the mere flapping of her sails, had been
 barred out of Sulaco by the prevailing calms of its vast gulf. Some
 harbours of the earth are made difficult of access by the treachery
 of sunken rocks and the tempests of their shores. Sulaco had found an
 inviolable sanctuary from the temptations of a trading world in
 the solemn hush of the deep Golfo Placido as if within an enormous
 semi-circular and unroofed temple open to the ocean, with its walls of
 lofty mountains hung with the mourning draperies of cloud.
 
 On one side of this broad curve in the straight seaboard of the Republic
 of Costaguana, the last spur of the coast range forms an insignificant
 cape whose name is Punta Mala. From the middle of the gulf the point of
 the land itself is not visible at all; but the shoulder of a steep hill
 at the back can be made out faintly like a shadow on the sky.
 
 On the other side, what seems to be an isolated patch of blue mist
 floats lightly on the glare of the horizon. This is the peninsula
 of Azuera, a wild chaos of sharp rocks and stony levels cut about by
 vertical ravines. It lies far out to sea like a rough head of stone
 stretched from a green-clad coast at the end of a slender neck of
 sand covered with thickets of thorny scrub. Utterly waterless, for the
 rainfall runs off at once on all sides into the sea, it has not soil
 enough--it is said--to grow a single blade of grass, as if it were
--**--**--
 in a saying which was very often on his lips, "We never make mistakes."
 To the Company's officers it took the form of a severe injunction, "We
 must make no mistakes. I'll have no mistakes here, no matter what Smith
 may do at his end."
 
 Smith, on whom he had never set eyes in his life, was the other
 superintendent of the service, quartered some fifteen hundred miles away
 from Sulaco. "Don't talk to me of your Smith."
 
 Then, calming down suddenly, he would dismiss the subject with studied
 negligence.
 
 "Smith knows no more of this continent than a baby."
 
 "Our excellent Senor Mitchell" for the business and official world of
 Sulaco; "Fussy Joe" for the commanders of the Company's ships, Captain
 Joseph Mitchell prided himself on his profound knowledge of men and
 things in the country--cosas de Costaguana. Amongst these last he
 accounted as most unfavourable to the orderly working of his Company
 the frequent changes of government brought about by revolutions of the
 military type.
 
 The political atmosphere of the Republic was generally stormy in these
 days. The fugitive patriots of the defeated party had the knack of
 turning up again on the coast with half a steamer's load of small arms
 and ammunition. Such resourcefulness Captain Mitchell considered as
 perfectly wonderful in view of their utter destitution at the time of
 flight. He had observed that "they never seemed to have enough change
 about them to pay for their passage ticket out of the country." And
 he could speak with knowledge; for on a memorable occasion he had been
 called upon to save the life of a dictator, together with the lives of a
 few Sulaco officials--the political chief, the director of the customs,
 and the head of police--belonging to an overturned government. Poor
 Senor Ribiera (such was the dictator's name) had come pelting eighty
--**--**--
 railway-sleepers, which, being creosoted, burned well. The main attack
 on the railway yards, on the O.S.N. Offices, and especially on the
 Custom House, whose strong room, it was well known, contained a large
 treasure in silver ingots, failed completely. Even the little hotel kept
 by old Giorgio, standing alone halfway between the harbour and the town,
 escaped looting and destruction, not by a miracle, but because with the
 safes in view they had neglected it at first, and afterwards found no
 leisure to stop. Nostromo, with his Cargadores, was pressing them too
 hard then.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER THREE
 
 It might have been said that there he was only protecting his own. From
 the first he had been admitted to live in the intimacy of the family
 of the hotel-keeper who was a countryman of his. Old Giorgio Viola,
 a Genoese with a shaggy white leonine head--often called simply "the
 Garibaldino" (as Mohammedans are called after their prophet)--was, to
 use Captain Mitchell's own words, the "respectable married friend" by
 whose advice Nostromo had left his ship to try for a run of shore luck
 in Costaguana.
 
 The old man, full of scorn for the populace, as your austere republican
 so often is, had disregarded the preliminary sounds of trouble. He
 went on that day as usual pottering about the "casa" in his slippers,
 muttering angrily to himself his contempt of the non-political nature of
 the riot, and shrugging his shoulders. In the end he was taken unawares
 by the out-rush of the rabble. It was too late then to remove his
 family, and, indeed, where could he have run to with the portly Signora
 Teresa and two little girls on that great plain? So, barricading every
 opening, the old man sat down sternly in the middle of the darkened cafe
 with an old shot-gun on his knees. His wife sat on another chair by his
--**--**--
 considerably younger than her husband, already middle-aged. She had a
 handsome face, whose complexion had turned yellow because the climate
 of Sulaco did not suit her at all. Her voice was a rich contralto. When,
 with her arms folded tight under her ample bosom, she scolded the squat,
 thick-legged China girls handling linen, plucking fowls, pounding corn
 in wooden mortars amongst the mud outbuildings at the back of the house,
 she could bring out such an impassioned, vibrating, sepulchral note that
 the chained watch-dog bolted into his kennel with a great rattle. Luis,
 a cinnamon-coloured mulatto with a sprouting moustache and thick, dark
 lips, would stop sweeping the cafe with a broom of palm-leaves to let
 a gentle shudder run down his spine. His languishing almond eyes would
 remain closed for a long time.
 
 This was the staff of the Casa Viola, but all these people had fled
 early that morning at the first sounds of the riot, preferring to hide
 on the plain rather than trust themselves in the house; a preference for
 which they were in no way to blame, since, whether true or not, it
 was generally believed in the town that the Garibaldino had some money
 buried under the clay floor of the kitchen. The dog, an irritable,
 shaggy brute, barked violently and whined plaintively in turns at the
 back, running in and out of his kennel as rage or fear prompted him.
 
 Bursts of great shouting rose and died away, like wild gusts of wind on
 the plain round the barricaded house; the fitful popping of shots
 grew louder above the yelling. Sometimes there were intervals of
 unaccountable stillness outside, and nothing could have been more gaily
 peaceful than the narrow bright lines of sunlight from the cracks in the
 shutters, ruled straight across the cafe over the disarranged chairs
--**--**--
 In return Giorgio would give a slight sideways jerk of the head, without
 unfolding his arms.
 
 On this memorable day of the riot his arms were not folded on his chest.
 His hand grasped the barrel of the gun grounded on the threshold; he
 did not look up once at the white dome of Higuerota, whose cool purity
 seemed to hold itself aloof from a hot earth. His eyes examined the
 plain curiously. Tall trails of dust subsided here and there. In
 a speckless sky the sun hung clear and blinding. Knots of men ran
 headlong; others made a stand; and the irregular rattle of firearms came
 rippling to his ears in the fiery, still air. Single figures on foot
 raced desperately. Horsemen galloped towards each other, wheeled round
 together, separated at speed. Giorgio saw one fall, rider and horse
 disappearing as if they had galloped into a chasm, and the movements of
 the animated scene were like the passages of a violent game played upon
 the plain by dwarfs mounted and on foot, yelling with tiny throats,
 under the mountain that seemed a colossal embodiment of silence. Never
 before had Giorgio seen this bit of plain so full of active life; his
 gaze could not take in all its details at once; he shaded his eyes with
 his hand, till suddenly the thundering of many hoofs near by startled
 him.
 
 A troop of horses had broken out of the fenced paddock of the Railway
 Company. They came on like a whirlwind, and dashed over the line
 snorting, kicking, squealing in a compact, piebald, tossing mob of bay,
 brown, grey backs, eyes staring, necks extended, nostrils red, long
 tails streaming. As soon as they had leaped upon the road the thick dust
 flew upwards from under their hoofs, and within six yards of Giorgio
--**--**--
 after the function on shore. Captain Mitchell had himself steered the
 cargo lighter, all draped with flags, which, in tow of the Juno's steam
 launch, took the Excellentissimo from the jetty to the ship. Everybody
 of note in Sulaco had been invited--the one or two foreign merchants,
 all the representatives of the old Spanish families then in town, the
 great owners of estates on the plain, grave, courteous, simple men,
 caballeros of pure descent, with small hands and feet, conservative,
 hospitable, and kind. The Occidental Province was their stronghold;
 their Blanco party had triumphed now; it was their President-Dictator,
 a Blanco of the Blancos, who sat smiling urbanely between the
 representatives of two friendly foreign powers. They had come with him
 from Sta. Marta to countenance by their presence the enterprise in
 which the capital of their countries was engaged. The only lady of that
 company was Mrs. Gould, the wife of Don Carlos, the administrator of the
 San Tome silver mine. The ladies of Sulaco were not advanced enough to
 take part in the public life to that extent. They had come out strongly
 at the great ball at the Intendencia the evening before, but Mrs. Gould
 alone had appeared, a bright spot in the group of black coats behind the
 President-Dictator, on the crimson cloth-covered stage erected under a
 shady tree on the shore of the harbour, where the ceremony of turning
 the first sod had taken place. She had come off in the cargo lighter,
 full of notabilities, sitting under the flutter of gay flags, in the
 place of honour by the side of Captain Mitchell, who steered, and her
 clear dress gave the only truly festive note to the sombre gathering in
 the long, gorgeous saloon of the Juno.
 
 The head of the chairman of the railway board (from London), handsome
--**--**--
 
 General Montero, whom the beginning of the struggle had found an obscure
 army captain employed on the wild eastern frontier of the State, had
 thrown in his lot with the Ribiera party at a moment when special
 circumstances had given that small adhesion a fortuitous importance.
 The fortunes of war served him marvellously, and the victory of Rio Seco
 (after a day of desperate fighting) put a seal to his success. At the
 end he emerged General, Minister of War, and the military head of the
 Blanco party, although there was nothing aristocratic in his descent.
 Indeed, it was said that he and his brother, orphans, had been brought
 up by the munificence of a famous European traveller, in whose service
 their father had lost his life. Another story was that their father
 had been nothing but a charcoal burner in the woods, and their mother a
 baptised Indian woman from the far interior.
 
 However that might be, the Costaguana Press was in the habit of styling
 Montero's forest march from his commandancia to join the Blanco forces
 at the beginning of the troubles, the "most heroic military exploit of
 modern times." About the same time, too, his brother had turned up from
 Europe, where he had gone apparently as secretary to a consul. Having,
 however, collected a small band of outlaws, he showed some talent as
 guerilla chief and had been rewarded at the pacification by the post of
 Military Commandant of the capital.
 
 The Minister of War, then, accompanied the Dictator. The board of the
 O.S.N. Company, working hand-in-hand with the railway people for the
 good of the Republic, had on this important occasion instructed Captain
 Mitchell to put the mail-boat Juno at the disposal of the distinguished
 party. Don Vincente, journeying south from Sta. Marta, had embarked at
--**--**--
 representative of the third generation in a continent possessing its
 own style of horsemanship, went on looking thoroughly English even
 on horseback. This is not said of him in the mocking spirit of the
 Llaneros--men of the great plains--who think that no one in the world
 knows how to sit a horse but themselves. Charles Gould, to use the
 suitably lofty phrase, rode like a centaur. Riding for him was not a
 special form of exercise; it was a natural faculty, as walking straight
 is to all men sound of mind and limb; but, all the same, when cantering
 beside the rutty ox-cart track to the mine he looked in his English
 clothes and with his imported saddlery as though he had come this moment
 to Costaguana at his easy swift pasotrote, straight out of some green
 meadow at the other side of the world.
 
 His way would lie along the old Spanish road--the Camino Real of popular
 speech--the only remaining vestige of a fact and name left by that
 royalty old Giorgio Viola hated, and whose very shadow had departed from
 the land; for the big equestrian statue of Charles IV. at the entrance
 of the Alameda, towering white against the trees, was only known to the
 folk from the country and to the beggars of the town that slept on the
 steps around the pedestal, as the Horse of Stone. The other Carlos,
 turning off to the left with a rapid clatter of hoofs on the disjointed
 pavement--Don Carlos Gould, in his English clothes, looked as
 incongruous, but much more at home than the kingly cavalier reining in
 his steed on the pedestal above the sleeping leperos, with his marble
 arm raised towards the marble rim of a plumed hat.
 
 The weather-stained effigy of the mounted king, with its vague
--**--**--
 to be robbed under the forms of legality and business was intolerable to
 his imagination. Mr. Gould, the father, had one fault in his sagacious
 and honourable character: he attached too much importance to form. It is
 a failing common to mankind, whose views are tinged by prejudices. There
 was for him in that affair a malignancy of perverted justice which, by
 means of a moral shock, attacked his vigorous physique. "It will end
 by killing me," he used to affirm many times a day. And, in fact, since
 that time he began to suffer from fever, from liver pains, and mostly
 from a worrying inability to think of anything else. The Finance
 Minister could have formed no conception of the profound subtlety of his
 revenge. Even Mr. Gould's letters to his fourteen-year-old boy Charles,
 then away in England for his education, came at last to talk of
 practically nothing but the mine. He groaned over the injustice, the
 persecution, the outrage of that mine; he occupied whole pages in the
 exposition of the fatal consequences attaching to the possession of that
 mine from every point of view, with every dismal inference, with words
 of horror at the apparently eternal character of that curse. For the
 Concession had been granted to him and his descendants for ever. He
 implored his son never to return to Costaguana, never to claim any
 part of his inheritance there, because it was tainted by the infamous
 Concession; never to touch it, never to approach it, to forget that
 America existed, and pursue a mercantile career in Europe. And each
 letter ended with bitter self-reproaches for having stayed too long in
 that cavern of thieves, intriguers, and brigands.
 
 To be told repeatedly that one's future is blighted because of the
 possession of a silver mine is not, at the age of fourteen, a matter
--**--**--
 had known how to give up his life to the independence and unity of his
 country, who had known how to be as enthusiastic in his generosity as
 the youngest of those who fell for that very cause of which old Giorgio
 Viola was a drifting relic, as a broken spar is suffered to float away
 disregarded after a naval victory. The Marchesa led a still, whispering
 existence, nun-like in her black robes and a white band over the
 forehead, in a corner of the first floor of an ancient and ruinous
 palace, whose big, empty halls downstairs sheltered under their painted
 ceilings the harvests, the fowls, and even the cattle, together with the
 whole family of the tenant farmer.
 
 The two young people had met in Lucca. After that meeting Charles Gould
 visited no mines, though they went together in a carriage, once, to see
 some marble quarries, where the work resembled mining in so far that
 it also was the tearing of the raw material of treasure from the earth.
 Charles Gould did not open his heart to her in any set speeches. He
 simply went on acting and thinking in her sight. This is the true method
 of sincerity. One of his frequent remarks was, "I think sometimes that
 poor father takes a wrong view of that San Tome business." And they
 discussed that opinion long and earnestly, as if they could influence a
 mind across half the globe; but in reality they discussed it because the
 sentiment of love can enter into any subject and live ardently in remote
 phrases. For this natural reason these discussions were precious to Mrs.
 Gould in her engaged state. Charles feared that Mr. Gould, senior, was
 wasting his strength and making himself ill by his efforts to get rid
--**--**--
 masculine. A woman with a masculine mind is not a being of
 superior efficiency; she is simply a phenomenon of imperfect
 differentiation--interestingly barren and without importance. Dona
 Emilia's intelligence being feminine led her to achieve the conquest of
 Sulaco, simply by lighting the way for her unselfishness and sympathy.
 She could converse charmingly, but she was not talkative. The wisdom of
 the heart having no concern with the erection or demolition of theories
 any more than with the defence of prejudices, has no random words at its
 command. The words it pronounces have the value of acts of integrity,
 tolerance, and compassion. A woman's true tenderness, like the true
 virility of man, is expressed in action of a conquering kind. The ladies
 of Sulaco adored Mrs. Gould. "They still look upon me as something of a
 monster," Mrs. Gould had said pleasantly to one of the three gentlemen
 from San Francisco she had to entertain in her new Sulaco house just
 about a year after her marriage.
 
 They were her first visitors from abroad, and they had come to look at
 the San Tome mine. She jested most agreeably, they thought; and Charles
 Gould, besides knowing thoroughly what he was about, had shown himself
 a real hustler. These facts caused them to be well disposed towards his
 wife. An unmistakable enthusiasm, pointed by a slight flavour of irony,
 made her talk of the mine absolutely fascinating to her visitors, and
 provoked them to grave and indulgent smiles in which there was a good
 deal of deference. Perhaps had they known how much she was inspired by
 an idealistic view of success they would have been amazed at the state
 of her mind as the Spanish-American ladies had been amazed at the
 tireless activity of her body. She would--in her own words--have
--**--**--
 
 Mrs. Gould, however, did not seem to find this answer in the least
 obscure. She brightened up delicately; already he had changed his tone.
 
 "But there are facts. The worth of the mine--as a mine--is beyond doubt.
 It shall make us very wealthy. The mere working of it is a matter of
 technical knowledge, which I have--which ten thousand other men in the
 world have. But its safety, its continued existence as an enterprise,
 giving a return to men--to strangers, comparative strangers--who invest
 money in it, is left altogether in my hands. I have inspired confidence
 in a man of wealth and position. You seem to think this perfectly
 natural--do you? Well, I don't know. I don't know why I have; but it is
 a fact. This fact makes everything possible, because without it I would
 never have thought of disregarding my father's wishes. I would never
 have disposed of the Concession as a speculator disposes of a valuable
 right to a company--for cash and shares, to grow rich eventually if
 possible, but at any rate to put some money at once in his pocket. No.
 Even if it had been feasible--which I doubt--I would not have done so.
 Poor father did not understand. He was afraid I would hang on to the
 ruinous thing, waiting for just some such chance, and waste my life
 miserably. That was the true sense of his prohibition, which we have
 deliberately set aside."
 
 They were walking up and down the corredor. Her head just reached to his
 shoulder. His arm, extended downwards, was about her waist. His spurs
 jingled slightly.
 
 "He had not seen me for ten years. He did not know me. He parted from me
 for my sake, and he would never let me come back. He was always talking
--**--**--
 to them at the instant when the woman's instinct of devotion and the
 man's instinct of activity receive from the strongest of illusions their
 most powerful impulse. The very prohibition imposed the necessity of
 success. It was as if they had been morally bound to make good their
 vigorous view of life against the unnatural error of weariness and
 despair. If the idea of wealth was present to them it was only in so
 far as it was bound with that other success. Mrs. Gould, an orphan from
 early childhood and without fortune, brought up in an atmosphere of
 intellectual interests, had never considered the aspects of great
 wealth. They were too remote, and she had not learned that they were
 desirable. On the other hand, she had not known anything of absolute
 want. Even the very poverty of her aunt, the Marchesa, had nothing
 intolerable to a refined mind; it seemed in accord with a great grief:
 it had the austerity of a sacrifice offered to a noble ideal. Thus even
 the most legitimate touch of materialism was wanting in Mrs. Gould's
 character. The dead man of whom she thought with tenderness (because
 he was Charley's father) and with some impatience (because he had been
 weak), must be put completely in the wrong. Nothing else would do
 to keep their prosperity without a stain on its only real, on its
 immaterial side!
 
 Charles Gould, on his part, had been obliged to keep the idea of wealth
 well to the fore; but he brought it forward as a means, not as an end.
 Unless the mine was good business it could not be touched. He had to
 insist on that aspect of the enterprise. It was his lever to move
 men who had capital. And Charles Gould believed in the mine. He
--**--**--
 His uncle went into politics, was the last Provincial President of
 Sulaco, and got shot after a battle. His father was a prominent business
 man in Sta. Marta, tried to keep clear of their politics, and died
 ruined after a lot of revolutions. And that's your Costaguana in a
 nutshell."
 
 Of course, he was too great a man to be questioned as to his motives,
 even by his intimates. The outside world was at liberty to wonder
 respectfully at the hidden meaning of his actions. He was so great a man
 that his lavish patronage of the "purer forms of Christianity" (which in
 its naive form of church-building amused Mrs. Gould) was looked upon by
 his fellow-citizens as the manifestation of a pious and humble spirit.
 But in his own circles of the financial world the taking up of such a
 thing as the San Tome mine was regarded with respect, indeed, but rather
 as a subject for discreet jocularity. It was a great man's caprice. In
 the great Holroyd building (an enormous pile of iron, glass, and blocks
 of stone at the corner of two streets, cobwebbed aloft by the radiation
 of telegraph wires) the heads of principal departments exchanged
 humorous glances, which meant that they were not let into the secrets
 of the San Tome business. The Costaguana mail (it was never large--one
 fairly heavy envelope) was taken unopened straight into the great man's
 room, and no instructions dealing with it had ever been issued thence.
 The office whispered that he answered personally--and not by dictation
 either, but actually writing in his own hand, with pen and ink, and, it
 was to be supposed, taking a copy in his own private press copy-book,
 inaccessible to profane eyes. Some scornful young men, insignificant
 pieces of minor machinery in that eleven-storey-high workshop of great
--**--**--
 knowledge of true peasantry, she was able to appreciate the great worth
 of the people. She saw the man under the silent, sad-eyed beast of
 burden. She saw them on the road carrying loads, lonely figures upon
 the plain, toiling under great straw hats, with their white clothing
 flapping about their limbs in the wind; she remembered the villages by
 some group of Indian women at the fountain impressed upon her memory,
 by the face of some young Indian girl with a melancholy and sensual
 profile, raising an earthenware vessel of cool water at the door of a
 dark hut with a wooden porch cumbered with great brown jars. The solid
 wooden wheels of an ox-cart, halted with its shafts in the dust, showed
 the strokes of the axe; and a party of charcoal carriers, with each
 man's load resting above his head on the top of the low mud wall, slept
 stretched in a row within the strip of shade.
 
 The heavy stonework of bridges and churches left by the conquerors
 proclaimed the disregard of human labour, the tribute-labour of vanished
 nations. The power of king and church was gone, but at the sight of
 some heavy ruinous pile overtopping from a knoll the low mud walls of a
 village, Don Pepe would interrupt the tale of his campaigns to exclaim--
 
 "Poor Costaguana! Before, it was everything for the Padres, nothing for
 the people; and now it is everything for those great politicos in Sta.
 Marta, for negroes and thieves."
 
 Charles talked with the alcaldes, with the fiscales, with the
 principal people in towns, and with the caballeros on the estates. The
 commandantes of the districts offered him escorts--for he could show an
 authorization from the Sulaco political chief of the day. How much the
 document had cost him in gold twenty-dollar pieces was a secret between
--**--**--
 that," he suggested in a business-like manner.
 
 "I have already sent a memorial," said Charles Gould, steadily, "and I
 reckon now confidently upon your Excellency's favourable conclusions."
 
 The Excellency was a man of many moods. With the receipt of the money
 a great mellowness had descended upon his simple soul. Unexpectedly he
 fetched a deep sigh.
 
 "Ah, Don Carlos! What we want is advanced men like you in the province.
 The lethargy--the lethargy of these aristocrats! The want of public
 spirit! The absence of all enterprise! I, with my profound studies in
 Europe, you understand--"
 
 With one hand thrust into his swelling bosom, he rose and fell on
 his toes, and for ten minutes, almost without drawing breath, went on
 hurling himself intellectually to the assault of Charles Gould's polite
 silence; and when, stopping abruptly, he fell back into his chair,
 it was as though he had been beaten off from a fortress. To save his
 dignity he hastened to dismiss this silent man with a solemn
 inclination of the head and the words, pronounced with moody, fatigued
 condescension--
 
 "You may depend upon my enlightened goodwill as long as your conduct as
 a good citizen deserves it."
 
 He took up a paper fan and began to cool himself with a consequential
 air, while Charles Gould bowed and withdrew. Then he dropped the fan
 at once, and stared with an appearance of wonder and perplexity at the
 closed door for quite a long time. At last he shrugged his shoulders as
 if to assure himself of his disdain. Cold, dull. No intellectuality. Red
 hair. A true Englishman. He despised him.
 
 His face darkened. What meant this unimpressed and frigid behaviour? He
 was the first of the successive politicians sent out from the capital
 to rule the Occidental Province whom the manner of Charles Gould in
--**--**--
 
 Thus professionally spoke Don Pepe, the fighter, with pendent
 moustaches, a nut-brown, lean face, and a clean run of a cast-iron jaw,
 suggesting the type of a cattle-herd horseman from the great Llanos of
 the South. "If you will listen to an old officer of Paez, senores," was
 the exordium of all his speeches in the Aristocratic Club of Sulaco,
 where he was admitted on account of his past services to the extinct
 cause of Federation. The club, dating from the days of the proclamation
 of Costaguana's independence, boasted many names of liberators amongst
 its first founders. Suppressed arbitrarily innumerable times by
 various Governments, with memories of proscriptions and of at least one
 wholesale massacre of its members, sadly assembled for a banquet by the
 order of a zealous military commandante (their bodies were afterwards
 stripped naked and flung into the plaza out of the windows by the
 lowest scum of the populace), it was again flourishing, at that period,
 peacefully. It extended to strangers the large hospitality of the cool,
 big rooms of its historic quarters in the front part of a house, once
 the residence of a high official of the Holy Office. The two wings, shut
 up, crumbled behind the nailed doors, and what may be described as a
 grove of young orange trees grown in the unpaved patio concealed the
 utter ruin of the back part facing the gate. You turned in from the
 street, as if entering a secluded orchard, where you came upon the foot
 of a disjointed staircase, guarded by a moss-stained effigy of some
 saintly bishop, mitred and staffed, and bearing the indignity of a
 broken nose meekly, with his fine stone hands crossed on his breast. The
 chocolate-coloured faces of servants with mops of black hair peeped
 at you from above; the click of billiard balls came to your ears, and
--**--**--
 wary eye on the shadows of the road, for one is liable to meet bad men
 when travelling late on the Campo.
 
 And it was not only the men that Don Pepe knew so well, but he seemed
 able, with one attentive, thoughtful glance, to classify each woman,
 girl, or growing youth of his domain. It was only the small fry that
 puzzled him sometimes. He and the padre could be seen frequently side by
 side, meditative and gazing across the street of a village at a lot
 of sedate brown children, trying to sort them out, as it were, in low,
 consulting tones, or else they would together put searching questions
 as to the parentage of some small, staid urchin met wandering, naked and
 grave, along the road with a cigar in his baby mouth, and perhaps his
 mother's rosary, purloined for purposes of ornamentation, hanging in a
 loop of beads low down on his rotund little stomach. The spiritual and
 temporal pastors of the mine flock were very good friends. With Dr.
 Monygham, the medical pastor, who had accepted the charge from Mrs.
 Gould, and lived in the hospital building, they were on not so intimate
 terms. But no one could be on intimate terms with El Senor Doctor, who,
 with his twisted shoulders, drooping head, sardonic mouth, and side-long
 bitter glance, was mysterious and uncanny. The other two authorities
 worked in harmony. Father Roman, dried-up, small, alert, wrinkled,
 with big round eyes, a sharp chin, and a great snuff-taker, was an old
 campaigner, too; he had shriven many simple souls on the battlefields of
 the Republic, kneeling by the dying on hillsides, in the long grass, in
 the gloom of the forests, to hear the last confession with the smell
 of gunpowder smoke in his nostrils, the rattle of muskets, the hum
--**--**--
 his own room, the old Major would remark with a grim and soldierly
 cheeriness, "We are all playing our heads at this game."
 
 Don Jose Avellanos would mutter "Imperium in imperio, Emilia, my soul,"
 with an air of profound self-satisfaction which, somehow, in a curious
 way, seemed to contain a queer admixture of bodily discomfort. But that,
 perhaps, could only be visible to the initiated. And for the initiated
 it was a wonderful place, this drawing-room of the Casa Gould, with its
 momentary glimpses of the master--El Senor Administrador--older, harder,
 mysteriously silent, with the lines deepened on his English, ruddy,
 out-of-doors complexion; flitting on his thin cavalryman's legs across
 the doorways, either just "back from the mountain" or with jingling
 spurs and riding-whip under his arm, on the point of starting "for the
 mountain." Then Don Pepe, modestly martial in his chair, the llanero who
 seemed somehow to have found his martial jocularity, his knowledge
 of the world, and his manner perfect for his station, in the midst of
 savage armed contests with his kind; Avellanos, polished and familiar,
 the diplomatist with his loquacity covering much caution and wisdom in
 delicate advice, with his manuscript of a historical work on Costaguana,
 entitled "Fifty Years of Misrule," which, at present, he thought it was
 not prudent (even if it were possible) "to give to the world";
 these three, and also Dona Emilia amongst them, gracious, small,
 and fairy-like, before the glittering tea-set, with one common
 master-thought in their heads, with one common feeling of a tense
 situation, with one ever-present aim to preserve the inviolable
 character of the mine at every cost. And there was also to be seen
 Captain Mitchell, a little apart, near one of the long windows, with an
 air of old-fashioned neat old bachelorhood about him, slightly pompous,
--**--**--
 shipment for the North. Increasing in volume, and of immense value also;
 for, as Charles Gould told his wife once with some exultation, there had
 never been seen anything in the world to approach the vein of the
 Gould Concession. For them both, each passing of the escort under the
 balconies of the Casa Gould was like another victory gained in the
 conquest of peace for Sulaco.
 
 No doubt the initial action of Charles Gould had been helped at the
 beginning by a period of comparative peace which occurred just about
 that time; and also by the general softening of manners as compared with
 the epoch of civil wars whence had emerged the iron tyranny of Guzman
 Bento of fearful memory. In the contests that broke out at the end of
 his rule (which had kept peace in the country for a whole fifteen years)
 there was more fatuous imbecility, plenty of cruelty and suffering
 still, but much less of the old-time fierce and blindly ferocious
 political fanaticism. It was all more vile, more base, more
 contemptible, and infinitely more manageable in the very outspoken
 cynicism of motives. It was more clearly a brazen-faced scramble for a
 constantly diminishing quantity of booty; since all enterprise had been
 stupidly killed in the land. Thus it came to pass that the province of
 Sulaco, once the field of cruel party vengeances, had become in a way
 one of the considerable prizes of political career. The great of the
 earth (in Sta. Marta) reserved the posts in the old Occidental State
 to those nearest and dearest to them: nephews, brothers, husbands
 of favourite sisters, bosom friends, trusty supporters--or prominent
 supporters of whom perhaps they were afraid. It was the blessed province
 of great opportunities and of largest salaries; for the San Tome mine
--**--**--
 two green palm trees in the middle, floated lazily at the mainmast head
 of the Juno. A multitude of fireworks being let off in their thousands
 at the water's edge in honour of the President kept up a mysterious
 crepitating noise half round the harbour. Now and then a lot of rockets,
 swishing upwards invisibly, detonated overhead with only a puff of smoke
 in the bright sky. Crowds of people could be seen between the town gate
 and the harbour, under the bunches of multicoloured flags fluttering on
 tall poles. Faint bursts of military music would be heard suddenly, and
 the remote sound of shouting. A knot of ragged negroes at the end of the
 wharf kept on loading and firing a small iron cannon time after time. A
 greyish haze of dust hung thin and motionless against the sun.
 
 Don Vincente Ribiera made a few steps under the deck-awning, leaning on
 the arm of Senor Avellanos; a wide circle was formed round him, where
 the mirthless smile of his dark lips and the sightless glitter of his
 spectacles could be seen turning amiably from side to side. The
 informal function arranged on purpose on board the Juno to give the
 President-Dictator an opportunity to meet intimately some of his most
 notable adherents in Sulaco was drawing to an end. On one side, General
 Montero, his bald head covered now by a plumed cocked hat, remained
 motionless on a skylight seat, a pair of big gauntleted hands folded
 on the hilt of the sabre standing upright between his legs. The white
 plume, the coppery tint of his broad face, the blue-black of the
 moustaches under the curved beak, the mass of gold on sleeves and
 breast, the high shining boots with enormous spurs, the working
 nostrils, the imbecile and domineering stare of the glorious victor of
--**--**--
 a word to the Englishman."
 
 "The old Englishman who has enough money to pay for a railway? He is
 going off in an hour," remarked Nostromo, carelessly. "_Buon viaggio_,
 then. I've guarded his bones all the way from the Entrada pass down to
 the plain and into Sulaco, as though he had been my own father."
 
 Old Giorgio only moved his head sideways absently. Nostromo pointed
 after the Goulds' carriage, nearing the grass-grown gate in the old town
 wall that was like a wall of matted jungle.
 
 "And I have sat alone at night with my revolver in the Company's
 warehouse time and again by the side of that other Englishman's heap of
 silver, guarding it as though it had been my own."
 
 Viola seemed lost in thought. "It is a great thing for me," he repeated
 again, as if to himself.
 
 "It is," agreed the magnificent Capataz de Cargadores, calmly. "Listen,
 Vecchio--go in and bring me, out a cigar, but don't look for it in my
 room. There's nothing there."
 
 Viola stepped into the cafe and came out directly, still absorbed in his
 idea, and tendered him a cigar, mumbling thoughtfully in his moustache,
 "Children growing up--and girls, too! Girls!" He sighed and fell silent.
 
 "What, only one?" remarked Nostromo, looking down with a sort of comic
 inquisitiveness at the unconscious old man. "No matter," he added, with
 lofty negligence; "one is enough till another is wanted."
 
 He lit it and let the match drop from his passive fingers. Giorgio Viola
 looked up, and said abruptly--
 
 "My son would have been just such a fine young man as you, Gian'
 Battista, if he had lived."
 
 "What? Your son? But you are right, padrone. If he had been like me he
 would have been a man."
 
 He turned his horse slowly, and paced on between the booths, checking
--**--**--
 to the grins of the crowd.
 
 She pouted--very pretty--a little uneasy.
 
 "No, I will not ask for that. I can see love in your eyes." She laid
 her hand on his knee. "Why are you trembling like this? From love?" she
 continued, while the cavernous thundering of the gombo went on without a
 pause. "But if you love her as much as that, you must give your Paquita
 a gold-mounted rosary of beads for the neck of her Madonna."
 
 "No," said Nostromo, looking into her uplifted, begging eyes, which
 suddenly turned stony with surprise.
 
 "No? Then what else will your worship give me on the day of the fiesta?"
 she asked, angrily; "so as not to shame me before all these people."
 
 "There is no shame for thee in getting nothing from thy lover for once."
 
 "True! The shame is your worship's--my poor lover's," she flared up,
 sarcastically.
 
 Laughs were heard at her anger, at her retort. What an audacious
 spitfire she was! The people aware of this scene were calling out
 urgently to others in the crowd. The circle round the silver-grey mare
 narrowed slowly.
 
 The girl went off a pace or two, confronting the mocking curiosity of
 the eyes, then flung back to the stirrup, tiptoeing, her enraged face
 turned up to Nostromo with a pair of blazing eyes. He bent low to her in
 the saddle.
 
 "Juan," she hissed, "I could stab thee to the heart!"
 
 The dreaded Capataz de Cargadores, magnificent and carelessly public
 in his amours, flung his arm round her neck and kissed her spluttering
 lips. A murmur went round.
 
 "A knife!" he demanded at large, holding her firmly by the shoulder.
 
 Twenty blades flashed out together in the circle. A young man in holiday
 attire, bounding in, thrust one in Nostromo's hand and bounded back into
--**--**--
 officially in petitions) was not averse from the exercise of rational
 clemency. The irregular report of the firing squad would be heard,
 followed sometimes by a single finishing shot; a little bluish cloud
 of smoke would float up above the green bushes, and the Army of
 Pacification would move on over the savannas, through the forests,
 crossing rivers, invading rural pueblos, devastating the haciendas of
 the horrid aristocrats, occupying the inland towns in the fulfilment of
 its patriotic mission, and leaving behind a united land wherein the evil
 taint of Federalism could no longer be detected in the smoke of burning
 houses and the smell of spilt blood. Don Jose Avellanos had survived
 that time. Perhaps, when contemptuously signifying to him his release,
 the Citizen Saviour of the Country might have thought this benighted
 aristocrat too broken in health and spirit and fortune to be any longer
 dangerous. Or, perhaps, it may have been a simple caprice. Guzman Bento,
 usually full of fanciful fears and brooding suspicions, had sudden
 accesses of unreasonable self-confidence when he perceived himself
 elevated on a pinnacle of power and safety beyond the reach of mere
 mortal plotters. At such times he would impulsively command the
 celebration of a solemn Mass of thanksgiving, which would be sung in
 great pomp in the cathedral of Sta. Marta by the trembling, subservient
 Archbishop of his creation. He heard it sitting in a gilt armchair
 placed before the high altar, surrounded by the civil and military heads
 of his Government. The unofficial world of Sta. Marta would crowd into
 the cathedral, for it was not quite safe for anybody of mark to stay
 away from these manifestations of presidential piety. Having thus
 acknowledged the only power he was at all disposed to recognize as
 above himself, he would scatter acts of political grace in a sardonic
--**--**--
 Mrs. Gould in her landau--"and then, senora, we shall convert our swords
 into plough-shares and grow rich. Even I, myself, as soon as this little
 business is settled, shall open a fundacion on some land I have on the
 llanos and try to make a little money in peace and quietness. Senora,
 you know, all Costaguana knows--what do I say?--this whole South
 American continent knows, that Pablo Barrios has had his fill of
 military glory."
 
 Charles Gould was not present at the anxious and patriotic send-off. It
 was not his part to see the soldiers embark. It was neither his part,
 nor his inclination, nor his policy. His part, his inclination, and
 his policy were united in one endeavour to keep unchecked the flow of
 treasure he had started single-handed from the re-opened scar in the
 flank of the mountain. As the mine developed he had trained for himself
 some native help. There were foremen, artificers and clerks, with Don
 Pepe for the gobernador of the mining population. For the rest his
 shoulders alone sustained the whole weight of the "Imperium in Imperio,"
 the great Gould Concession whose mere shadow had been enough to crush
 the life out of his father.
 
 Mrs. Gould had no silver mine to look after. In the general life of the
 Gould Concession she was represented by her two lieutenants, the doctor
 and the priest, but she fed her woman's love of excitement on events
 whose significance was purified to her by the fire of her imaginative
 purpose. On that day she had brought the Avellanos, father and daughter,
 down to the harbour with her.
 
 Amongst his other activities of that stirring time, Don Jose had become
 the chairman of a Patriotic Committee which had armed a great proportion
 of troops in the Sulaco command with an improved model of a military
--**--**--
 
 He had known her some eight years since, shortly before the Avellanos
 had left Europe for good, as a tall girl of sixteen, youthfully
 austere, and of a character already so formed that she ventured to treat
 slightingly his pose of disabused wisdom. On one occasion, as though she
 had lost all patience, she flew out at him about the aimlessness of his
 life and the levity of his opinions. He was twenty then, an only son,
 spoiled by his adoring family. This attack disconcerted him so greatly
 that he had faltered in his affectation of amused superiority before
 that insignificant chit of a school-girl. But the impression left was so
 strong that ever since all the girl friends of his sisters recalled to
 him Antonia Avellanos by some faint resemblance, or by the great force
 of contrast. It was, he told himself, like a ridiculous fatality. And,
 of course, in the news the Decouds received regularly from Costaguana,
 the name of their friends, the Avellanos, cropped up frequently--the
 arrest and the abominable treatment of the ex-Minister, the dangers and
 hardships endured by the family, its withdrawal in poverty to Sulaco,
 the death of the mother.
 
 The Monterist pronunciamento had taken place before Martin Decoud
 reached Costaguana. He came out in a roundabout way, through Magellan's
 Straits by the main line and the West Coast Service of the O.S.N.
 Company. His precious consignment arrived just in time to convert the
 first feelings of consternation into a mood of hope and resolution.
 Publicly he was made much of by the _familias principales_. Privately Don
 Jose, still shaken and weak, embraced him with tears in his eyes.
 
 "You have come out yourself! No less could be expected from a Decoud.
 Alas! our worst fears have been realized," he moaned, affectionately.
 And again he hugged his god-son. This was indeed the time for men of
--**--**--
 to be uttered in words even to her husband. She understood his voiceless
 reserve better now. Their confidential intercourse fell, not in moments
 of privacy, but precisely in public, when the quick meeting of their
 glances would comment upon some fresh turn of events. She had gone to
 his school of uncompromising silence, the only one possible, since so
 much that seemed shocking, weird, and grotesque in the working out of
 their purposes had to be accepted as normal in this country. Decidedly,
 the stately Antonia looked more mature and infinitely calm; but she
 would never have known how to reconcile the sudden sinkings of her heart
 with an amiable mobility of expression.
 
 Mrs. Gould smiled a good-bye at Barrios, nodded round to the Europeans
 (who raised their hats simultaneously) with an engaging invitation, "I
 hope to see you all presently, at home"; then said nervously to Decoud,
 "Get in, Don Martin," and heard him mutter to himself in French, as he
 opened the carriage door, "_Le sort en est jete_." She heard him with a
 sort of exasperation. Nobody ought to have known better than himself
 that the first cast of dice had been already thrown long ago in a most
 desperate game. Distant acclamations, words of command yelled out, and a
 roll of drums on the jetty greeted the departing general. Something like
 a slight faintness came over her, and she looked blankly at Antonia's
 still face, wondering what would happen to Charley if that absurd man
 failed. "A la casa, Ignacio," she cried at the motionless broad back of
 the coachman, who gathered the reins without haste, mumbling to himself
 under his breath, "Si, la casa. Si, si nina."
 
 The carriage rolled noiselessly on the soft track, the shadows fell
 long on the dusty little plain interspersed with dark bushes, mounds
--**--**--
 know." It would give him the pull over a lot of chaps all through life,
 he asserted. "Therefore--down with Montero! Mrs. Gould." His artless
 grin disappeared slowly before the unanimous gravity of the faces turned
 upon him from the carriage; only that "old chap," Don Jose, presenting a
 motionless, waxy profile, stared straight on as if deaf. Scarfe did not
 know the Avellanos very well. They did not give balls, and Antonia never
 appeared at a ground-floor window, as some other young ladies used to do
 attended by elder women, to chat with the caballeros on horseback in
 the Calle. The stares of these creoles did not matter much; but what on
 earth had come to Mrs. Gould? She said, "Go on, Ignacio," and gave him
 a slow inclination of the head. He heard a short laugh from that
 round-faced, Frenchified fellow. He coloured up to the eyes, and stared
 at Giorgio Viola, who had fallen back with the children, hat in hand.
 
 "I shall want a horse presently," he said with some asperity to the old
 man.
 
 "Si, senor. There are plenty of horses," murmured the Garibaldino,
 smoothing absently, with his brown hands, the two heads, one dark with
 bronze glints, the other fair with a coppery ripple, of the two girls by
 his side. The returning stream of sightseers raised a great dust on the
 road. Horsemen noticed the group. "Go to your mother," he said. "They
 are growing up as I am growing older, and there is nobody--"
 
 He looked at the young engineer and stopped, as if awakened from a
 dream; then, folding his arms on his breast, took up his usual position,
 leaning back in the doorway with an upward glance fastened on the white
 shoulder of Higuerota far away.
 
 In the carriage Martin Decoud, shifting his position as though he could
--**--**--
 of the people streaming back from a military spectacle with silent
 footsteps on the dust of the road. It was a material train returning
 from the Campo to the palisaded yards. The empty cars rolled lightly
 on the single track; there was no rumble of wheels, no tremor of the
 ground. The engine-driver, running past the Casa Viola with the salute
 of an uplifted arm, checked his speed smartly before entering the yard;
 and when the ear-splitting screech of the steam-whistle for the brakes
 had stopped, a series of hard, battering shocks, mingled with the
 clanking of chain-couplings, made a tumult of blows and shaken fetters
 under the vault of the gate.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER FIVE
 
 The Gould carriage was the first to return from the harbour to the empty
 town. On the ancient pavement, laid out in patterns, sunk into ruts and
 holes, the portly Ignacio, mindful of the springs of the Parisian-built
 landau, had pulled up to a walk, and Decoud in his corner contemplated
 moodily the inner aspect of the gate. The squat turreted sides held up
 between them a mass of masonry with bunches of grass growing at the top,
 and a grey, heavily scrolled, armorial shield of stone above the apex of
 the arch with the arms of Spain nearly smoothed out as if in readiness
 for some new device typical of the impending progress.
 
 The explosive noise of the railway trucks seemed to augment Decoud's
 irritation. He muttered something to himself, then began to talk aloud
 in curt, angry phrases thrown at the silence of the two women. They did
 not look at him at all; while Don Jose, with his semi-translucent, waxy
 complexion, overshadowed by the soft grey hat, swayed a little to the
 jolts of the carriage by the side of Mrs. Gould.
--**--**--
 
 "This is sheer calumny," said Antonia, not very severely.
 
 "You just ask him to throw his mine into the melting-pot for the great
 cause," Decoud whispered.
 
 Don Jose had raised his voice. He rubbed his hands cheerily. The
 excellent aspect of the troops and the great quantity of new deadly
 rifles on the shoulders of those brave men seemed to fill him with an
 ecstatic confidence.
 
 Charles Gould, very tall and thin before his chair, listened, but
 nothing could be discovered in his face except a kind and deferential
 attention.
 
 Meantime, Antonia had risen, and, crossing the room, stood looking out
 of one of the three long windows giving on the street. Decoud followed
 her. The window was thrown open, and he leaned against the thickness of
 the wall. The long folds of the damask curtain, falling straight from
 the broad brass cornice, hid him partly from the room. He folded his
 arms on his breast, and looked steadily at Antonia's profile.
 
 The people returning from the harbour filled the pavements; the shuffle
 of sandals and a low murmur of voices ascended to the window. Now and
 then a coach rolled slowly along the disjointed roadway of the Calle de
 la Constitucion. There were not many private carriages in Sulaco; at the
 most crowded hour on the Alameda they could be counted with one glance
 of the eye. The great family arks swayed on high leathern springs, full
 of pretty powdered faces in which the eyes looked intensely alive
 and black. And first Don Juste Lopez, the President of the Provincial
 Assembly, passed with his three lovely daughters, solemn in a black
 frock-coat and stiff white tie, as when directing a debate from a high
 tribune. Though they all raised their eyes, Antonia did not make the
 usual greeting gesture of a fluttered hand, and they affected not to
--**--**--
 know? Opposite the door with the inscription, _Intrada de la Sombra_.'
 Appropriate, perhaps! That's where the uncle of our host gave up his
 Anglo-South-American soul. And, note, he might have run away. A man
 who has fought with weapons may run away. You might have let me go
 with Barrios if you had cared for me. I would have carried one of those
 rifles, in which Don Jose believes, with the greatest satisfaction, in
 the ranks of poor peons and Indios, that know nothing either of reason
 or politics. The most forlorn hope in the most forlorn army on earth
 would have been safer than that for which you made me stay here. When
 you make war you may retreat, but not when you spend your time in
 inciting poor ignorant fools to kill and to die."
 
 His tone remained light, and as if unaware of his presence she stood
 motionless, her hands clasped lightly, the fan hanging down from her
 interlaced fingers. He waited for a while, and then--
 
 "I shall go to the wall," he said, with a sort of jocular desperation.
 
 Even that declaration did not make her look at him. Her head remained
 still, her eyes fixed upon the house of the Avellanos, whose chipped
 pilasters, broken cornices, the whole degradation of dignity was hidden
 now by the gathering dusk of the street. In her whole figure her lips
 alone moved, forming the words--
 
 "Martin, you will make me cry."
 
 He remained silent for a minute, startled, as if overwhelmed by a sort
 of awed happiness, with the lines of the mocking smile still stiffened
 about his mouth, and incredulous surprise in his eyes. The value of a
 sentence is in the personality which utters it, for nothing new can be
 said by man or woman; and those were the last words, it seemed to him,
--**--**--
 plaza end of the street the glowing coals in the brazeros of the market
 women cooking their evening meal gleamed red along the edge of the
 pavement. A man appeared without a sound in the light of a street lamp,
 showing the coloured inverted triangle of his bordered poncho, square on
 his shoulders, hanging to a point below his knees. From the harbour
 end of the Calle a horseman walked his soft-stepping mount, gleaming
 silver-grey abreast each lamp under the dark shape of the rider.
 
 "Behold the illustrious Capataz de Cargadores," said Decoud, gently,
 "coming in all his splendour after his work is done. The next great man
 of Sulaco after Don Carlos Gould. But he is good-natured, and let me
 make friends with him."
 
 "Ah, indeed!" said Antonia. "How did you make friends?"
 
 "A journalist ought to have his finger on the popular pulse, and this
 man is one of the leaders of the populace. A journalist ought to know
 remarkable men--and this man is remarkable in his way."
 
 "Ah, yes!" said Antonia, thoughtfully. "It is known that this Italian
 has a great influence."
 
 The horseman had passed below them, with a gleam of dim light on the
 shining broad quarters of the grey mare, on a bright heavy stirrup, on a
 long silver spur; but the short flick of yellowish flame in the dusk was
 powerless against the muffled-up mysteriousness of the dark figure with
 an invisible face concealed by a great sombrero.
 
 Decoud and Antonia remained leaning over the balcony, side by side,
 touching elbows, with their heads overhanging the darkness of the
 street, and the brilliantly lighted sala at their backs. This was a
 tete-a-tete of extreme impropriety; something of which in the whole
 extent of the Republic only the extraordinary Antonia could be
 capable--the poor, motherless girl, never accompanied, with a careless
--**--**--
 sierra seemed to have lost its cooling power in the sudden melting of
 the snows. His whisper could not have carried so far, though there was
 enough ardour in his tone to melt a heart of ice. Antonia turned away
 abruptly, as if to carry his whispered assurance into the room behind,
 full of light, noisy with voices.
 
 The tide of political speculation was beating high within the four walls
 of the great sala, as if driven beyond the marks by a great gust of
 hope. Don Juste's fan-shaped beard was still the centre of loud and
 animated discussions. There was a self-confident ring in all the
 voices. Even the few Europeans around Charles Gould--a Dane, a couple
 of Frenchmen, a discreet fat German, smiling, with down-cast eyes, the
 representatives of those material interests that had got a footing in
 Sulaco under the protecting might of the San Tome mine--had infused a
 lot of good humour into their deference. Charles Gould, to whom they
 were paying their court, was the visible sign of the stability that
 could be achieved on the shifting ground of revolutions. They felt
 hopeful about their various undertakings. One of the two Frenchmen,
 small, black, with glittering eyes lost in an immense growth of bushy
 beard, waved his tiny brown hands and delicate wrists. He had been
 travelling in the interior of the province for a syndicate of European
 capitalists. His forcible "_Monsieur l'Administrateur_" returning every
 minute shrilled above the steady hum of conversations. He was relating
 his discoveries. He was ecstatic. Charles Gould glanced down at him
 courteously.
 
 At a given moment of these necessary receptions it was Mrs. Gould's
 habit to withdraw quietly into a little drawing-room, especially her
 own, next to the great sala. She had risen, and, waiting for Antonia,
 listened with a slightly worried graciousness to the engineer-in-chief
--**--**--
 political action.
 
 Don Jose obeyed the touch of the big hairy hand. Decoud followed out the
 brothers-in-law. And there remained only one visitor in the vast empty
 sala, bluishly hazy with tobacco smoke, a heavy-eyed, round-cheeked man,
 with a drooping moustache, a hide merchant from Esmeralda, who had come
 overland to Sulaco, riding with a few peons across the coast range.
 He was very full of his journey, undertaken mostly for the purpose
 of seeing the Senor Administrador of San Tome in relation to some
 assistance he required in his hide-exporting business. He hoped to
 enlarge it greatly now that the country was going to be settled. It was
 going to be settled, he repeated several times, degrading by a strange,
 anxious whine the sonority of the Spanish language, which he pattered
 rapidly, like some sort of cringing jargon. A plain man could carry
 on his little business now in the country, and even think of enlarging
 it--with safety. Was it not so? He seemed to beg Charles Gould for a
 confirmatory word, a grunt of assent, a simple nod even.
 
 He could get nothing. His alarm increased, and in the pauses he would
 dart his eyes here and there; then, loth to give up, he would branch
 off into feeling allusion to the dangers of his journey. The audacious
 Hernandez, leaving his usual haunts, had crossed the Campo of Sulaco,
 and was known to be lurking in the ravines of the coast range.
 Yesterday, when distant only a few hours from Sulaco, the hide merchant
 and his servants had seen three men on the road arrested suspiciously,
 with their horses' heads together. Two of these rode off at once and
 disappeared in a shallow quebrada to the left. "We stopped," continued
 the man from Esmeralda, "and I tried to hide behind a small bush. But
--**--**--
 where to go for dynamite should we get short at any time. We have done
 cutting and chopping for a while now. We shall begin soon to blast our
 way through."
 
 "Don't come to me," said Charles Gould, with perfect serenity. "I
 shan't have an ounce to spare for anybody. Not an ounce. Not for my own
 brother, if I had a brother, and he were the engineer-in-chief of the
 most promising railway in the world."
 
 "What's that?" asked the engineer-in-chief, with equanimity.
 "Unkindness?"
 
 "No," said Charles Gould, stolidly. "Policy."
 
 "Radical, I should think," the engineer-in-chief observed from the
 doorway.
 
 "Is that the right name?" Charles Gould said, from the middle of the
 room.
 
 "I mean, going to the roots, you know," the engineer explained, with an
 air of enjoyment.
 
 "Why, yes," Charles pronounced, slowly. "The Gould Concession has struck
 such deep roots in this country, in this province, in that gorge of the
 mountains, that nothing but dynamite shall be allowed to dislodge it
 from there. It's my choice. It's my last card to play."
 
 The engineer-in-chief whistled low. "A pretty game," he said, with a
 shade of discretion. "And have you told Holroyd of that extraordinary
 trump card you hold in your hand?"
 
 "Card only when it's played; when it falls at the end of the game. Till
 then you may call it a--a--"
 
 "Weapon," suggested the railway man.
 
 "No. You may call it rather an argument," corrected Charles Gould,
 gently. "And that's how I've presented it to Mr. Holroyd."
 
 "And what did he say to it?" asked the engineer, with undisguised
 interest.
 
 "He"--Charles Gould spoke after a slight pause--"he said something
 about holding on like grim death and putting our trust in God. I should
 imagine he must have been rather startled. But then"--pursued the
 Administrador of the San Tome mine--"but then, he is very far away, you
--**--**--
 "Go and look for it in the patio again. Go now, my friend; look for it
 on the steps, under the gate; examine every flagstone; search for it
 till I come down again. . . . That fellow"--he addressed himself in
 English to Mrs. Gould--"is always stealing up behind one's back on his
 bare feet. I set him to look for that fan directly I came in to justify
 my reappearance, my sudden return."
 
 He paused and Mrs. Gould said, amiably, "You are always welcome." She
 paused for a second, too. "But I am waiting to learn the cause of your
 return."
 
 Decoud affected suddenly the utmost nonchalance.
 
 "I can't bear to be spied upon. Oh, the cause? Yes, there is a cause;
 there is something else that is lost besides Antonia's favourite fan. As
 I was walking home after seeing Don Jose and Antonia to their house, the
 Capataz de Cargadores, riding down the street, spoke to me."
 
 "Has anything happened to the Violas?" inquired Mrs. Gould.
 
 "The Violas? You mean the old Garibaldino who keeps the hotel where
 the engineers live? Nothing happened there. The Capataz said nothing
 of them; he only told me that the telegraphist of the Cable Company was
 walking on the Plaza, bareheaded, looking out for me. There is news from
 the interior, Mrs. Gould. I should rather say rumours of news."
 
 "Good news?" said Mrs. Gould in a low voice.
 
 "Worthless, I should think. But if I must define them, I would say bad.
 They are to the effect that a two days' battle had been fought near Sta.
 Marta, and that the Ribierists are defeated. It must have happened a few
 days ago--perhaps a week. The rumour has just reached Cayta, and the
 man in charge of the cable station there has telegraphed the news to his
--**--**--
 earth do you mean?"
 
 "Yes," conceded Decoud, "it's a wonderful thing to say with the sight
 of the San Tome mine, the greatest fact in the whole of South America,
 perhaps, before our very eyes. But look even at that, he has idealized
 this fact to a point--" He paused. "Mrs. Gould, are you aware to what
 point he has idealized the existence, the worth, the meaning of the San
 Tome mine? Are you aware of it?"
 
 He must have known what he was talking about.
 
 The effect he expected was produced. Mrs. Gould, ready to take fire,
 gave it up suddenly with a low little sound that resembled a moan.
 
 "What do you know?" she asked in a feeble voice.
 
 "Nothing," answered Decoud, firmly. "But, then, don't you see, he's an
 Englishman?"
 
 "Well, what of that?" asked Mrs. Gould.
 
 "Simply that he cannot act or exist without idealizing every simple
 feeling, desire, or achievement. He could not believe his own motives if
 he did not make them first a part of some fairy tale. The earth is not
 quite good enough for him, I fear. Do you excuse my frankness? Besides,
 whether you excuse it or not, it is part of the truth of things which
 hurts the--what do you call them?--the Anglo-Saxon's susceptibilities,
 and at the present moment I don't feel as if I could treat seriously
 either his conception of things or--if you allow me to say so--or yet
 yours."
 
 Mrs. Gould gave no sign of being offended. "I suppose Antonia
 understands you thoroughly?"
 
 "Understands? Well, yes. But I am not sure that she approves. That,
 however, makes no difference. I am honest enough to tell you that, Mrs.
 Gould."
 
 "Your idea, of course, is separation," she said.
 
 "Separation, of course," declared Martin. "Yes; separation of the whole
--**--**--
 of your people. I have been watching El Rey de Sulaco since I came here
 on a fool's errand, and perhaps impelled by some treason of fate lurking
 behind the unaccountable turns of a man's life. But I don't matter, I am
 not a sentimentalist, I cannot endow my personal desires with a shining
 robe of silk and jewels. Life is not for me a moral romance derived from
 the tradition of a pretty fairy tale. No, Mrs. Gould; I am practical. I
 am not afraid of my motives. But, pardon me, I have been rather carried
 away. What I wish to say is that I have been observing. I won't tell you
 what I have discovered--"
 
 "No. That is unnecessary," whispered Mrs. Gould, once more averting her
 head.
 
 "It is. Except one little fact, that your husband does not like me.
 It's a small matter, which, in the circumstances, seems to acquire a
 perfectly ridiculous importance. Ridiculous and immense; for, clearly,
 money is required for my plan," he reflected; then added, meaningly,
 "and we have two sentimentalists to deal with."
 
 "I don't know that I understand you, Don Martin," said Mrs. Gould,
 coldly, preserving the low key of their conversation. "But, speaking as
 if I did, who is the other?"
 
 "The great Holroyd in San Francisco, of course," Decoud whispered,
 lightly. "I think you understand me very well. Women are idealists; but
 then they are so perspicacious."
 
 But whatever was the reason of that remark, disparaging and
 complimentary at the same time, Mrs. Gould seemed not to pay attention
 to it. The name of Holroyd had given a new tone to her anxiety.
 
 "The silver escort is coming down to the harbour tomorrow; a whole six
 months' working, Don Martin!" she cried in dismay.
 
 "Let it come down, then," breathed out Decoud, earnestly, almost into
--**--**--
 by the Company for their town station on one side of the Plaza, and
 Nostromo, whose Cargadores were sleeping under the arcades along
 the front of Anzani's shops. A fire of broken furniture out of the
 Intendencia saloons, mostly gilt, was burning on the Plaza, in a high
 flame swaying right upon the statue of Charles IV. The dead body of a
 man was lying on the steps of the pedestal, his arms thrown wide open,
 and his sombrero covering his face--the attention of some friend,
 perhaps. The light of the flames touched the foliage of the first trees
 on the Alameda, and played on the end of a side street near by, blocked
 up by a jumble of ox-carts and dead bullocks. Sitting on one of the
 carcasses, a lepero, muffled up, smoked a cigarette. It was a truce, you
 understand. The only other living being on the Plaza besides ourselves
 was a Cargador walking to and fro, with a long, bare knife in his hand,
 like a sentry before the Arcades, where his friends were sleeping. And
 the only other spot of light in the dark town were the lighted windows
 of the club, at the corner of the Calle."
 
 After having written so far, Don Martin Decoud, the exotic dandy of the
 Parisian boulevard, got up and walked across the sanded floor of the
 cafe at one end of the Albergo of United Italy, kept by Giorgio Viola,
 the old companion of Garibaldi. The highly coloured lithograph of the
 Faithful Hero seemed to look dimly, in the light of one candle, at the
 man with no faith in anything except the truth of his own sensations.
 Looking out of the window, Decoud was met by a darkness so impenetrable
 that he could see neither the mountains nor the town, nor yet the
--**--**--
 about through these shambles with a large bottle in one hand and a
 lot of cotton wool in the other. She just looked at me and never even
 winked. Her camerista was following her, also holding a bottle, and
 sobbing gently to herself.
 
 "I busied myself for some time in fetching water from the cistern for
 the wounded. Afterwards I wandered upstairs, meeting some of the first
 ladies of Sulaco, paler than I had ever seen them before, with bandages
 over their arms. Not all of them had fled to the ships. A good many had
 taken refuge for the day in the Casa Gould. On the landing a girl, with
 her hair half down, was kneeling against the wall under the niche where
 stands a Madonna in blue robes and a gilt crown on her head. I think
 it was the eldest Miss Lopez; I couldn't see her face, but I remember
 looking at the high French heel of her little shoe. She did not make
 a sound, she did not stir, she was not sobbing; she remained there,
 perfectly still, all black against the white wall, a silent figure of
 passionate piety. I am sure she was no more frightened than the other
 white-faced ladies I met carrying bandages. One was sitting on the top
 step tearing a piece of linen hastily into strips--the young wife of an
 elderly man of fortune here. She interrupted herself to wave her hand to
 my bow, as though she were in her carriage on the Alameda. The women
 of our country are worth looking at during a revolution. The rouge and
 pearl powder fall off, together with that passive attitude towards the
 outer world which education, tradition, custom impose upon them from the
 earliest infancy. I thought of your face, which from your infancy had
--**--**--
 sent for to go into the railway telegraph office. The engineer of the
 railhead, at the foot of the mountains, wanted to talk to him from his
 end of the wire. There was nobody in the office but himself and the
 operator of the railway telegraph, who read off the clicks aloud as the
 tape coiled its length upon the floor. And the purport of that talk,
 clicked nervously from a wooden shed in the depths of the forests,
 had informed the chief that President Ribiera had been, or was being,
 pursued. This was news, indeed, to all of us in Sulaco. Ribiera himself,
 when rescued, revived, and soothed by us, had been inclined to think
 that he had not been pursued.
 
 "Ribiera had yielded to the urgent solicitations of his friends, and had
 left the headquarters of his discomfited army alone, under the
 guidance of Bonifacio, the muleteer, who had been willing to take the
 responsibility with the risk. He had departed at daybreak of the third
 day. His remaining forces had melted away during the night. Bonifacio
 and he rode hard on horses towards the Cordillera; then they obtained
 mules, entered the passes, and crossed the Paramo of Ivie just before a
 freezing blast swept over that stony plateau, burying in a drift of
 snow the little shelter-hut of stones in which they had spent the night.
 Afterwards poor Ribiera had many adventures, got separated from his
 guide, lost his mount, struggled down to the Campo on foot, and if he
 had not thrown himself on the mercy of a ranchero would have perished a
 long way from Sulaco. That man, who, as a matter of fact, recognized
 him at once, let him have a fresh mule, which the fugitive, heavy and
 unskilful, had ridden to death. And it was true he had been pursued by
--**--**--
 "He joined me on the harbour road after I had passed them under the dark
 archway without stopping. It was a woman in trouble he had been talking
 to. Through discretion I kept silent while he walked by my side. After
 a time he began to talk himself. It was not what I expected. It was
 only an old woman, an old lace-maker, in search of her son, one of the
 street-sweepers employed by the municipality. Friends had come the day
 before at daybreak to the door of their hovel calling him out. He had
 gone with them, and she had not seen him since; so she had left the food
 she had been preparing half-cooked on the extinct embers and had crawled
 out as far as the harbour, where she had heard that some town mozos had
 been killed on the morning of the riot. One of the Cargadores guarding
 the Custom House had brought out a lantern, and had helped her to look
 at the few dead left lying about there. Now she was creeping back,
 having failed in her search. So she sat down on the stone seat under the
 arch, moaning, because she was very tired. The Capataz had questioned
 her, and after hearing her broken and groaning tale had advised her to
 go and look amongst the wounded in the patio of the Casa Gould. He had
 also given her a quarter dollar, he mentioned carelessly."
 
 "'Why did you do that?' I asked. 'Do you know her?'
 
 "'No, senor. I don't suppose I have ever seen her before. How should I?
 She has not probably been out in the streets for years. She is one
 of those old women that you find in this country at the back of huts,
 crouching over fireplaces, with a stick on the ground by their side, and
--**--**--
 profusion of snowy linen, amongst which the Padrona sat unpropped and
 bowed, her handsome, black-browed face bent over her chest. A mass of
 raven hair with only a few white threads in it covered her shoulders;
 one thick strand fallen forward half veiled her cheek. Perfectly
 motionless in that pose, expressing physical anxiety and unrest, she
 turned her eyes alone towards Nostromo.
 
 The Capataz had a red sash wound many times round his waist, and a heavy
 silver ring on the forefinger of the hand he raised to give a twist to
 his moustache.
 
 "Their revolutions, their revolutions," gasped Senora Teresa. "Look,
 Gian' Battista, it has killed me at last!"
 
 Nostromo said nothing, and the sick woman with an upward glance
 insisted. "Look, this one has killed me, while you were away fighting
 for what did not concern you, foolish man."
 
 "Why talk like this?" mumbled the Capataz between his teeth. "Will you
 never believe in my good sense? It concerns me to keep on being what I
 am: every day alike."
 
 "You never change, indeed," she said, bitterly. "Always thinking of
 yourself and taking your pay out in fine words from those who care
 nothing for you."
 
 There was between them an intimacy of antagonism as close in its way as
 the intimacy of accord and affection. He had not walked along the way
 of Teresa's expectations. It was she who had encouraged him to leave his
 ship, in the hope of securing a friend and defender for the girls. The
 wife of old Giorgio was aware of her precarious health, and was haunted
 by the fear of her aged husband's loneliness and the unprotected state
 of the children. She had wanted to annex that apparently quiet and
 steady young man, affectionate and pliable, an orphan from his tenderest
--**--**--
 figures with rifles leapt to the head of his horse; others closed upon
 him--cargadores of the company posted by Captain Mitchell on the watch.
 At a word from him they fell back with subservient murmurs, recognizing
 his voice. At the other end of the jetty, near a cargo crane, in a dark
 group with glowing cigars, his name was pronounced in a tone of relief.
 Most of the Europeans in Sulaco were there, rallied round Charles Gould,
 as if the silver of the mine had been the emblem of a common cause, the
 symbol of the supreme importance of material interests. They had loaded
 it into the lighter with their own hands. Nostromo recognized Don Carlos
 Gould, a thin, tall shape standing a little apart and silent, to whom
 another tall shape, the engineer-in-chief, said aloud, "If it must be
 lost, it is a million times better that it should go to the bottom of
 the sea."
 
 Martin Decoud called out from the lighter, "_Au revoir_, messieurs, till
 we clasp hands again over the new-born Occidental Republic." Only a
 subdued murmur responded to his clear, ringing tones; and then it seemed
 to him that the wharf was floating away into the night; but it was
 Nostromo, who was already pushing against a pile with one of the heavy
 sweeps. Decoud did not move; the effect was that of being launched
 into space. After a splash or two there was not a sound but the thud
 of Nostromo's feet leaping about the boat. He hoisted the big sail; a
 breath of wind fanned Decoud's cheek. Everything had vanished but the
 light of the lantern Captain Mitchell had hoisted upon the post at the
 end of the jetty to guide Nostromo out of the harbour.
 
 The two men, unable to see each other, kept silent till the lighter,
--**--**--
 I used to ride to Rincon to see a certain girl, after my work at the
 harbour was done. For years the rich rocks have been pouring down with a
 noise like thunder, and the miners say that there is enough at the heart
 of the mountain to thunder on for years and years to come. And yet, the
 day before yesterday, we have been fighting to save it from the mob,
 and to-night I am sent out with it into this darkness, where there is no
 wind to get away with; as if it were the last lot of silver on earth to
 get bread for the hungry with. Ha! ha! Well, I am going to make it the
 most famous and desperate affair of my life--wind or no wind. It shall
 be talked about when the little children are grown up and the grown
 men are old. Aha! the Monterists must not get hold of it, I am told,
 whatever happens to Nostromo the Capataz; and they shall not have it, I
 tell you, since it has been tied for safety round Nostromo's neck."
 
 "I see it," murmured Decoud. He saw, indeed, that his companion had his
 own peculiar view of this enterprise.
 
 Nostromo interrupted his reflections upon the way men's qualities are
 made use of, without any fundamental knowledge of their nature, by the
 proposal they should slip the long oars out and sweep the lighter in
 the direction of the Isabels. It wouldn't do for daylight to reveal
 the treasure floating within a mile or so of the harbour entrance. The
 denser the darkness generally, the smarter were the puffs of wind on
 which he had reckoned to make his way; but tonight the gulf, under its
 poncho of clouds, remained breathless, as if dead rather than asleep.
--**--**--
 affair," he said.
 
 "What was it, then? A joke?" snarled the man, who on the pay-sheets of
 the O.S.N. Company's establishment in Sulaco was described as "Foreman
 of the wharf" against the figure of his wages. "Was it for a joke they
 woke me up from my sleep after two days of street fighting to make me
 stake my life upon a bad card? Everybody knows, too, that I am not a
 lucky gambler."
 
 "Yes, everybody knows of your good luck with women, Capataz," Decoud
 propitiated his companion in a weary drawl.
 
 "Look here, senor," Nostromo went on. "I never even remonstrated about
 this affair. Directly I heard what was wanted I saw what a desperate
 affair it must be, and I made up my mind to see it out. Every minute was
 of importance. I had to wait for you first. Then, when we arrived at
 the Italia Una, old Giorgio shouted to me to go for the English doctor.
 Later on, that poor dying woman wanted to see me, as you know. Senor,
 I was reluctant to go. I felt already this cursed silver growing heavy
 upon my back, and I was afraid that, knowing herself to be dying, she
 would ask me to ride off again for a priest. Father Corbelan, who is
 fearless, would have come at a word; but Father Corbelan is far away,
 safe with the band of Hernandez, and the populace, that would have liked
 to tear him to pieces, are much incensed against the priests. Not
 a single fat padre would have consented to put his head out of his
 hiding-place to-night to save a Christian soul, except, perhaps, under
 my protection. That was in her mind. I pretended I did not believe she
 was going to die. Senor, I refused to fetch a priest for a dying
--**--**--
 treachery into a dangerous situation. Nostromo's nervous impatience
 passed into gloomy thoughtfulness. Decoud, in an undertone, as if
 speaking to himself, remarked that, after all, this bizarre event made
 no great difference. He could not conceive what harm the man could
 do. At most he would be in the way, like an inanimate and useless
 object--like a block of wood, for instance.
 
 "I would think twice before getting rid of a piece of wood," said
 Nostromo, calmly. "Something may happen unexpectedly where you could
 make use of it. But in an affair like ours a man like this ought to be
 thrown overboard. Even if he were as brave as a lion we would not want
 him here. We are not running away for our lives. Senor, there is no harm
 in a brave man trying to save himself with ingenuity and courage; but
 you have heard his tale, Don Martin. His being here is a miracle of
 fear--" Nostromo paused. "There is no room for fear in this lighter," he
 added through his teeth.
 
 Decoud had no answer to make. It was not a position for argument, for a
 display of scruples or feelings. There were a thousand ways in which
 a panic-stricken man could make himself dangerous. It was evident
 that Hirsch could not be spoken to, reasoned with, or persuaded into a
 rational line of conduct. The story of his own escape demonstrated that
 clearly enough. Decoud thought that it was a thousand pities the wretch
 had not died of fright. Nature, who had made him what he was, seemed to
 have calculated cruelly how much he could bear in the way of atrocious
 anguish without actually expiring. Some compassion was due to so much
 terror. Decoud, though imaginative enough for sympathy, resolved not
 to interfere with any action that Nostromo would take. But Nostromo did
--**--**--
 prospect of finding himself in the water and swimming, overwhelmed
 by ignorance and darkness, probably in a circle, till he sank from
 exhaustion, was revolting. The barren and cruel futility of such an end
 intimidated his affectation of careless pessimism. In comparison to it,
 the chance of being left floating in a boat, exposed to thirst, hunger,
 discovery, imprisonment, execution, presented itself with an aspect of
 amenity worth securing even at the cost of some self-contempt. He did
 not accept Nostromo's proposal that he should get into the boat at
 once. "Something sudden may overwhelm us, senor," the Capataz remarked
 promising faithfully, at the same time, to let go the painter at the
 moment when the necessity became manifest.
 
 But Decoud assured him lightly that he did not mean to take to the boat
 till the very last moment, and that then he meant the Capataz to come
 along, too. The darkness of the gulf was no longer for him the end of
 all things. It was part of a living world since, pervading it, failure
 and death could be felt at your elbow. And at the same time it was a
 shelter. He exulted in its impenetrable obscurity. "Like a wall, like a
 wall," he muttered to himself.
 
 The only thing which checked his confidence was the thought of Senor
 Hirsch. Not to have bound and gagged him seemed to Decoud now the height
 of improvident folly. As long as the miserable creature had the power to
 raise a yell he was a constant danger. His abject terror was mute now,
 but there was no saying from what cause it might suddenly find vent in
 shrieks.
 
 This very madness of fear which both Decoud and Nostromo had seen in
 the wild and irrational glances, and in the continuous twitchings of
--**--**--
 what use it could be for finding the way. To the vehement protestations
 of the ship's captain, he stamped his foot and tapped the handle of
 his sword. "Aha! I have unmasked you," he cried, triumphantly. "You are
 tearing your hair from despair at my acuteness. Am I a child to believe
 that a light in that brass box can show you where the harbour is? I am
 an old soldier, I am. I can smell a traitor a league off. You wanted
 that gleam to betray our approach to your friend the Englishman. A thing
 like that show you the way! What a miserable lie! Que picardia! You
 Sulaco people are all in the pay of those foreigners. You deserve to
 be run through the body with my sword." Other officers, crowding round,
 tried to calm his indignation, repeating persuasively, "No, no! This is
 an appliance of the mariners, major. This is no treachery." The captain
 of the transport flung himself face downwards on the bridge, and refused
 to rise. "Put an end to me at once," he repeated in a stifled voice.
 Sotillo had to interfere.
 
 The uproar and confusion on the bridge became so great that the helmsman
 fled from the wheel. He took refuge in the engine-room, and alarmed the
 engineers, who, disregarding the threats of the soldiers set on guard
 over them, stopped the engines, protesting that they would rather be
 shot than run the risk of being drowned down below.
 
 This was the first time Nostromo and Decoud heard the steamer stop.
 After order had been restored, and the binnacle lamp relighted, she went
 ahead again, passing wide of the lighter in her search for the Isabels.
 The group could not be made out, and, at the pitiful entreaties of the
 captain, Sotillo allowed the engines to be stopped again to wait for one
--**--**--
 very moment of being pitched head first over the transom, to struggle
 on his back in a lot of water. Senor Hirsch's shriek he had heard and
 recognized while he was regaining his feet, always with that mysterious
 sensation of being dragged headlong through the darkness. Not a word,
 not a cry escaped him; he had no time to see anything; and following
 upon the despairing screams for help, the dragging motion ceased so
 suddenly that he staggered forward with open arms and fell against the
 pile of the treasure boxes. He clung to them instinctively, in the
 vague apprehension of being flung about again; and immediately he heard
 another lot of shrieks for help, prolonged and despairing, not near
 him at all, but unaccountably in the distance, away from the lighter
 altogether, as if some spirit in the night were mocking at Senor
 Hirsch's terror and despair.
 
 Then all was still--as still as when you wake up in your bed in a dark
 room from a bizarre and agitated dream. The lighter rocked slightly; the
 rain was still falling. Two groping hands took hold of his bruised sides
 from behind, and the Capataz's voice whispered, in his ear, "Silence,
 for your life! Silence! The steamer has stopped."
 
 Decoud listened. The gulf was dumb. He felt the water nearly up to his
 knees. "Are we sinking?" he asked in a faint breath.
 
 "I don't know," Nostromo breathed back to him. "Senor, make not the
 slightest sound."
 
 Hirsch, when ordered forward by Nostromo, had not returned into his
 first hiding-place. He had fallen near the mast, and had no strength to
 rise; moreover, he feared to move. He had given himself up for dead,
 but not on any rational grounds. It was simply a cruel and terrifying
 feeling. Whenever he tried to think what would become of him his teeth
--**--**--
 as yet.
 
 The cargo-lighter, relieved of its precious burden, rocked feebly,
 half-afloat, with her fore-foot on the sand. A long rope stretched
 away like a black cotton thread across the strip of white beach to
 the grapnel Nostromo had carried ashore and hooked to the stem of a
 tree-like shrub in the very opening of the ravine.
 
 There was nothing for Decoud but to remain on the island. He received
 from Nostromo's hands whatever food the foresight of Captain Mitchell
 had put on board the lighter and deposited it temporarily in the little
 dinghy which on their arrival they had hauled up out of sight amongst
 the bushes. It was to be left with him. The island was to be a
 hiding-place, not a prison; he could pull out to a passing ship. The
 O.S.N. Company's mail boats passed close to the islands when going into
 Sulaco from the north. But the Minerva, carrying off the ex-president,
 had taken the news up north of the disturbances in Sulaco. It was
 possible that the next steamer down would get instructions to miss the
 port altogether since the town, as far as the Minerva's officers knew,
 was for the time being in the hands of the rabble. This would mean that
 there would be no steamer for a month, as far as the mail service went;
 but Decoud had to take his chance of that. The island was his only
 shelter from the proscription hanging over his head. The Capataz was,
 of course, going back. The unloaded lighter leaked much less, and he
 thought that she would keep afloat as far as the harbour.
 
 He passed to Decoud, standing knee-deep alongside, one of the two spades
 which belonged to the equipment of each lighter for use when ballasting
 ships. By working with it carefully as soon as there was daylight enough
--**--**--
 rather than in the cause of those material interests to which Charles
 Gould had pinned his faith. Amongst the cries of the mob not the least
 loud had been the cry of death to foreigners. It was, indeed, a lucky
 circumstance for Sulaco that the relations of those imported workmen
 with the people of the country had been uniformly bad from the first.
 
 Doctor Monygham, going to the door of Viola's kitchen, observed this
 retreat marking the end of the foreign interference, this withdrawal of
 the army of material progress from the field of Costaguana revolutions.
 
 Algarrobe torches carried on the outskirts of the moving body sent their
 penetrating aroma into his nostrils. Their light, sweeping along the
 front of the house, made the letters of the inscription, "Albergo
 d'ltalia Una," leap out black from end to end of the long wall. His eyes
 blinked in the clear blaze. Several young men, mostly fair and tall,
 shepherding this mob of dark bronzed heads, surmounted by the glint of
 slanting rifle barrels, nodded to him familiarly as they went by. The
 doctor was a well-known character. Some of them wondered what he was
 doing there. Then, on the flank of their workmen they tramped on,
 following the line of rails.
 
 "Withdrawing your people from the harbour?" said the doctor, addressing
 himself to the chief engineer of the railway, who had accompanied
 Charles Gould so far on his way to the town, walking by the side of the
 horse, with his hand on the saddle-bow. They had stopped just outside
 the open door to let the workmen cross the road.
 
 "As quick as I can. We are not a political faction," answered the
 engineer, meaningly. "And we are not going to give our new rulers a
 handle against the railway. You approve me, Gould?"
--**--**--
 up the mad English doctor, when it became apparent that for all his
 savage independence he could be tamed by kindness. Perhaps it was
 only hunger that had tamed him. In years gone by he had certainly been
 acquainted with Charles Gould's father in Sta. Marta; and now, no matter
 what were the dark passages of his history, as the medical officer of
 the San Tome mine he became a recognized personality. He was recognized,
 but not unreservedly accepted. So much defiant eccentricity and such
 an outspoken scorn for mankind seemed to point to mere recklessness of
 judgment, the bravado of guilt. Besides, since he had become again of
 some account, vague whispers had been heard that years ago, when fallen
 into disgrace and thrown into prison by Guzman Bento at the time of the
 so-called Great Conspiracy, he had betrayed some of his best friends
 amongst the conspirators. Nobody pretended to believe that whisper; the
 whole story of the Great Conspiracy was hopelessly involved and obscure;
 it is admitted in Costaguana that there never had been a conspiracy
 except in the diseased imagination of the Tyrant; and, therefore,
 nothing and no one to betray; though the most distinguished
 Costaguaneros had been imprisoned and executed upon that accusation. The
 procedure had dragged on for years, decimating the better class like
 a pestilence. The mere expression of sorrow for the fate of executed
 kinsmen had been punished with death. Don Jose Avellanos was perhaps the
 only one living who knew the whole story of those unspeakable cruelties.
 He had suffered from them himself, and he, with a shrug of the shoulders
 and a nervous, jerky gesture of the arm, was wont to put away from him,
 as it were, every allusion to it. But whatever the reason, Dr. Monygham,
 a personage in the administration of the Gould Concession, treated with
--**--**--
 Capataz always a very shrewd and sensible fellow, absolutely fearless,
 and remarkably useful. A perfect handy man. Sir John was greatly
 impressed by his resourcefulness and attention when he made that
 overland journey from Sta. Marta. Later on, as you might have heard,
 he rendered us a service by disclosing to the then chief of police
 the presence in the town of some professional thieves, who came from
 a distance to wreck and rob our monthly pay train. He has certainly
 organized the lighterage service of the harbour for the O.S.N. Company
 with great ability. He knows how to make himself obeyed, foreigner
 though he is. It is true that the Cargadores are strangers here, too,
 for the most part--immigrants, Islenos."
 
 "His prestige is his fortune," muttered the doctor, sourly.
 
 "The man has proved his trustworthiness up to the hilt on innumerable
 occasions and in all sorts of ways," argued the engineer. "When this
 question of the silver arose, Captain Mitchell naturally was very warmly
 of the opinion that his Capataz was the only man fit for the trust. As
 a sailor, of course, I suppose so. But as a man, don't you know, Gould,
 Decoud, and myself judged that it didn't matter in the least who went.
 Any boatman would have done just as well. Pray, what could a thief do
 with such a lot of ingots? If he ran off with them he would have in
 the end to land somewhere, and how could he conceal his cargo from the
 knowledge of the people ashore? We dismissed that consideration from our
 minds. Moreover, Decoud was going. There have been occasions when the
 Capataz has been more implicitly trusted."
 
 "He took a slightly different view," the doctor said. "I heard him
 declare in this very room that it would be the most desperate affair of
--**--**--
 walk, with the attraction of some supper and of my hammock (I always
 take my nightly rest in a hammock, as the most suitable to the climate);
 but somehow, sir, though evidently I could do nothing for any one by
 remaining about, I could not tear myself away from that wharf, where the
 fatigue made me stumble painfully at times. The night was excessively
 dark--the darkest I remember in my life; so that I began to think that
 the arrival of the transport from Esmeralda could not possibly take
 place before daylight, owing to the difficulty of navigating the gulf.
 The mosquitoes bit like fury. We have been infested here with mosquitoes
 before the late improvements; a peculiar harbour brand, sir, renowned
 for its ferocity. They were like a cloud about my head, and I shouldn't
 wonder that but for their attacks I would have dozed off as I walked
 up and down, and got a heavy fall. I kept on smoking cigar after cigar,
 more to protect myself from being eaten up alive than from any real
 relish for the weed. Then, sir, when perhaps for the twentieth time I
 was approaching my watch to the lighted end in order to see the time,
 and observing with surprise that it wanted yet ten minutes to midnight,
 I heard the splash of a ship's propeller--an unmistakable sound to a
 sailor's ear on such a calm night. It was faint indeed, because they
 were advancing with precaution and dead slow, both on account of the
 darkness and from their desire of not revealing too soon their presence:
 a very unnecessary care, because, I verily believe, in all the enormous
 extent of this harbour I was the only living soul about. Even the
 usual staff of watchmen and others had been absent from their posts for
--**--**--
 
 The old sailor's aspect was very threatening. Sotillo saw himself cut
 off from the table on which his sabre and revolver were lying.
 
 "I demand restitution and apologies," Mitchell thundered at him, quite
 beside himself. "From you! Yes, from you!"
 
 For the space of a second or so the colonel stood with a perfectly stony
 expression of face; then, as Captain Mitchell flung out an arm towards
 the table as if to snatch up the revolver, Sotillo, with a yell of
 alarm, bounded to the door and was gone in a flash, slamming it after
 him. Surprise calmed Captain Mitchell's fury. Behind the closed door
 Sotillo shouted on the landing, and there was a great tumult of feet on
 the wooden staircase.
 
 "Disarm him! Bind him!" the colonel could be heard vociferating.
 
 Captain Mitchell had just the time to glance once at the windows, with
 three perpendicular bars of iron each and some twenty feet from the
 ground, as he well knew, before the door flew open and the rush upon him
 took place. In an incredibly short time he found himself bound with
 many turns of a hide rope to a high-backed chair, so that his head alone
 remained free. Not till then did Sotillo, who had been leaning in the
 doorway trembling visibly, venture again within. The soldiers, picking
 up from the floor the rifles they had dropped to grapple with the
 prisoner, filed out of the room. The officers remained leaning on their
 swords and looking on.
 
 "The watch! the watch!" raved the colonel, pacing to and fro like a
 tiger in a cage. "Give me that man's watch."
 
 It was true, that when searched for arms in the hall downstairs, before
 being taken into Sotillo's presence, Captain Mitchell had been relieved
 of his watch and chain; but at the colonel's clamour it was produced
--**--**--
 
 "Si, mi colonel. They are all traitors."
 
 "I shall say nothing," continued Sotillo, fixing the motionless and
 powerless Mitchell with an angry but uneasy stare. "I shall say nothing
 of your treacherous attempt to get possession of my revolver to shoot me
 while I was trying to treat you with consideration you did not deserve.
 You have forfeited your life. Your only hope is in my clemency."
 
 He watched for the effect of his words, but there was no obvious sign of
 fear on Captain Mitchell's face. His white hair was full of dust,
 which covered also the rest of his helpless person. As if he had heard
 nothing, he twitched an eyebrow to get rid of a bit of straw which hung
 amongst the hairs.
 
 Sotillo advanced one leg and put his arms akimbo. "It is you, Mitchell,"
 he said, emphatically, "who are the thief, not my soldiers!" He pointed
 at his prisoner a forefinger with a long, almond-shaped nail. "Where
 is the silver of the San Tome mine? I ask you, Mitchell, where is the
 silver that was deposited in this Custom House? Answer me that! You
 stole it. You were a party to stealing it. It was stolen from the
 Government. Aha! you think I do not know what I say; but I am up to your
 foreign tricks. It is gone, the silver! No? Gone in one of your lanchas,
 you miserable man! How dared you?"
 
 This time he produced his effect. "How on earth could Sotillo know
 that?" thought Mitchell. His head, the only part of his body that could
 move, betrayed his surprise by a sudden jerk.
 
 "Ha! you tremble," Sotillo shouted, suddenly. "It is a conspiracy. It is
 a crime against the State. Did you not know that the silver belongs
 to the Republic till the Government claims are satisfied? Where is it?
--**--**--
 Just then a shot was fired in the kitchen, which made us jump and cower
 as if at a thunder-clap. It seems that the party of soldiers had stolen
 quite close up, and one of them had crept up to the door. He looked in,
 thought there was no one there, and, holding his rifle ready, entered
 quietly. The chief told me that he had just closed his eyes for a
 moment. When he opened them, he saw the man already in the middle of
 the room peering into the dark corners. The chief was so startled that,
 without thinking, he made one leap from the recess right out in front
 of the fireplace. The soldier, no less startled, up with his rifle
 and pulls the trigger, deafening and singeing the engineer, but in his
 flurry missing him completely. But, look what happens! At the noise of
 the report the sleeping woman sat up, as if moved by a spring, with a
 shriek, 'The children, Gian' Battista! Save the children!' I have it in
 my ears now. It was the truest cry of distress I ever heard. I stood as
 if paralyzed, but the old husband ran across to the bedside, stretching
 out his hands. She clung to them! I could see her eyes go glazed; the
 old fellow lowered her down on the pillows and then looked round at me.
 She was dead! All this took less than five minutes, and then I ran down
 to see what was the matter. It was no use thinking of any resistance.
 Nothing we two could say availed with the officer, so I volunteered to
 go up with a couple of soldiers and fetch down old Viola. He was sitting
 at the foot of the bed, looking at his wife's face, and did not seem to
--**--**--
 different kind of man, sir. I don't mean to submit tamely to insult and
 robbery. I am a public character, sir."
 
 And then Captain Mitchell became aware that the bars of the opening had
 become visible, a black grating upon a square of grey. The coming of the
 day silenced Captain Mitchell as if by the reflection that now in all
 the future days he would be deprived of the invaluable services of his
 Capataz. He leaned against the wall with his arms folded on his breast,
 and the doctor walked up and down the whole length of the place with his
 peculiar hobbling gait, as if slinking about on damaged feet. At the end
 furthest from the grating he would be lost altogether in the darkness.
 Only the slight limping shuffle could be heard. There was an air of
 moody detachment in that painful prowl kept up without a pause. When the
 door of the prison was suddenly flung open and his name shouted out he
 showed no surprise. He swerved sharply in his walk, and passed out
 at once, as though much depended upon his speed; but Captain Mitchell
 remained for some time with his shoulders against the wall, quite
 undecided in the bitterness of his spirit whether it wouldn't be better
 to refuse to stir a limb in the way of protest. He had half a mind to
 get himself carried out, but after the officer at the door had
 shouted three or four times in tones of remonstrance and surprise he
 condescended to walk out.
 
 Sotillo's manner had changed. The colonel's off-hand civility was
 slightly irresolute, as though he were in doubt if civility were the
 proper course in this case. He observed Captain Mitchell attentively
 before he spoke from the big armchair behind the table in a
--**--**--
 windows with rifles and carbines to guard the end of the street in
 case of an offensive return of the populace shouted their opinions and
 arguments over their shoulders. As dusk fell Don Juste Lopez, inviting
 those caballeros who were of his way of thinking to follow him, withdrew
 into the corredor, where at a little table in the light of two
 candles he busied himself in composing an address, or rather a solemn
 declaration to be presented to Pedrito Montero by a deputation of such
 members of Assembly as had elected to remain in town. His idea was
 to propitiate him in order to save the form at least of parliamentary
 institutions. Seated before a blank sheet of paper, a goose-quill pen in
 his hand and surged upon from all sides, he turned to the right and to
 the left, repeating with solemn insistence--
 
 "Caballeros, a moment of silence! A moment of silence! We ought to make
 it clear that we bow in all good faith to the accomplished facts."
 
 The utterance of that phrase seemed to give him a melancholy
 satisfaction. The hubbub of voices round him was growing strained and
 hoarse. In the sudden pauses the excited grimacing of the faces would
 sink all at once into the stillness of profound dejection.
 
 Meantime, the exodus had begun. Carretas full of ladies and children
 rolled swaying across the Plaza, with men walking or riding by their
 side; mounted parties followed on mules and horses; the poorest were
 setting out on foot, men and women carrying bundles, clasping babies in
 their arms, leading old people, dragging along the bigger children. When
 Charles Gould, after leaving the doctor and the engineer at the Casa
 Viola, entered the town by the harbour gate, all those that had meant to
 go were gone, and the others had barricaded themselves in their houses.
--**--**--
 Hernandez spurred his horse close up.
 
 "Has not the master of the mine any message to send to Hernandez, the
 master of the Campo?"
 
 The truth of the comparison struck Charles Gould heavily. In his
 determined purpose he held the mine, and the indomitable bandit held
 the Campo by the same precarious tenure. They were equals before the
 lawlessness of the land. It was impossible to disentangle one's activity
 from its debasing contacts. A close-meshed net of crime and corruption
 lay upon the whole country. An immense and weary discouragement sealed
 his lips for a time.
 
 "You are a just man," urged the emissary of Hernandez. "Look at those
 people who made my compadre a general and have turned us all into
 soldiers. Look at those oligarchs fleeing for life, with only the
 clothes on their backs. My compadre does not think of that, but our
 followers may be wondering greatly, and I would speak for them to you.
 Listen, senor! For many months now the Campo has been our own. We
 need ask no man for anything; but soldiers must have their pay to live
 honestly when the wars are over. It is believed that your soul is so
 just that a prayer from you would cure the sickness of every beast, like
 the orison of the upright judge. Let me have some words from your lips
 that would act like a charm upon the doubts of our partida, where all
 are men."
 
 "Do you hear what he says?" Charles Gould said in English to Antonia.
 
 "Forgive us our misery!" she exclaimed, hurriedly. "It is your character
 that is the inexhaustible treasure which may save us all yet; your
 character, Carlos, not your wealth. I entreat you to give this man your
 word that you will accept any arrangement my uncle may make with their
--**--**--
 All these cases were doing well; but when he came to the dead Cargador
 he stopped a little longer, surveying not the man who had ceased to
 suffer, but the woman kneeling in silent contemplation of the rigid
 face, with its pinched nostrils and a white gleam in the imperfectly
 closed eyes. She lifted her head slowly, and said in a dull voice--
 
 "It is not long since he had become a Cargador--only a few weeks. His
 worship the Capataz had accepted him after many entreaties."
 
 "I am not responsible for the great Capataz," muttered the doctor,
 moving off.
 
 Directing his course upstairs towards the door of Charles Gould's room,
 the doctor at the last moment hesitated; then, turning away from the
 handle with a shrug of his uneven shoulders, slunk off hastily along the
 corredor in search of Mrs. Gould's camerista.
 
 Leonardo told him that the senora had not risen yet. The senora had
 given into her charge the girls belonging to that Italian posadero. She,
 Leonarda, had put them to bed in her own room. The fair girl had cried
 herself to sleep, but the dark one--the bigger--had not closed her eyes
 yet. She sat up in bed clutching the sheets right up under her chin and
 staring before her like a little witch. Leonarda did not approve of the
 Viola children being admitted to the house. She made this feeling clear
 by the indifferent tone in which she inquired whether their mother was
 dead yet. As to the senora, she must be asleep. Ever since she had gone
 into her room after seeing the departure of Dona Antonia with her dying
 father, there had been no sound behind her door.
 
 The doctor, rousing himself out of profound reflection, told her
 abruptly to call her mistress at once. He hobbled off to wait for Mrs.
--**--**--
 Monygham's view of what it behoved him to do was severe; it was an ideal
 view, in so much that it was the imaginative exaggeration of a correct
 feeling. It was also, in its force, influence, and persistency, the view
 of an eminently loyal nature.
 
 There was a great fund of loyalty in Dr. Monygham's nature. He had
 settled it all on Mrs. Gould's head. He believed her worthy of every
 devotion. At the bottom of his heart he felt an angry uneasiness before
 the prosperity of the San Tome mine, because its growth was robbing her
 of all peace of mind. Costaguana was no place for a woman of that kind.
 What could Charles Gould have been thinking of when he brought her
 out there! It was outrageous! And the doctor had watched the course
 of events with a grim and distant reserve which, he imagined, his
 lamentable history imposed upon him.
 
 Loyalty to Mrs. Gould could not, however, leave out of account the
 safety of her husband. The doctor had contrived to be in town at the
 critical time because he mistrusted Charles Gould. He considered him
 hopelessly infected with the madness of revolutions. That is why he
 hobbled in distress in the drawing-room of the Casa Gould on that
 morning, exclaiming, "Decoud, Decoud!" in a tone of mournful irritation.
 
 Mrs. Gould, her colour heightened, and with glistening eyes, looked
 straight before her at the sudden enormity of that disaster. The
 finger-tips on one hand rested lightly on a low little table by her
 side, and the arm trembled right up to the shoulder. The sun, which
 looks late upon Sulaco, issuing in all the fulness of its power high
 up on the sky from behind the dazzling snow-edge of Higuerota, had
 precipitated the delicate, smooth, pearly greyness of light, in which
--**--**--
 of their elders. He had never before noticed any sign of a child in his
 patio. Even Leonarda, the camerista, came in a fright, pushing through,
 with her spoiled, pouting face of a favourite maid, leading the Viola
 girls by the hand. The crockery rattled on table and sideboard, and the
 whole house seemed to sway in the deafening wave of sound.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER FIVE
 
 During the night the expectant populace had taken possession of all the
 belfries in the town in order to welcome Pedrito Montero, who was
 making his entry after having slept the night in Rincon. And first
 came straggling in through the land gate the armed mob of all colours,
 complexions, types, and states of raggedness, calling themselves the
 Sulaco National Guard, and commanded by Senor Gamacho. Through the
 middle of the street streamed, like a torrent of rubbish, a mass of
 straw hats, ponchos, gun-barrels, with an enormous green and yellow flag
 flapping in their midst, in a cloud of dust, to the furious beating of
 drums. The spectators recoiled against the walls of the houses shouting
 their Vivas! Behind the rabble could be seen the lances of the cavalry,
 the "army" of Pedro Montero. He advanced between Senores Fuentes and
 Gamacho at the head of his llaneros, who had accomplished the feat of
 crossing the Paramos of the Higuerota in a snow-storm. They rode four
 abreast, mounted on confiscated Campo horses, clad in the heterogeneous
 stock of roadside stores they had looted hurriedly in their rapid ride
 through the northern part of the province; for Pedro Montero had been in
 a great hurry to occupy Sulaco. The handkerchiefs knotted loosely around
 their bare throats were glaringly new, and all the right sleeves of
 their cotton shirts had been cut off close to the shoulder for greater
--**--**--
 
 "What stupidity! What destruction!"
 
 Senor Fuentes, following, would relax his taciturn disposition to
 murmur--
 
 "It is all the work of Gamacho and his Nationals;" and then, inclining
 his head on his left shoulder, would press together his lips so firmly
 that a little hollow would appear at each corner. He had his nomination
 for Political Chief of the town in his pocket, and was all impatience to
 enter upon his functions.
 
 In the long audience room, with its tall mirrors all starred by stones,
 the hangings torn down and the canopy over the platform at the upper end
 pulled to pieces, the vast, deep muttering of the crowd and the howling
 voice of Gamacho speaking just below reached them through the shutters
 as they stood idly in dimness and desolation.
 
 "The brute!" observed his Excellency Don Pedro Montero through clenched
 teeth. "We must contrive as quickly as possible to send him and his
 Nationals out there to fight Hernandez."
 
 The new Gefe Politico only jerked his head sideways, and took a puff at
 his cigarette in sign of his agreement with this method for ridding the
 town of Gamacho and his inconvenient rabble.
 
 Pedrito Montero looked with disgust at the absolutely bare floor, and
 at the belt of heavy gilt picture-frames running round the room, out
 of which the remnants of torn and slashed canvases fluttered like dingy
 rags.
 
 "We are not barbarians," he said.
 
 This was what said his Excellency, the popular Pedrito, the guerrillero
 skilled in the art of laying ambushes, charged by his brother at his
 own demand with the organization of Sulaco on democratic principles. The
 night before, during the consultation with his partisans, who had
 come out to meet him in Rincon, he had opened his intentions to Senor
 Fuentes--
 
 "We shall organize a popular vote, by yes or no, confiding the destinies
--**--**--
 into propitiatory smiles, he intimated that he was hungry and thirsty.
 The old major directed him to go to the alcalde of the first village.
 The man rode off, and Don Pepe, striding slowly in the direction of a
 little wooden belfry, looked over a hedge into a little garden, and saw
 Father Roman sitting in a white hammock slung between two orange trees
 in front of the presbytery.
 
 An enormous tamarind shaded with its dark foliage the whole white
 framehouse. A young Indian girl with long hair, big eyes, and small
 hands and feet, carried out a wooden chair, while a thin old woman,
 crabbed and vigilant, watched her all the time from the verandah.
 
 Don Pepe sat down in the chair and lighted a cigar; the priest drew
 in an immense quantity of snuff out of the hollow of his palm. On his
 reddish-brown face, worn, hollowed as if crumbled, the eyes, fresh and
 candid, sparkled like two black diamonds.
 
 Don Pepe, in a mild and humorous voice, informed Father Roman that
 Pedrito Montero, by the hand of Senor Fuentes, had asked him on what
 terms he would surrender the mine in proper working order to a legally
 constituted commission of patriotic citizens, escorted by a small
 military force. The priest cast his eyes up to heaven. However, Don Pepe
 continued, the mozo who brought the letter said that Don Carlos Gould
 was alive, and so far unmolested.
 
 Father Roman expressed in a few words his thankfulness at hearing of the
 Senor Administrador's safety.
 
 The hour of oration had gone by in the silvery ringing of a bell in the
 little belfry. The belt of forest closing the entrance of the valley
 stood like a screen between the low sun and the street of the village.
 At the other end of the rocky gorge, between the walls of basalt and
--**--**--
 fact that he took very few precautions for his safety. In the preamble
 of a certain famous State paper he had declared once that "the thought
 of liberty has never existed in the Act of the Creator. From the
 multitude of men's counsel nothing could come but revolt and disorder;
 and revolt and disorder in a world created for obedience and stability
 is sin. It was not Reason but Authority which expressed the Divine
 Intention. God was the Autocrat of the Universe...." It may be that
 the man who made this declaration believed that heaven itself was bound
 to protect him in his remorseless defence of Autocracy on this earth.
 
 No doubt the vigilance of the police saved him many times; but, as a
 matter of fact, when his appointed fate overtook him, the competent
 authorities could not have given him any warning. They had no knowledge
 of any conspiracy against the Minister's life, had no hint of any plot
 through their usual channels of information, had seen no signs, were
 aware of no suspicious movements or dangerous persons.
 
 Mr. de P--- was being driven towards the railway station in a two-horse
 uncovered sleigh with footman and coachman on the box. Snow had been
 falling all night, making the roadway, uncleared as yet at this early
 hour, very heavy for the horses. It was still falling thickly. But the
 sleigh must have been observed and marked down. As it drew over to the
 left before taking a turn, the footman noticed a peasant walking
 slowly on the edge of the pavement with his hands in the pockets of
 his sheepskin coat and his shoulders hunched up to his ears under the
 falling snow. On being overtaken this peasant suddenly faced about and
 swung his arm. In an instant there was a terrible shock, a detonation
--**--**--
 suffered from the throes of internal dissensions, and he shrank mentally
 from the fray as a good-natured man may shrink from taking definite
 sides in a violent family quarrel.
 
 Razumov, going home, reflected that having prepared all the matters of
 the forthcoming examination, he could now devote his time to the subject
 of the prize essay. He hankered after the silver medal. The prize was
 offered by the Ministry of Education; the names of the competitors would
 be submitted to the Minister himself. The mere fact of trying would be
 considered meritorious in the higher quarters; and the possessor of the
 prize would have a claim to an administrative appointment of the better
 sort after he had taken his degree. The student Razumov in an access of
 elation forgot the dangers menacing the stability of the institutions
 which give rewards and appointments. But remembering the medallist of
 the year before, Razumov, the young man of no parentage, was sobered. He
 and some others happened to be assembled in their comrade's rooms at the
 very time when that last received the official advice of his success.
 He was a quiet, unassuming young man: "Forgive me," he had said with a
 faint apologetic smile and taking up his cap, "I am going out to order
 up some wine. But I must first send a telegram to my folk at home. I
 say! Won't the old people make it a festive time for the neighbours for
 twenty miles around our place."
 
 Razumov thought there was nothing of that sort for him in the world. His
 success would matter to no one. But he felt no bitterness against
 the nobleman his protector, who was not a provincial magnate as was
 generally supposed. He was in fact nobody less than Prince K---, once
 a great and splendid figure in the world and now, his day being over,
--**--**--
 His usual haunt seemed to be a low-class eating-house on the outskirts
 of the town. When Haldin got there the man was not to be found. He was
 not expected to turn up again till the evening. Haldin wandered away
 restlessly.
 
 He saw the gate of a woodyard open and went in to get out of the wind
 which swept the bleak broad thoroughfare. The great rectangular piles of
 cut wood loaded with snow resembled the huts of a village. At first the
 watchman who discovered him crouching amongst them talked in a friendly
 manner. He was a dried-up old man wearing two ragged army coats one over
 the other; his wizened little face, tied up under the jaw and over the
 ears in a dirty red handkerchief, looked comical. Presently he grew
 sulky, and then all at once without rhyme or reason began to shout
 furiously.
 
 "Aren't you ever going to clear out of this, you loafer? We know all
 about factory hands of your sort. A big, strong, young chap! You aren't
 even drunk. What do you want here? You don't frighten us. Take yourself
 and your ugly eyes away."
 
 Haldin stopped before the sitting Razumov. His supple figure, with
 the white forehead above which the fair hair stood straight up, had an
 aspect of lofty daring.
 
 "He did not like my eyes," he said. "And so...here I am."
 
 Razumov made an effort to speak calmly.
 
 "But pardon me, Victor Victorovitch. We know each other so little....
 I don't see why you...."
 
 "Confidence," said Haldin.
 
 This word sealed Razumov's lips as if a hand had been clapped on his
 mouth. His brain seethed with arguments.
 
 "And so--here you are," he muttered through his teeth.
 
 The other did not detect the tone of anger. Never suspected it.
 
 "Yes. And nobody knows I am here. You are the last person that could
--**--**--
 
 The other raised his head, got up and with an effort mastered his voice.
 
 "Yes. Men like me leave no posterity," he repeated in a subdued tone,
 "I have a sister though. She's with my old mother--I persuaded them to
 go abroad this year--thank God. Not a bad little girl my sister. She has
 the most trustful eyes of any human being that ever walked this earth.
 She will marry well, I hope. She may have children--sons perhaps. Look
 at me. My father was a Government official in the provinces, He had a
 little land too. A simple servant of God--a true Russian in his way. His
 was the soul of obedience. But I am not like him. They say I resemble
 my mother's eldest brother, an officer. They shot him in '28. Under
 Nicholas, you know. Haven't I told you that this is war, war.... But
 God of Justice! This is weary work."
 
 Razumov, in his chair, leaning his head on his hand, spoke as if from
 the bottom of an abyss.
 
 "You believe in God, Haldin?"
 
 "There you go catching at words that are wrung from one. What does it
 matter? What was it the Englishman said: 'There is a divine soul in
 things...' Devil take him--I don't remember now. But he spoke the
 truth. When the day of you thinkers comes don't you forget what's
 divine in the Russian soul--and that's resignation. Respect that in your
 intellectual restlessness and don't let your arrogant wisdom spoil its
 message to the world. I am speaking to you now like a man with a rope
 round his neck. What do you imagine I am? A being in revolt? No. It's
 you thinkers who are in everlasting revolt. I am one of the resigned.
 When the necessity of this heavy work came to me and I understood that
--**--**--
 Razumov, biting his lip till blood came to keep himself from bursting
 into imprecations, followed the owner of the den, who, whispering "Come
 along, little father," led him into a tiny hole of a place behind
 the wooden counter, whence proceeded a sound of splashing. A wet and
 bedraggled creature, a sort of sexless and shivering scarecrow, washed
 glasses in there, bending over a wooden tub by the light of a tallow
 dip.
 
 "Yes, little father," the man in the long caftan said plaintively. He
 had a brown, cunning little face, a thin greyish beard. Trying to light
 a tin lantern he hugged it to his breast and talked garrulously the
 while.
 
 He would show Ziemianitch to the gentleman to prove there were no lies
 told. And he would show him drunk. His woman, it seems, ran away from
 him last night. "Such a hag she was! Thin! Pfui!" He spat. They were
 always running away from that driver of the devil--and he sixty years
 old too; could never get used to it. But each heart knows sorrow after
 its own kind and Ziemianitch was a born fool all his days. And then he
 would fly to the bottle. "'Who could bear life in our land without the
 bottle?' he says. A proper Russian man--the little pig.... Be pleased
 to follow me."
 
 Razumov crossed a quadrangle of deep snow enclosed between high walls
 with innumerable windows. Here and there a dim yellow light hung within
 the four-square mass of darkness. The house was an enormous slum, a hive
 of human vermin, a monumental abode of misery towering on the verge of
 starvation and despair.
 
 In a corner the ground sloped sharply down, and Razumov followed the
 light of the lantern through a small doorway into a long cavernous place
--**--**--
 throne is a seat of power too. The form of government is the shape of
 a tool--an instrument. But twenty thousand bladders inflated by the
 noblest sentiments and jostling against each other in the air are a
 miserable incumbrance of space, holding no power, possessing no will,
 having nothing to give.
 
 He went on thus, heedless of the way, holding a discourse with himself
 with extraordinary abundance and facility. Generally his phrases came
 to him slowly, after a conscious and painstaking wooing. Some superior
 power had inspired him with a flow of masterly argument as certain
 converted sinners become overwhelmingly loquacious.
 
 He felt an austere exultation.
 
 "What are the luridly smoky lucubrations of that fellow to the clear
 grasp of my intellect?" he thought. "Is not this my country? Have I not
 got forty million brothers?" he asked himself, unanswerably victorious
 in the silence of his breast. And the fearful thrashing he had given
 the inanimate Ziemianitch seemed to him a sign of intimate union, a
 pathetically severe necessity of brotherly love. "No! If I must suffer
 let me at least suffer for my convictions, not for a crime my reason--my
 cool superior reason--rejects."
 
 He ceased to think for a moment. The silence in his breast was complete.
 But he felt a suspicious uneasiness, such as we may experience when we
 enter an unlighted strange place--the irrational feeling that something
 may jump upon us in the dark--the absurd dread of the unseen.
 
 Of course he was far from being a moss-grown reactionary. Everything was
 not for the best. Despotic bureaucracy... abuses... corruption...
 and so on. Capable men were wanted. Enlightened intelligences. Devoted
 hearts. But absolute power should be preserved--the tool ready for the
 man--for the great autocrat of the future. Razumov believed in him. The
 logic of history made him unavoidable. The state of the people demanded
--**--**--
 tenderness on the deep abstraction of that good-looking young man.
 
 Suddenly Razumov stood still. The glimpse of a passing grey whisker,
 caught and lost in the same instant, had evoked the complete image of
 Prince K---, the man who once had pressed his hand as no other man had
 pressed it--a faint but lingering pressure like a secret sign, like a
 half-unwilling caress.
 
 And Razumov marvelled at himself. Why did he not think of him before!
 
 "A senator, a dignitary, a great personage, the very man--He!"
 
 A strange softening emotion came over Razumov--made his knees shake a
 little. He repressed it with a new-born austerity. All that sentiment
 was pernicious nonsense. He couldn't be quick enough; and when he got
 into a sledge he shouted to the driver--"to the K--- Palace. Get
 on--you! Fly!" The startled moujik, bearded up to the very whites of
 his eyes, answered obsequiously--
 
 "I hear, your high Nobility."
 
 It was lucky for Razumov that Prince K--- was not a man of timid
 character. On the day of Mr. de P---'s murder an extreme alarm and
 despondency prevailed in the high official spheres.
 
 Prince K---, sitting sadly alone in his study, was told by his alarmed
 servants that a mysterious young man had forced his way into the hall,
 refused to tell his name and the nature of his business, and would not
 move from there till he had seen his Excellency in private. Instead of
 locking himself up and telephoning for the police, as nine out of ten
 high personages would have done that evening, the Prince gave way to
 curiosity and came quietly to the door of his study.
 
 In the hall, the front door standing wide open, he recognised at once
 Razumov, pale as death, his eyes blazing, and surrounded by perplexed
--**--**--
 deep armchairs, had all the lights turned on. The footman shut the door
 behind them and they waited.
 
 There was a coal fire in an English grate; Razumov had never before seen
 such a fire; and the silence of the room was like the silence of the
 grave; perfect, measureless, for even the clock on the mantelpiece
 made no sound. Filling a corner, on a black pedestal, stood a
 quarter-life-size smooth-limbed bronze of an adolescent figure, running.
 The Prince observed in an undertone--
 
 "Spontini's. 'Flight of Youth.' Exquisite."
 
 "Admirable," assented Razumov faintly.
 
 They said nothing more after this, the Prince silent with his grand air,
 Razumov staring at the statue. He was worried by a sensation resembling
 the gnawing of hunger.
 
 He did not turn when he heard an inner door fly open, and a quick
 footstep, muffled on the carpet.
 
 The Prince's voice immediately exclaimed, thick with excitement--
 
 "We have got him--_ce miserable_. A worthy young man came to me--No!
 It's incredible...."
 
 Razumov held his breath before the bronze as if expecting a crash.
 Behind his back a voice he had never heard before insisted politely--
 
 "_Asseyez-vous donc_."
 
 The Prince almost shrieked, "_Mais comprenez-vous, mon cher!
 L'assassin_! the murderer--we have got him...."
 
 Razumov spun round. The General's smooth big cheeks rested on the stiff
 collar of his uniform. He must have been already looking at Razumov,
 because that last saw the pale blue eyes fastened on him coldly.
 
 The Prince from a chair waved an impressive hand.
 
 "This is a most honourable young man whom Providence itself... Mr.
 Razumov."
 
 The General acknowledged the introduction by frowning at Razumov, who
 did not make the slightest movement.
 
 Sitting down before his desk the General listened with compressed lips.
 It was impossible to detect any sign of emotion on his face.
--**--**--
 "A serious young man. _Un esprit superieur_."
 
 "I see that, _mon cher Prince_," said the General. "Mr. Razumov is quite
 safe with me. I am interested in him. He has, it seems, the great and
 useful quality of inspiring confidence. What I was wondering at is why
 the other should mention anything at all--I mean even the bare fact
 alone--if his object was only to obtain temporary shelter for a few
 hours. For, after all, nothing was easier than to say nothing about it
 unless, indeed, he were trying, under a crazy misapprehension of your
 true sentiments, to enlist your assistance--eh, Mr. Razumov?"
 
 It seemed to Razumov that the floor was moving slightly. This grotesque
 man in a tight uniform was terrible. It was right that he should be
 terrible.
 
 "I can see what your Excellency has in your mind. But I can only answer
 that I don't know why."
 
 "I have nothing in my mind," murmured the General, with gentle surprise.
 
 "I am his prey--his helpless prey," thought Razumov. The fatigues and
 the disgusts of that afternoon, the need to forget, the fear which he
 could not keep off, reawakened his hate for Haldin.
 
 "Then I can't help your Excellency. I don't know what he meant. I only
 know there was a moment when I wished to kill him. There was also a
 moment when I wished myself dead. I said nothing. I was overcome. I
 provoked no confidence--I asked for no explanations--"
 
 Razumov seemed beside himself; but his mind was lucid. It was really a
 calculated outburst.
 
 "It is rather a pity," the General said, "that you did not. Don't you
 know at all what he means to do?" Razumov calmed down and saw an opening
 there.
 
 "He told me he was in hopes that a sledge would meet him about half an
--**--**--
 stared at the ceiling.
 
 Razumov held the match up. He saw the clear-cut features, the firm
 chin, the white forehead and the topknot of fair hair against the white
 pillow. There he was, lying flat on his back. Razumov thought suddenly,
 "I have walked over his chest."
 
 He continued to stare till the match burnt itself out; then struck
 another and lit the lamp in silence without looking towards the bed any
 more. He had turned his back on it and was hanging his coat on a peg
 when he heard Haldin sigh profoundly, then ask in a tired voice--
 
 "Well! And what have you arranged?"
 
 The emotion was so great that Razumov was glad to put his hands against
 the wall. A diabolical impulse to say, "I have given you up to the
 police," frightened him exceedingly. But he did not say that. He said,
 without turning round, in a muffled voice--
 
 "It's done."
 
 Again he heard Haldin sigh. He walked to the table, sat down with the
 lamp before him, and only then looked towards the bed.
 
 In the distant corner of the large room far away from the lamp, which
 was small and provided with a very thick china shade, Haldin appeared
 like a dark and elongated shape--rigid with the immobility of death.
 This body seemed to have less substance than its own phantom walked over
 by Razumov in the street white with snow. It was more alarming in its
 shadowy, persistent reality than the distinct but vanishing illusion.
 
 Haldin was heard again.
 
 "You must have had a walk--such a walk,..." he murmured
 deprecatingly. "This weather...."
 
 Razumov answered with energy--
 
 "Horrible walk.... A nightmare of a walk."
 
 He shuddered audibly. Haldin sighed once more, then--
 
 "And so you have seen Ziemianitch--brother?"
 
 "I've seen him."
 
 Razumov, remembering the time he had spent with the Prince, thought it
--**--**--
 'There is a young man in this town head and shoulders above common
 prejudices.'"
 
 "Is he laughing at me?" Razumov asked himself, going on with his
 aimless drawing of triangles and squares. And suddenly he thought: "My
 behaviour must appear to him strange. Should he take fright at my manner
 and rush off somewhere I shall be undone completely. That infernal
 General...."
 
 He dropped the pencil and turned abruptly towards the bed with the
 shadowy figure extended full length on it--so much more indistinct than
 the one over whose breast he had walked without faltering. Was this,
 too, a phantom?
 
 The silence had lasted a long time. "He is no longer here," was the
 thought against which Razumov struggled desperately, quite frightened at
 its absurdity. "He is already gone and this...only..."
 
 He could resist no longer. He sprang to his feet, saying aloud, "I am
 intolerably anxious," and in a few headlong strides stood by the side
 of the bed. His hand fell lightly on Haldin's shoulder, and directly
 he felt its reality he was beset by an insane temptation to grip that
 exposed throat and squeeze the breath out of that body, lest it should
 escape his custody, leaving only a phantom behind.
 
 Haldin did not stir a limb, but his overshadowed eyes moving a little
 gazed upwards at Razumov with wistful gratitude for this manifestation
 of feeling.
 
 Razumov turned away and strode up and down the room. "It would have been
 possibly a kindness," he muttered to himself, and was appalled by the
 nature of that apology for a murderous intention his mind had found
 somewhere within him. And all the same he could not give it up. He
 became lucid about it. "What can he expect?" he thought. "The halter--in
 the end. And I...."
 
 This argument was interrupted by Haldin's voice.
--**--**--
 happened to me once to be talking to a man whose fate was affected by
 physical facts of that kind. And the man did not know it. Of course, it
 was a case of conscience, but the material facts such as these brought
 about the solution.... And you tell me, Victor Victorovitch, not to
 be anxious! Why! I am responsible for you," Razumov almost shrieked.
 
 He avoided with difficulty a burst of Mephistophelian laughter. Haldin,
 very pale, raised himself on his elbow.
 
 "And the surprises of life," went on Razumov, after glancing at the
 other uneasily. "Just consider their astonishing nature. A mysterious
 impulse induces you to come here. I don't say you have done wrong.
 Indeed, from a certain point of view you could not have done better. You
 might have gone to a man with affections and family ties. You have
 such ties yourself. As to me, you know I have been brought up in an
 educational institute where they did not give us enough to eat. To talk
 of affection in such a connexion--you perceive yourself.... As
 to ties, the only ties I have in the world are social. I must get
 acknowledged in some way before I can act at all. I sit here working....
 And don't you think I am working for progress too? I've got to find
 my own ideas of the true way.... Pardon me," continued Razumov, after
 drawing breath and with a short, throaty laugh, "but I haven't inherited
 a revolutionary inspiration together with a resemblance from an uncle."
 
 He looked again at his watch and noticed with sickening disgust that
 there were yet a good many minutes to midnight. He tore watch and chain
 off his waistcoat and laid them on the table well in the circle of
 bright lamplight. Haldin, reclining on his elbow, did not stir. Razumov
--**--**--
 watch for the faint sound. "I will stay here till I hear something,"
 he said to himself. He stood still, his ear turned to the panes. An
 atrocious aching numbness with shooting pains in his back and legs
 tortured him. He did not budge. His mind hovered on the borders of
 delirium. He heard himself suddenly saying, "I confess," as a person
 might do on the rack. "I am on the rack," he thought. He felt ready to
 swoon. The faint deep boom of the distant clock seemed to explode in his
 head--he heard it so clearly.... One!
 
 If Haldin had not turned up the police would have been already here
 ransacking the house. No sound reached him. This time it was done.
 
 He dragged himself painfully to the table and dropped into the chair.
 He flung the book away and took a square sheet of paper. It was like the
 pile of sheets covered with his neat minute handwriting, only blank. He
 took a pen brusquely and dipped it with a vague notion of going on with
 the writing of his essay--but his pen remained poised over the sheet.
 It hung there for some time before it came down and formed long scrawly
 letters.
 
 Still-faced and his lips set hard, Razumov began to write. When he wrote
 a large hand his neat writing lost its character altogether--became
 unsteady, almost childish. He wrote five lines one under the other.
 History not Theory. Patriotism not Internationalism. Evolution not
 Revolution. Direction not Destruction. Unity not Disruption.
 
 He gazed at them dully. Then his eyes strayed to the bed and remained
 fixed there for a good many minutes, while his right hand groped all
 over the table for the penknife.
 
 He rose at last, and walking up with measured steps stabbed the paper
--**--**--
 
 Razumov woke up for the tenth time perhaps with a heavy shiver. Seeing
 the light of day in his window, he resisted the inclination to lay
 himself down again. He did not remember anything, but he did not think
 it strange to find himself on the sofa in his cloak and chilled to the
 bone. The light coming through the window seemed strangely cheerless,
 containing no promise as the light of each new day should for a young
 man. It was the awakening of a man mortally ill, or of a man ninety
 years old. He looked at the lamp which had burnt itself out. It stood
 there, the extinguished beacon of his labours, a cold object of brass
 and porcelain, amongst the scattered pages of his notes and small
 piles of books--a mere litter of blackened paper--dead matter--without
 significance or interest.
 
 He got on his feet, and divesting himself of his cloak hung it on the
 peg, going through all the motions mechanically. An incredible dullness,
 a ditch-water stagnation was sensible to his perceptions as though life
 had withdrawn itself from all things and even from his own thoughts.
 There was not a sound in the house.
 
 Turning away from the peg, he thought in that same lifeless manner that
 it must be very early yet; but when he looked at the watch on his table
 he saw both hands arrested at twelve o'clock.
 
 "Ah! yes," he mumbled to himself, and as if beginning to get roused
 a little he took a survey of his room. The paper stabbed to the wall
 arrested his attention. He eyed it from the distance without approval or
 perplexity; but when he heard the servant-girl beginning to bustle about
 in the outer room with the _samovar_ for his morning tea, he walked up
--**--**--
 that prisoner personally.
 
 "Aren't you astonished?" concluded the gaunt student.
 
 "No," said Razumov roughly--and at once regretted his answer.
 
 "Everybody supposed Haldin was in the provinces--with his people. Didn't
 you?"
 
 The student turned his big hollow eyes upon Razumov, who said
 unguardedly--
 
 "His people are abroad."
 
 He could have bitten his tongue out with vexation. The student
 pronounced in a tone of profound meaning--
 
 "So! You alone were aware,..." and stopped.
 
 "They have sworn my ruin," thought Razumov. "Have you spoken of this to
 anyone else?" he asked with bitter curiosity.
 
 The other shook his head.
 
 "No, only to you. Our circle thought that as Haldin had been often heard
 expressing a warm appreciation of your character...."
 
 Razumov could not restrain a gesture of angry despair which the other
 must have misunderstood in some way, because he ceased speaking and
 turned away his black, lack-lustre eyes.
 
 They moved side by side in silence. Then the gaunt student began to
 whisper again, with averted gaze--
 
 "As we have at present no one affiliated inside the fortress so as
 to make it possible to furnish him with a packet of poison, we have
 considered already some sort of retaliatory action--to follow very
 soon...."
 
 Razumov trudging on interrupted--
 
 "Were you acquainted with Haldin? Did he know where you live?"
 
 "I had the happiness to hear him speak twice," his companion answered in
 the feverish whisper contrasting with the gloomy apathy of his face and
 bearing. "He did not know where I live.... I am lodging poorly with
 an artisan family.... I have just a corner in a room. It is not very
 practicable to see me there, but if you should need me for anything I am
 ready...."
 
 Razumov trembled with rage and fear. He was beside himself, but kept his
 voice low.
--**--**--
 
 When he had taken it down the day before he had folded it in four,
 absent-mindedly, before dropping it on the table. And now he saw it
 lying uppermost, spread out, smoothed out even and covering all the
 confused pile of pages, the record of his intellectual life for the
 last three years. It had not been flung there. It had been placed
 there--smoothed out, too! He guessed in that an intention of profound
 meaning--or perhaps some inexplicable mockery.
 
 He sat staring at the piece of paper till his eyes began to smart. He
 did not attempt to put his papers in order, either that evening or the
 next day--which he spent at home in a state of peculiar irresolution.
 This irresolution bore upon the question whether he should continue to
 live--neither more nor less. But its nature was very far removed from
 the hesitation of a man contemplating suicide. The idea of laying
 violent hands upon his body did not occur to Razumov. The unrelated
 organism bearing that label, walking, breathing, wearing these clothes,
 was of no importance to anyone, unless maybe to the landlady. The true
 Razumov had his being in the willed, in the determined future--in that
 future menaced by the lawlessness of autocracy--for autocracy knows
 no law--and the lawlessness of revolution. The feeling that his moral
 personality was at the mercy of these lawless forces was so strong that
 he asked himself seriously if it were worth while to go on accomplishing
 the mental functions of that existence which seemed no longer his own.
 
 "What is the good of exerting my intelligence, of pursuing the
 systematic development of my faculties and all my plans of work?" he
 asked himself. "I want to guide my conduct by reasonable convictions,
 but what security have I against something--some destructive
--**--**--
 get into unholy scrapes."
 
 His elation fell. That was just it. What was his life? Insignificant;
 no good to anyone; a mere festivity. It would end some fine day in his
 getting his skull split with a champagne bottle in a drunken brawl. At
 such times, too, when men were sacrificing themselves to ideas. But he
 could never get any ideas into his head. His head wasn't worth anything
 better than to be split by a champagne bottle.
 
 Razumov, protesting that he had no time, made an attempt to get away.
 The other's tone changed to confidential earnestness.
 
 "For God's sake, Kirylo, my dear soul, let me make some sort of
 sacrifice. It would not be a sacrifice really. I have my rich dad behind
 me. There's positively no getting to the bottom of his pocket."
 
 And rejecting indignantly Razumov's suggestion that this was drunken
 raving, he offered to lend him some money to escape abroad with. He
 could always get money from his dad. He had only to say that he had
 lost it at cards or something of that sort, and at the same time promise
 solemnly not to miss a single lecture for three months on end. That
 would fetch the old man; and he, Kostia, was quite equal to the
 sacrifice. Though he really did not see what was the good for him to
 attend the lectures. It was perfectly hopeless.
 
 "Won't you let me be of some use?" he pleaded to the silent Razumov,
 who with his eyes on the ground and utterly unable to penetrate the real
 drift of the other's intention, felt a strange reluctance to clear up
 the point.
 
 "What makes you think I want to go abroad?" he asked at last very
 quietly.
 
 Kostia lowered his voice.
 
 "You had the police in your rooms yesterday. There are three or four of
--**--**--
 his head against. Then he opened the letter. It directed the student
 Kirylo Sidorovitch Razumov to present himself without delay at the
 General Secretariat.
 
 Razumov had a vision of General T---'s goggle eyes waiting for him--the
 embodied power of autocracy, grotesque and terrible. He embodied
 the whole power of autocracy because he was its guardian. He was the
 incarnate suspicion, the incarnate anger, the incarnate ruthlessness of
 a political and social regime on its defence. He loathed rebellion
 by instinct. And Razumov reflected that the man was simply unable to
 understand a reasonable adherence to the doctrine of absolutism.
 
 "What can he want with me precisely--I wonder?" he asked himself.
 
 As if that mental question had evoked the familiar phantom, Haldin stood
 suddenly before him in the room with an extraordinary completeness of
 detail. Though the short winter day had passed already into the sinister
 twilight of a land buried in snow, Razumov saw plainly the narrow
 leather strap round the Tcherkess coat. The illusion of that hateful
 presence was so perfect that he half expected it to ask, "Is the outer
 door closed?" He looked at it with hatred and contempt. Souls do not
 take a shape of clothing. Moreover, Haldin could not be dead yet.
 Razumov stepped forward menacingly; the vision vanished--and turning
 short on his heel he walked out of his room with infinite disdain.
 
 But after going down the first flight of stairs it occurred to him that
 perhaps the superior authorities of police meant to confront him with
 Haldin in the flesh. This thought struck him like a bullet, and had he
 not clung with both hands to the banister he would have rolled down to
 the next landing most likely. His legs were of no use for a considerable
 time.... But why? For what conceivable reason? To what end?
--**--**--
 a sudden conviction that this was the safest attitude to take. With a
 great flow of words he complained of being totally misunderstood. Even
 as he talked with a perception of his own audacity he thought that
 the word "misunderstood" was better than the word "mistrusted," and he
 repeated it again with insistence. Suddenly he ceased, being seized
 with fright before the attentive immobility of the official. "What am
 I talking about?" he thought, eyeing him with a vague gaze.
 Mistrusted--not misunderstood--was the right symbol for these people.
 Misunderstood was the other kind of curse. Both had been brought on his
 head by that fellow Haldin. And his head ached terribly. He passed his
 hand over his brow--an involuntary gesture of suffering, which he was
 too careless to restrain. At that moment Razumov beheld his own brain
 suffering on the rack--a long, pale figure drawn asunder horizontally
 with terrific force in the darkness of a vault, whose face he failed to
 see. It was as though he had dreamed for an infinitesimal fraction of
 time of some dark print of the Inquisition.
 
 It is not to be seriously supposed that Razumov had actually dozed off
 and had dreamed in the presence of Councillor Mikulin, of an old print
 of the Inquisition. He was indeed extremely exhausted, and he records
 a remarkably dream-like experience of anguish at the circumstance
 that there was no one whatever near the pale and extended figure. The
 solitude of the racked victim was particularly horrible to behold. The
 mysterious impossibility to see the face, he also notes, inspired a sort
 of terror. All these characteristics of an ugly dream were present. Yet
 he is certain that he never lost the consciousness of himself on the
 sofa, leaning forward with his hands between his knees and turning his
--**--**--
 
 Razumov felt himself colouring with annoyance.
 
 "I am reasonable. I am even--permit me to say--a thinker, though to
 be sure, this name nowadays seems to be the monopoly of hawkers of
 revolutionary wares, the slaves of some French or German thought--devil
 knows what foreign notions. But I am not an intellectual mongrel. I
 think like a Russian. I think faithfully--and I take the liberty to call
 myself a thinker. It is not a forbidden word, as far as I know."
 
 "No. Why should it be a forbidden word?" Councillor Mikulin turned in
 his seat with crossed legs and resting his elbow on the table propped
 his head on the knuckles of a half-closed hand. Razumov noticed a thick
 forefinger clasped by a massive gold band set with a blood-red stone--a
 signet ring that, looking as if it could weigh half a pound, was
 an appropriate ornament for that ponderous man with the accurate
 middle-parting of glossy hair above a rugged Socratic forehead.
 
 "Could it be a wig?" Razumov detected himself wondering with an
 unexpected detachment. His self-confidence was much shaken. He resolved
 to chatter no more. Reserve! Reserve! All he had to do was to keep
 the Ziemianitch episode secret with absolute determination, when the
 questions came. Keep Ziemianitch strictly out of all the answers.
 
 Councillor Mikulin looked at him dimly. Razumov's self-confidence
 abandoned him completely. It seemed impossible to keep Ziemianitch out.
 Every question would lead to that, because, of course, there was nothing
 else. He made an effort to brace himself up. It was a failure. But
 Councillor Mikulin was surprisingly detached too.
 
 "Why should it be forbidden?" he repeated. "I too consider myself
 a thinking man, I assure you. The principal condition is to think
 correctly. I admit it is difficult sometimes at first for a young man
--**--**--
 "At eleven o'clock the Court pronounces in summary form the death
 sentence.
 
 "The execution is fixed for four o'clock in the afternoon, subject to
 further instructions from superior authorities."
 
 Councillor Mikulin dropped the page of foolscap, glanced down his beard,
 and turning to Razumov, added in an easy, explanatory tone--
 
 "We saw no object in delaying the execution. The order to carry out the
 sentence was sent by telegraph at noon. I wrote out the telegram myself.
 He was hanged at four o'clock this afternoon."
 
 The definite information of Haldin's death gave Razumov the feeling of
 general lassitude which follows a great exertion or a great excitement.
 He kept very still on the sofa, but a murmur escaped him--
 
 "He had a belief in a future existence."
 
 Councillor Mikulin shrugged his shoulders slightly, and Razumov got up
 with an effort. There was nothing now to stay for in that room. Haldin
 had been hanged at four o'clock. There could be no doubt of that. He
 had, it seemed, entered upon his future existence, long boots, Astrakhan
 fur cap and all, down to the very leather strap round his waist. A
 flickering, vanishing sort of existence. It was not his soul, it was his
 mere phantom he had left behind on this earth--thought Razumov, smiling
 caustically to himself while he crossed the room, utterly forgetful of
 where he was and of Councillor Mikulin's existence. The official could
 have set a lot of bells ringing all over the building without leaving
 his chair. He let Razumov go quite up to the door before he spoke.
 
 "Come, Kirylo Sidorovitch--what are you doing?"
 
 Razumov turned his head and looked at him in silence. He was not in the
 least disconcerted. Councillor Mikulin's arms were stretched out on the
 table before him and his body leaned forward a little with an effort of
--**--**--
 to look at me and listen to me for a year. I begin to think there
 is something about me which people don't seem able to make out. It's
 unfortunate. I imagine, however, that Prince K--- understands. He seemed
 to."
 
 Councillor Mikulin moved slightly and spoke.
 
 "Prince K--- is aware of everything that is being done, and I don't
 mind informing you that he approved my intention of becoming personally
 acquainted with you."
 
 Razumov concealed an immense disappointment under the accents of railing
 surprise.
 
 "So he is curious too!... Well--after all, Prince K--- knows me very
 little. It is really very unfortunate for me, but--it is not exactly my
 fault."
 
 Councillor Mikulin raised a hasty deprecatory hand and inclined his head
 slightly over his shoulder.
 
 "Now, Mr. Razumov--is it necessary to take it in that way? Everybody I
 am sure can...."
 
 He glanced rapidly down his beard, and when he looked up again there
 was for a moment an interested expression in his misty gaze. Razumov
 discouraged it with a cold, repellent smile.
 
 "No. That's of no importance to be sure--except that in respect of all
 this curiosity being aroused by a very simple matter.... What is to
 be done with it? It is unappeasable. I mean to say there is nothing to
 appease it with. I happen to have been born a Russian with patriotic
 instincts--whether inherited or not I am not in a position to say."
 
 Razumov spoke consciously with elaborate steadiness.
 
 "Yes, patriotic instincts developed by a faculty of independent
 thinking--of detached thinking. In that respect I am more free than any
 social democratic revolution could make me. It is more than probable
 that I don't think exactly as you are thinking. Indeed, how could it be?
 You would think most likely at this moment that I am elaborately lying
--**--**--
 of a future existence. But I cannot give up praying for my son."
 
 She added with a sort of stony grimness, colouring slightly, and
 in French, "_Ce n'est peut etre qu'une habitude._" ("It may be only
 habit.")
 
 Miss Haldin was carrying the prayer-book. She did not glance at her
 mother.
 
 "You and Victor are both profound believers," she said.
 
 I communicated to them the news from their country which I had just
 read in a cafe. For a whole minute we walked together fairly briskly in
 silence. Then Mrs. Haldin murmured--
 
 "There will be more trouble, more persecutions for this. They may be
 even closing the University. There is neither peace nor rest in Russia
 for one but in the grave.
 
 "Yes. The way is hard," came from the daughter, looking straight before
 her at the Chain of Jura covered with snow, like a white wall closing
 the end of the street. "But concord is not so very far off."
 
 "That is what my children think," observed Mrs. Haldin to me.
 
 I did not conceal my feeling that these were strange times to talk of
 concord. Nathalie Haldin surprised me by saying, as if she had thought
 very much on the subject, that the occidentals did not understand the
 situation. She was very calm and youthfully superior.
 
 "You think it is a class conflict, or a conflict of interests, as
 social contests are with you in Europe. But it is not that at all. It is
 something quite different."
 
 "It is quite possible that I don't understand," I admitted.
 
 That propensity of lifting every problem from the plane of the
 understandable by means of some sort of mystic expression, is very
 Russian. I knew her well enough to have discovered her scorn for all
 the practical forms of political liberty known to the western world.
--**--**--
 easily--can they be cemented with blood and violence into that concord
 which you proclaim to be so near?"
 
 She looked at me searchingly with her clear grey eyes, without answering
 my reasonable question--my obvious, my unanswerable question.
 
 "It is inconceivable," I added, with something like annoyance.
 
 "Everything is inconceivable," she said. "The whole world is
 inconceivable to the strict logic of ideas. And yet the world exists to
 our senses, and we exist in it. There must be a necessity superior to
 our conceptions. It is a very miserable and a very false thing to belong
 to the majority. We Russians shall find some better form of national
 freedom than an artificial conflict of parties--which is wrong because
 it is a conflict and contemptible because it is artificial. It is left
 for us Russians to discover a better way."
 
 Mrs. Haldin had been looking out of the window. She turned upon me the
 almost lifeless beauty of her face, and the living benign glance of her
 big dark eyes.
 
 "That's what my children think," she declared.
 
 "I suppose," I addressed Miss Haldin, "that you will be shocked if I
 tell you that I haven't understood--I won't say a single word; I've
 understood all the words.... But what can be this era of disembodied
 concord you are looking forward to. Life is a thing of form. It has its
 plastic shape and a definite intellectual aspect. The most idealistic
 conceptions of love and forbearance must be clothed in flesh as it were
 before they can be made understandable."
 
 I took my leave of Mrs. Haldin, whose beautiful lips never stirred. She
 smiled with her eyes only. Nathalie Haldin went with me as far as the
 door, very amiable.
 
 "Mother imagines that I am the slavish echo of my brother Victor. It
--**--**--
 glancing down the correspondence from Russia--not the telegrams but
 the correspondence--the first thing that caught my eye was the name
 of Haldin. Mr. de P---'s death was no longer an actuality, but the
 enterprising correspondent was proud of having ferreted out some
 unofficial information about that fact of modern history. He had got
 hold of Haldin's name, and had picked up the story of the midnight
 arrest in the street. But the sensation from a journalistic point of
 view was already well in the past. He did not allot to it more than
 twenty lines out of a full column. It was quite enough to give me a
 sleepless night. I perceived that it would have been a sort of treason
 to let Miss Haldin come without preparation upon that journalistic
 discovery which would infallibly be reproduced on the morrow by French
 and Swiss newspapers. I had a very bad time of it till the morning,
 wakeful with nervous worry and night-marish with the feeling of
 being mixed up with something theatrical and morbidly affected. The
 incongruity of such a complication in those two women's lives was
 sensible to me all night in the form of absolute anguish. It seemed due
 to their refined simplicity that it should remain concealed from them
 for ever. Arriving at an unconscionably early hour at the door of their
 apartment, I felt as if I were about to commit an act of vandalism....
 
 The middle-aged servant woman led me into the drawing-room where there
 was a duster on a chair and a broom leaning against the centre table.
 The motes danced in the sunshine; I regretted I had not written a letter
 instead of coming myself, and was thankful for the brightness of the
 day. Miss Haldin in a plain black dress came lightly out of her mother's
--**--**--
 readers for whom this story is written will understand what I mean. It
 was, if I may say so, the want of experience. Death is a remorseless
 spoliator. The anguish of irreparable loss is familiar to us all. There
 is no life so lonely as to be safe against that experience. But the
 grief I had brought to these two ladies had gruesome associations. It
 had the associations of bombs and gallows--a lurid, Russian colouring
 which made the complexion of my sympathy uncertain.
 
 I was grateful to Miss Haldin for not embarrassing me by an outward
 display of deep feeling. I admired her for that wonderful command
 over herself, even while I was a little frightened at it. It was the
 stillness of a great tension. What if it should suddenly snap? Even the
 door of Mrs. Haldin's room, with the old mother alone in there, had a
 rather awful aspect.
 
 Nathalie Haldin murmured sadly--
 
 "I suppose you are wondering what my feelings are?"
 
 Essentially that was true. It was that very wonder which unsettled my
 sympathy of a dense Occidental. I could get hold of nothing but of some
 commonplace phrases, those futile phrases that give the measure of our
 impotence before each other's trials I mumbled something to the effect
 that, for the young, life held its hopes and compensations. It held
 duties too--but of that I was certain it was not necessary to remind
 her.
 
 She had a handkerchief in her hands and pulled at it nervously.
 
 "I am not likely to forget my mother," she said. "We used to be three.
 Now we are two--two women. She's not so very old. She may live quite a
 long time yet. What have we to look for in the future? For what hope
 and what consolation?"
 
 "You must take a wider view," I said resolutely, thinking that with this
--**--**--
 "We do not know the address of any of his friends. Indeed, we know
 nothing of his Petersburg comrades. He had a multitude of young friends,
 only he never spoke much of them. One could guess that they were his
 disciples and that they idolized him. But he was so modest. One would
 think that with so many devoted...."
 
 She averted her head again and looked down the Boulevard des
 Philosophes, a singularly arid and dusty thoroughfare, where nothing
 could be seen at the moment but two dogs, a little girl in a pinafore
 hopping on one leg, and in the distance a workman wheeling a bicycle.
 
 "Even amongst the Apostles of Christ there was found a Judas," she
 whispered as if to herself, but with the evident intention to be heard
 by me.
 
 The Russian visitors assembled in little knots, conversed amongst
 themselves meantime, in low murmurs, and with brief glances in our
 direction. It was a great contrast to the usual loud volubility of these
 gatherings. Miss Haldin followed me into the ante-room.
 
 "People will come," she said. "We cannot shut the door in their faces."
 
 While I was putting on my overcoat she began to talk to me of her
 mother. Poor Mrs. Haldin was fretting after more news. She wanted to go
 on hearing about her unfortunate son. She could not make up her mind to
 abandon him quietly to the dumb unknown. She would persist in pursuing
 him in there through the long days of motionless silence face to face
 with the empty Boulevard des Philosophes. She could not understand why
 he had not escaped--as so many other revolutionists and conspirators
 had managed to escape in other instances of that kind. It was really
 inconceivable that the means of secret revolutionary organisations
 should have failed so inexcusably to preserve her son. But in reality
--**--**--
 I never spoke with greater sincerity than when I agreed with her that it
 would be deplorable in the highest degree. She took an anxious breath.
 
 "But all these strange details in the English paper," she exclaimed
 suddenly. "What is the meaning of them? I suppose they are true? But is
 it not terrible that my poor brother should be caught wandering alone,
 as if in despair, about the streets at night...."
 
 We stood so close to each other in the dark anteroom that I could see
 her biting her lower lip to suppress a dry sob. After a short pause she
 said--
 
 "I suggested to mother that he may have been betrayed by some false
 friend or simply by some cowardly creature. It may be easier for her to
 believe that."
 
 I understood now the poor woman's whispered allusion to Judas.
 
 "It may be easier," I admitted, admiring inwardly the directness and the
 subtlety of the girl's outlook. She was dealing with life as it was
 made for her by the political conditions of her country. She faced cruel
 realities, not morbid imaginings of her own making. I could not defend
 myself from a certain feeling of respect when she added simply--
 
 "Time they say can soften every sort of bitterness. But I cannot believe
 that it has any power over remorse. It is better that mother should
 think some person guilty of Victor's death, than that she should connect
 it with a weakness of her son or a shortcoming of her own."
 
 "But you, yourself, don't suppose that...." I began.
 
 She compressed her lips and shook her head. She harboured no evil
 thoughts against any one, she declared--and perhaps nothing that
 happened was unnecessary. On these words, pronounced low and sounding
 mysterious in the half obscurity of the ante-room, we parted with an
--**--**--
 appearance of flesh and hair with not a single feature having any sort
 of character. His eyes being hidden by the dark glasses there was an
 utter absence of all expression. I knew him by sight. He was a Russian
 refugee of mark. All Geneva knew his burly black-coated figure. At one
 time all Europe was aware of the story of his life written by himself
 and translated into seven or more languages. In his youth he had led
 an idle, dissolute life. Then a society girl he was about to marry died
 suddenly and thereupon he abandoned the world of fashion, and began
 to conspire in a spirit of repentance, and, after that, his native
 autocracy took good care that the usual things should happen to him.
 He was imprisoned in fortresses, beaten within an inch of his life, and
 condemned to work in mines, with common criminals. The great success of
 his book, however, was the chain.
 
 I do not remember now the details of the weight and length of the
 fetters riveted on his limbs by an "Administrative" order, but it was in
 the number of pounds and the thickness of links an appalling assertion
 of the divine right of autocracy. Appalling and futile too, because this
 big man managed to carry off that simple engine of government with him
 into the woods. The sensational clink of these fetters is heard all
 through the chapters describing his escape--a subject of wonder to two
 continents. He had begun by concealing himself successfully from
 his guard in a hole on a river bank. It was the end of the day; with
 infinite labour he managed to free one of his legs. Meantime night
 fell. He was going to begin on his other leg when he was overtaken by a
--**--**--
 sound of his own voice. It seemed as though he had lost the faculty
 of speech. He had become a dumb and despairing brute, till the woman's
 sudden, unexpected cry of profound pity, the insight of her feminine
 compassion discovering the complex misery of the man under the
 terrifying aspect of the monster, restored him to the ranks of humanity.
 This point of view is presented in his book, with a very effective
 eloquence. She ended, he says, by shedding tears over him, sacred,
 redeeming tears, while he also wept with joy in the manner of a
 converted sinner. Directing him to hide in the bushes and wait patiently
 (a police patrol was expected in the Settlement) she went away towards
 the houses, promising to return at night.
 
 As if providentially appointed to be the newly wedded wife of the
 village blacksmith, the woman persuaded her husband to come out with
 her, bringing some tools of his trade, a hammer, a chisel, a small
 anvil.... "My fetters"--the book says--"were struck off on the banks
 of the stream, in the starlight of a calm night by an athletic, taciturn
 young man of the people, kneeling at my feet, while the woman like a
 liberating genius stood by with clasped hands." Obviously a symbolic
 couple. At the same time they furnished his regained humanity with some
 decent clothing, and put heart into the new man by the information that
 the seacoast of the Pacific was only a very few miles away. It could be
 seen, in fact, from the top of the next ridge....
 
 The rest of his escape does not lend itself to mystic treatment and
 symbolic interpretation. He ended by finding his way to the West by
 the Suez Canal route in the usual manner. Reaching the shores of South
--**--**--
 
 "How is it, Natalia Victorovna, that you have kept aloof so long, from
 what after all is--let disparaging tongues say what they like--a unique
 centre of intellectual freedom and of effort to shape a high conception
 of our future? In the case of your honoured mother I understand in a
 measure. At her age new ideas--new faces are not perhaps.... But you!
 Was it mistrust--or indifference? You must come out of your reserve.
 We Russians have no right to be reserved with each other. In our
 circumstances it is almost a crime against humanity. The luxury of
 private grief is not for us. Nowadays the devil is not combated by
 prayers and fasting. And what is fasting after all but starvation. You
 must not starve yourself, Natalia Victorovna. Strength is what we want.
 Spiritual strength, I mean. As to the other kind, what could withstand
 us Russians if we only put it forth? Sin is different in our day, and
 the way of salvation for pure souls is different too. It is no longer to
 be found in monasteries but in the world, in the..."
 
 The deep sound seemed to rise from under the floor, and one felt steeped
 in it to the lips. Miss Haldin's interruption resembled the effort of
 a drowning person to keep above water. She struck in with an accent of
 impatience--
 
 "But, Peter Ivanovitch, I don't mean to retire into a monastery. Who
 would look for salvation there?"
 
 "I spoke figuratively," he boomed.
 
 "Well, then, I am speaking figuratively too. But sorrow is sorrow and
 pain is pain in the old way. They make their demands upon people. One
 has got to face them the best way one can. I know that the blow which
 has fallen upon us so unexpectedly is only an episode in the fate of a
--**--**--
 "That's right. That's right. I haven't obtained your full confidence
 as yet, Natalia Victorovna, but that will come. All in good time. The
 sister of Viktor Haldin cannot be without importance.... It's simply
 impossible. And no woman can remain sitting on the steps. Flowers,
 tears, applause--that has had its time; it's a mediaeval conception. The
 arena, the arena itself is the place for women!"
 
 He relinquished her hand with a flourish, as if giving it to her for a
 gift, and remained still, his head bowed in dignified submission before
 her femininity.
 
 "The arena!... You must descend into the arena, Natalia."
 
 He made one step backwards, inclined his enormous body, and was gone
 swiftly. The door fell to behind him. But immediately the powerful
 resonance of his voice was heard addressing in the ante-room the
 middle-aged servant woman who was letting him out. Whether he exhorted
 her too to descend into the arena I cannot tell. The thing sounded like
 a lecture, and the slight crash of the outer door cut it short suddenly.
 
 
 III
 
 
 "We remained looking at each other for a time."
 
 "Do you know who he is?"
 
 Miss Haldin, coming forward, put this question to me in English.
 
 I took her offered hand.
 
 "Everybody knows. He is a revolutionary feminist, a great writer, if
 you like, and--how shall I say it--the--the familiar guest of Madame de
 S--'s mystic revolutionary salon."
 
 Miss Haldin passed her hand over her forehead.
 
 "You know, he was with me for more than an hour before you came in. I
 was so glad mother was lying down. She has many nights without sleep,
 and then sometimes in the middle of the day she gets a rest of several
 hours. It is sheer exhaustion--but still, I am thankful.... If it
 were not for these intervals...."
--**--**--
 "Compromised politically, I suppose," I remarked.
 
 "I don't know. Yes. It must be so. Who knows! Perhaps it was this very
 friendship with my brother which.... But no! It is scarcely possible.
 Really, I know nothing except what Peter Ivanovitch told me of him. He
 has brought a letter of introduction from Father Zosim--you know, the
 priest-democrat; you have heard of Father Zosim?"
 
 "Oh yes. The famous Father Zosim was staying here in Geneva for some two
 months about a year ago," I said. "When he left here he seems to have
 disappeared from the world."
 
 "It appears that he is at work in Russia again. Somewhere in the
 centre," Miss Haldin said, with animation. "But please don't mention
 that to any one--don't let it slip from you, because if it got into the
 papers it would be dangerous for him."
 
 "You are anxious, of course, to meet that friend of your brother?" I
 asked.
 
 Miss Haldin put the letter into her pocket. Her eyes looked beyond my
 shoulder at the door of her mother's room.
 
 "Not here," she murmured. "Not for the first time, at least."
 
 After a moment of silence I said good-bye, but Miss Haldin followed me
 into the ante-room, closing the door behind us carefully.
 
 "I suppose you guess where I mean to go tomorrow?"
 
 "You have made up your mind to call on Madame de S--."
 
 "Yes. I am going to the Chateau Borel. I must."
 
 "What do you expect to hear there?" I asked, in a low voice.
 
 I wondered if she were not deluding herself with some impossible hope.
 It was not that, however.
 
 "Only think--such a friend. The only man mentioned in his letters. He
 would have something to give me, if nothing more than a few poor words.
 It may be something said and thought in those last days. Would you want
--**--**--
 grey of Miss Haldin's frank eyes, turned to me with a friendly greeting.
 
 I inquired after the health of her mother.
 
 She had a slight movement of the shoulders and a little sad sigh.
 
 "But, you see, I did come out for a walk...for exercise, as you
 English say."
 
 I smiled approvingly, and she added an unexpected remark--
 
 "It is a glorious day."
 
 Her voice, slightly harsh, but fascinating with its masculine and
 bird-like quality, had the accent of spontaneous conviction. I was glad
 of it. It was as though she had become aware of her youth--for there was
 but little of spring-like glory in the rectangular railed space of
 grass and trees, framed visibly by the orderly roof-slopes of that town,
 comely without grace, and hospitable without sympathy. In the very air
 through which she moved there was but little warmth; and the sky, the
 sky of a land without horizons, swept and washed clean by the April
 showers, extended a cold cruel blue, without elevation, narrowed
 suddenly by the ugly, dark wall of the Jura where, here and there,
 lingered yet a few miserable trails and patches of snow. All the glory
 of the season must have been within herself--and I was glad this feeling
 had come into her life, if only for a little time.
 
 "I am pleased to hear you say these words." She gave me a quick look.
 Quick, not stealthy. If there was one thing of which she was absolutely
 incapable, it was stealthiness, Her sincerity was expressed in the very
 rhythm of her walk. It was I who was looking at her covertly--if I may
 say so. I knew where she had been, but I did not know what she had seen
 and heard in that nest of aristocratic conspiracies. I use the word
--**--**--
 disconcerted by the solitude, but after a while she became aware of a
 voice speaking continuously somewhere.
 
 "You were probably being observed all the time," I suggested. "There
 must have been eyes."
 
 "I don't see how that could be," she retorted. "I haven't seen even a
 bird in the grounds. I don't remember hearing a single twitter in the
 trees. The whole place appeared utterly deserted except for the voice."
 
 She could not make out the language--Russian, French, or German. No one
 seemed to answer it. It was as though the voice had been left behind by
 the departed inhabitants to talk to the bare walls. It went on volubly,
 with a pause now and then. It was lonely and sad. The time seemed very
 long to Miss Haldin. An invincible repugnance prevented her from opening
 one of the doors in the hall. It was so hopeless. No one would come, the
 voice would never stop. She confessed to me that she had to resist an
 impulse to turn round and go away unseen, as she had come.
 
 "Really? You had that impulse?" I cried, full of regret. "What a pity
 you did not obey it."
 
 She shook her head.
 
 "What a strange memory it would have been for one. Those deserted
 grounds, that empty hall, that impersonal, voluble voice, and--nobody,
 nothing, not a soul."
 
 The memory would have been unique and harmless. But she was not a girl
 to run away from an intimidating impression of solitude and mystery.
 "No, I did not run away," she said. "I stayed where I was--and I did see
 a soul. Such a strange soul."
 
 As she was gazing up the broad staircase, and had concluded that
 the voice came from somewhere above, a rustle of dress attracted her
 attention. She looked down and saw a woman crossing the hall, having
--**--**--
 
 It appeared that Madame de S-- could not bear Swiss servants about
 her person; and, indeed, servants would not stay for very long in the
 Chateau Borel. There were always difficulties. Miss Haldin had already
 noticed that the hall was like a dusty barn of marble and stucco with
 cobwebs in the corners and faint tracks of mud on the black and white
 tessellated floor.
 
 "I look also after this animal," continued the _dame de compagnie_,
 keeping her hands folded quietly in front of her; and she bent her
 worn gaze upon the cat. "I don't mind a bit. Animals have their rights;
 though, strictly speaking, I see no reason why they should not suffer as
 well as human beings. Do you? But of course they never suffer so much.
 That is impossible. Only, in their case it is more pitiful because they
 cannot make a revolution. I used to be a Republican. I suppose you are a
 Republican?"
 
 Miss Haldin confessed to me that she did not know what to say. But she
 nodded slightly, and asked in her turn--
 
 "And are you no longer a Republican?"
 
 "After taking down Peter Ivanovitch from dictation for two years, it is
 difficult for me to be anything. First of all, you have to sit perfectly
 motionless. The slightest movement you make puts to flight the ideas of
 Peter Ivanovitch. You hardly dare to breathe. And as to coughing--God
 forbid! Peter Ivanovitch changed the position of the table to the wall
 because at first I could not help raising my eyes to look out of the
 window, while waiting for him to go on with his dictation. That was not
 allowed. He said I stared so stupidly. I was likewise not permitted to
 look at him over my shoulder. Instantly Peter Ivanovitch stamped his
--**--**--
 the bottom step here and keep silent."
 
 Miss Haldin hastened to assure her that, on the contrary, she was very
 much interested in the story of the journeyman lithographer. He was a
 revolutionist, of course.
 
 "A martyr, a simple man," said the _dame de compangnie_, with a faint
 sigh, and gazing through the open front door dreamily. She turned her
 misty brown eyes on Miss Haldin.
 
 "I lived with him for four months. It was like a nightmare."
 
 As Miss Haldin looked at her inquisitively she began to describe the
 emaciated face of the man, his fleshless limbs, his destitution.
 The room into which the apple-woman had led her was a tiny garret, a
 miserable den under the roof of a sordid house. The plaster fallen off
 the walls covered the floor, and when the door was opened a horrible
 tapestry of black cobwebs waved in the draught. He had been liberated a
 few days before--flung out of prison into the streets. And Miss Haldin
 seemed to see for the first time, a name and a face upon the body of
 that suffering people whose hard fate had been the subject of so many
 conversations, between her and her brother, in the garden of their
 country house.
 
 He had been arrested with scores and scores of other people in that
 affair of the lithographed temperance tracts. Unluckily, having got hold
 of a great many suspected persons, the police thought they could extract
 from some of them other information relating to the revolutionist
 propaganda.
 
 "They beat him so cruelly in the course of investigation," went on the
 _dame de compagnie_, "that they injured him internally. When they had
 done with him he was doomed. He could do nothing for himself. I beheld
 him lying on a wooden bedstead without any bedding, with his head on a
--**--**--
 rapidly over her shoulder at Miss Haldin, who remained within the hall.
 
 "Failed to escape," she repeated absently. "Didn't he make the sacrifice
 of his life? Wasn't he just simply inspired? Wasn't it an act of
 abnegation? Aren't you certain?"
 
 "What I am certain of," said Miss Haldin, "is that it was not an act
 of despair. Have you not heard some opinion expressed here upon his
 miserable capture?"
 
 The _dame de compagnie_ mused for a while in the doorway.
 
 "Did I hear? Of course, everything is discussed here. Has not all the
 world been speaking about your brother? For my part, the mere mention
 of his achievement plunges me into an envious ecstasy. Why should a man
 certain of immortality think of his life at all?"
 
 She kept her back turned to Miss Haldin. Upstairs from behind a great
 dingy white and gold door, visible behind the balustrade of the first
 floor landing, a deep voice began to drone formally, as if reading over
 notes or something of the sort. It paused frequently, and then ceased
 altogether.
 
 "I don't think I can stay any longer now," said Miss Haldin. "I may
 return another day."
 
 She waited for the _dame de compagnie_ to make room for her exit; but
 the woman appeared lost in the contemplation of sunshine and shadows,
 sharing between themselves the stillness of the deserted grounds. She
 concealed the view of the drive from Miss Haldin. Suddenly she said--
 
 "It will not be necessary; here is Peter Ivanovitch himself coming up.
 But he is not alone. He is seldom alone now."
 
 Hearing that Peter Ivanovitch was approaching, Miss Haldin was not so
 pleased as she might have been expected to be. Somehow she had lost
 the desire to see either the heroic captive or Madame de S--, and the
--**--**--
 
 Miss Haldin shook her head. It was very satisfactory to me. She had
 not seen Madame de S--! That was excellent, excellent! I welcomed the
 conviction that she would never know Madame de S-- now. I could not
 explain the reason of the conviction but by the knowledge that Miss
 Haldin was standing face to face with her brother's wonderful friend. I
 preferred him to Madame de S-- as the companion and guide of that young
 girl, abandoned to her inexperience by the miserable end of her brother.
 But, at any rate, that life now ended had been sincere, and perhaps its
 thoughts might have been lofty, its moral sufferings profound, its last
 act a true sacrifice. It is not for us, the staid lovers calmed by
 the possession of a conquered liberty, to condemn without appeal the
 fierceness of thwarted desire.
 
 I am not ashamed of the warmth of my regard for Miss Haldin. It was, it
 must be admitted, an unselfish sentiment, being its own reward. The late
 Victor Haldin--in the light of that sentiment--appeared to me not as a
 sinister conspirator, but as a pure enthusiast. I did not wish indeed
 to judge him, but the very fact that he did not escape, that fact which
 brought so much trouble to both his mother and his sister, spoke to me
 in his favour. Meantime, in my fear of seeing the girl surrender to the
 influence of the Chateau Borel revolutionary feminism, I was more than
 willing to put my trust in that friend of the late Victor Haldin. He was
 nothing but a name, you will say. Exactly! A name! And what's more,
 the only name; the only name to be found in the correspondence between
 brother and sister. The young man had turned up; they had come face to
--**--**--
 After some little time I observed that they could not have hoped to
 remain forgotten for very long, unless the other two had discovered
 Madame de S-- swooning with fatigue, perhaps, or in a state of morbid
 exaltation after the long interview. Either would require their devoted
 ministrations. I could depict to myself Peter Ivanovitch rushing busily
 out of the house again, bareheaded, perhaps, and on across the terrace
 with his swinging gait, the black skirts of the frock-coat floating
 clear of his stout light grey legs. I confess to having looked upon
 these young people as the quarry of the "heroic fugitive." I had the
 notion that they would not be allowed to escape capture. But of that I
 said nothing to Miss Haldin, only as she still remained uncommunicative,
 I pressed her a little.
 
 "Well--but you can tell me at least your impression."
 
 She turned her head to look at me, and turned away again.
 
 "Impression?" she repeated slowly, almost dreamily; then in a quicker
 tone--
 
 "He seems to be a man who has suffered more from his thoughts than from
 evil fortune."
 
 "From his thoughts, you say?"
 
 "And that is natural enough in a Russian," she took me up. "In a young
 Russian; so many of them are unfit for action, and yet unable to rest."
 
 "And you think he is that sort of man?"
 
 "No, I do not judge him. How could I, so suddenly? You asked for my
 impression--I explain my impression. I--I--don't know the world, nor yet
 the people in it; I have been too solitary--I am too young to trust my
 own opinions."
 
 "Trust your instinct," I advised her. "Most women trust to that, and
 make no worse mistakes than men. In this case you have your brother's
 letter to help you."
--**--**--
 
 For some time Miss Haldin made no answer to this very direct question,
 then--
 
 "I have been expecting to see him here to-day," she said quietly.
 
 "You have! Do you meet, then, in this garden? In that case I had better
 leave you at once."
 
 "No, why leave me? And we don't meet in this garden. I have not seen Mr.
 Razumov since that first time. Not once. But I have been expecting
 him...."
 
 She paused. I wondered to myself why that young revolutionist should
 show so little alacrity.
 
 "Before we parted I told Mr. Razumov that I walked here for an hour
 every day at this time. I could not explain to him then why I did not
 ask him to come and see us at once. Mother must be prepared for such a
 visit. And then, you see, I do not know myself what Mr. Razumov has to
 tell us. He, too, must be told first how it is with poor mother. All
 these thoughts flashed through my mind at once. So I told him hurriedly
 that there was a reason why I could not ask him to see us at home, but
 that I was in the habit of walking here.... This is a public place,
 but there are never many people about at this hour. I thought it would
 do very well. And it is so near our apartments. I don't like to be very
 far away from mother. Our servant knows where I am in case I should be
 wanted suddenly."
 
 "Yes. It is very convenient from that point of view," I agreed.
 
 In fact, I thought the Bastions a very convenient place, since the
 girl did not think it prudent as yet to introduce that young man to
 her mother. It was here, then, I thought, looking round at that plot of
--**--**--
 
 "For anyone who knows what the poor soul is thinking of, that sort of
 talk is more painful than her silence. But that is bad too; I can hardly
 endure it, and I dare not break it."
 
 Miss Haldin sighed, refastening a button of her glove which had come
 undone. I knew well enough what a hard time of it she must be having.
 The stress, its causes, its nature, would have undermined the health
 of an Occidental girl; but Russian natures have a singular power of
 resistance against the unfair strains of life. Straight and supple, with
 a short jacket open on her black dress, which made her figure appear
 more slender and her fresh but colourless face more pale, she compelled
 my wonder and admiration.
 
 "I can't stay a moment longer. You ought to come soon to see mother. You
 know she calls you '_L'ami._' It is an excellent name, and she really
 means it. And now _au revoir_; I must run."
 
 She glanced vaguely down the broad walk--the hand she put out to me
 eluded my grasp by an unexpected upward movement, and rested upon my
 shoulder. Her red lips were slightly parted, not in a smile, however,
 but expressing a sort of startled pleasure. She gazed towards the gates
 and said quickly, with a gasp--
 
 "There! I knew it. Here he comes!"
 
 I understood that she must mean Mr. Razumov. A young man was walking up
 the alley, without haste. His clothes were some dull shade of brown, and
 he carried a stick. When my eyes first fell on him, his head was hanging
 on his breast as if in deep thought. While I was looking at him he
 raised it sharply, and at once stopped. I am certain he did, but that
 pause was nothing more perceptible than a faltering check in his gait,
--**--**--
 seems to miss me more, you know, of late. She would want to know what
 delayed me--and, you see, it would be painful for me to dissemble before
 her."
 
 I understood the point very well. For the same reason she checked what
 seemed to be on Mr. Razumov's part a movement to accompany her.
 
 "No! No! I go alone, but meet me here as soon as possible." Then to me
 in a lower, significant tone--
 
 "Mother may be sitting at the window at this moment, looking down
 the street. She must not know anything of Mr. Razumov's presence here
 till--till something is arranged." She paused before she added a little
 louder, but still speaking to me, "Mr. Razumov does not quite understand
 my difficulty, but you know what it is."
 
 
 V
 
 
 With a quick inclination of the head for us both, and an earnest,
 friendly glance at the young man, Miss Haldin left us covering our heads
 and looking after her straight, supple figure receding rapidly. Her walk
 was not that hybrid and uncertain gliding affected by some women, but
 a frank, strong, healthy movement forward. Rapidly she increased the
 distance--disappeared with suddenness at last. I discovered only then
 that Mr. Razumov, after ramming his hat well over his brow, was looking
 me over from head to foot. I dare say I was a very unexpected fact for
 that young Russian to stumble upon. I caught in his physiognomy, in his
 whole bearing, an expression compounded of curiosity and scorn, tempered
 by alarm--as though he had been holding his breath while I was not
 looking. But his eyes met mine with a gaze direct enough. I saw then for
 the first time that they were of a clear brown colour and fringed with
 thick black eyelashes. They were the youngest feature of his face. Not
--**--**--
 novel. How do you know that I want to learn anything about women?...
 What is the meaning of all this?"
 
 "The object, you mean, of this conversation, which I admit I have forced
 upon you in a measure."
 
 "Forced! Object!" he repeated, still keeping half a pace or so behind
 me. "You wanted to talk about women, apparently. That's a subject. But
 I don't care for it. I have never.... In fact, I have had other
 subjects to think about."
 
 "I am concerned here with one woman only--a young girl--the sister of
 your dead friend--Miss Haldin. Surely you can think a little of her.
 What I meant from the first was that there is a situation which you
 cannot be expected to understand."
 
 I listened to his unsteady footfalls by my side for the space of several
 strides.
 
 "I think that it may prepare the ground for your next interview with
 Miss Haldin if I tell you of it. I imagine that she might have had
 something of the kind in her mind when she left us together. I believe
 myself authorized to speak. The peculiar situation I have alluded to
 has arisen in the first grief and distress of Victor Haldin's execution.
 There was something peculiar in the circumstances of his arrest. You no
 doubt know the whole truth...."
 
 I felt my arm seized above the elbow, and next instant found myself
 swung so as to face Mr. Razumov.
 
 "You spring up from the ground before me with this talk. Who the devil
 are you? This is not to be borne! Why! What for? What do you know
 what is or is not peculiar? What have you to do with any confounded
 circumstances, or with anything that happens in Russia, anyway?"
 
 He leaned on his stick with his other hand, heavily; and when he let go
--**--**--
 of these rare human beings that do not want explaining. At least I think
 so. They had only that son, that brother, for a link with the wider
 world, with the future. The very groundwork of active existence for
 Nathalie Haldin is gone with him. Can you wonder then that she turns
 with eagerness to the only man her brother mentions in his letters. Your
 name is a sort of legacy."
 
 "What could he have written of me?" he cried, in a low, exasperated
 tone.
 
 "Only a few words. It is not for me to repeat them to you, Mr. Razumov;
 but you may believe my assertion that these words are forcible enough to
 make both his mother and his sister believe implicitly in the worth of
 your judgment and in the truth of anything you may have to say to them.
 It's impossible for you now to pass them by like strangers."
 
 I paused, and for a moment sat listening to the footsteps of the few
 people passing up and down the broad central walk. While I was speaking
 his head had sunk upon his breast above his folded arms. He raised it
 sharply.
 
 "Must I go then and lie to that old woman!"
 
 It was not anger; it was something else, something more poignant, and
 not so simple. I was aware of it sympathetically, while I was profoundly
 concerned at the nature of that exclamation.
 
 "Dear me! Won't the truth do, then? I hoped you could have told them
 something consoling. I am thinking of the poor mother now. Your Russia
 _is_ a cruel country."
 
 He moved a little in his chair.
 
 "Yes," I repeated. "I thought you would have had something authentic to
 tell."
 
 The twitching of his lips before he spoke was curious.
 
 "What if it is not worth telling?"
--**--**--
 you."
 
 He threw himself back violently. I kept outwardly calm.
 
 "Yes, I see you here; and I assume you are here on account of the Haldin
 affair?"
 
 His manner changed.
 
 "You call it the Haldin affair--do you?" he observed indifferently.
 
 "I have no right to ask you anything," I said. "I wouldn't presume. But
 in that case the mother and the sister of him who must be a hero in
 your eyes cannot be indifferent to you. The girl is a frank and generous
 creature, having the noblest--well--illusions. You will tell her
 nothing--or you will tell her everything. But speaking now of the object
 with which I've approached you first, we have to deal with the morbid
 state of the mother. Perhaps something could be invented under your
 authority as a cure for a distracted and suffering soul filled with
 maternal affection."
 
 His air of weary indifference was accentuated, I could not help
 thinking, wilfully.
 
 "Oh yes. Something might," he mumbled carelessly.
 
 He put his hand over his mouth to conceal a yawn. When he uncovered his
 lips they were smiling faintly.
 
 "Pardon me. This has been a long conversation, and I have not had much
 sleep the last two nights."
 
 This unexpected, somewhat insolent sort of apology had the merit of
 being perfectly true. He had had no nightly rest to speak of since that
 day when, in the grounds of the Chateau Borel, the sister of Victor
 Haldin had appeared before him. The perplexities and the complex
 terrors--I may say--of this sleeplessness are recorded in the document
 I was to see later--the document which is the main source of this
 narrative. At the moment he looked to me convincingly tired, gone slack
 all over, like a man who has passed through some sort of crisis.
 
 "I have had a lot of urgent writing to do," he added.
--**--**--
 
 
 The water under the bridge ran violent and deep. Its slightly undulating
 rush seemed capable of scouring out a channel for itself through solid
 granite while you looked. But had it flowed through Razumov's breast,
 it could not have washed away the accumulated bitterness the wrecking of
 his life had deposited there.
 
 "What is the meaning of all this?" he thought, staring downwards at
 the headlong flow so smooth and clean that only the passage of a faint
 air-bubble, or a thin vanishing streak of foam like a white hair,
 disclosed its vertiginous rapidity, its terrible force. "Why has that
 meddlesome old Englishman blundered against me? And what is this silly
 tale of a crazy old woman?"
 
 He was trying to think brutally on purpose, but he avoided any mental
 reference to the young girl. "A crazy old woman," he repeated to
 himself. "It is a fatality! Or ought I to despise all this as absurd?
 But no! I am wrong! I can't afford to despise anything. An absurdity may
 be the starting-point of the most dangerous complications. How is one
 to guard against it? It puts to rout one's intelligence. The more
 intelligent one is the less one suspects an absurdity."
 
 A wave of wrath choked his thoughts for a moment. It even made his body
 leaning over the parapet quiver; then he resumed his silent thinking,
 like a secret dialogue with himself. And even in that privacy, his
 thought had some reservations of which he was vaguely conscious.
 
 "After all, this is not absurd. It is insignificant. It is absolutely
 insignificant--absolutely. The craze of an old woman--the fussy
 officiousness of a blundering elderly Englishman. What devil put him in
 the way? Haven't I treated him cavalierly enough? Haven't I just? That's
 the way to treat these meddlesome persons. Is it possible that he still
--**--**--
 Ivanovitch seemed to be waiting for his approach.
 
 The ceremonious black frock-coat and the bared head of Europe's greatest
 feminist accentuated the dubiousness of his status in the house rented
 by Madame de S--, his Egeria. His aspect combined the formality of the
 caller with the freedom of the proprietor. Florid and bearded and masked
 by the dark blue glasses, he met the visitor, and at once took him
 familiarly under the arm.
 
 Razumov suppressed every sign of repugnance by an effort which the
 constant necessity of prudence had rendered almost mechanical. And
 this necessity had settled his expression in a cast of austere, almost
 fanatical, aloofness. The "heroic fugitive," impressed afresh by the
 severe detachment of this new arrival from revolutionary Russia, took a
 conciliatory, even a confidential tone. Madame de S-- was resting after
 a bad night. She often had bad nights. He had left his hat upstairs on
 the landing and had come down to suggest to his young friend a stroll
 and a good open-hearted talk in one of the shady alleys behind the
 house. After voicing this proposal, the great man glanced at the unmoved
 face by his side, and could not restrain himself from exclaiming--
 
 "On my word, young man, you are an extraordinary person."
 
 "I fancy you are mistaken, Peter Ivanovitch. If I were really an
 extraordinary person, I would not be here, walking with you in a garden
 in Switzerland, Canton of Geneva, Commune of--what's the name of the
 Commune this place belongs to?... Never mind--the heart of democracy,
 anyhow. A fit heart for it; no bigger than a parched pea and about as
 much value. I am no more extraordinary than the rest of us Russians,
 wandering abroad."
 
 But Peter Ivanovitch dissented emphatically--
 
 "No! No! You are not ordinary. I have some experience of Russians who
--**--**--
 
 "You have been watching me?" suggested Razumov.
 
 "Yes."
 
 The great man had spoken in a tone of perfect frankness, but as they
 turned their faces to each other Razumov felt baffled by the dark
 spectacles. Under their cover, Peter Ivanovitch hinted that he had felt
 for some time the need of meeting a man of energy and character, in view
 of a certain project. He said nothing more precise, however; and after
 some critical remarks upon the personalities of the various members
 of the committee of revolutionary action in Stuttgart, he let the
 conversation lapse for quite a long while. They paced the alley from end
 to end. Razumov, silent too, raised his eyes from time to time to cast a
 glance at the back of the house. It offered no sign of being inhabited.
 With its grimy, weather-stained walls and all the windows shuttered from
 top to bottom, it looked damp and gloomy and deserted. It might very
 well have been haunted in traditional style by some doleful, groaning,
 futile ghost of a middle-class order. The shades evoked, as worldly
 rumour had it, by Madame de S-- to meet statesmen, diplomatists,
 deputies of various European Parliaments, must have been of another
 sort. Razumov had never seen Madame de S-- but in the carriage.
 
 Peter Ivanovitch came out of his abstraction.
 
 "Two things I may say to you at once. I believe, first, that neither a
 leader nor any decisive action can come out of the dregs of a people.
 Now, if you ask me what are the dregs of a people--h'm--it would take
 too long to tell. You would be surprised at the variety of ingredients
 that for me go to the making up of these dregs--of that which ought,
 _must_ remain at the bottom. Moreover, such a statement might be subject
--**--**--
 somewhere altogether, and had disappeared when they entered the hall. In
 the crude light falling from the dusty glass skylight upon the black
 and white tessellated floor, covered with muddy tracks, their footsteps
 echoed faintly. The great feminist led the way up the stairs. On the
 balustrade of the first-floor landing a shiny tall hat reposed, rim
 upwards, opposite the double door of the drawing-room, haunted, it
 was said, by evoked ghosts, and frequented, it was to be supposed, by
 fugitive revolutionists. The cracked white paint of the panels, the
 tarnished gilt of the mouldings, permitted one to imagine nothing but
 dust and emptiness within. Before turning the massive brass handle,
 Peter Ivanovitch gave his young companion a sharp, partly critical,
 partly preparatory glance.
 
 "No one is perfect," he murmured discreetly. Thus, the possessor of a
 rare jewel might, before opening the casket, warn the profane that no
 gem perhaps is flawless.
 
 He remained with his hand on the door-handle so long that Razumov
 assented by a moody "No."
 
 "Perfection itself would not produce that effect," pursued Peter
 Ivanovitch, "in a world not meant for it. But you shall find there a
 mind--no!--the quintessence of feminine intuition which will understand
 any perplexity you may be suffering from by the irresistible,
 enlightening force of sympathy. Nothing can remain obscure before
 that--that--inspired, yes, inspired penetration, this true light of
 femininity."
 
 The gaze of the dark spectacles in its glossy steadfastness gave his
 face an air of absolute conviction. Razumov felt a momentary shrinking
 before that closed door.
 
 "Penetration? Light," he stammered out. "Do you mean some sort of
 thought-reading?"
 
 Peter Ivanovitch seemed shocked.
 
 "I mean something utterly different," he retorted, with a faint, pitying
 smile.
 
 Razumov began to feel angry, very much against his wish.
 
 "This is very mysterious," he muttered through his teeth.
--**--**--
 it something of wailing and croaking, and more than a suspicion of
 hysteria.
 
 "_Voleurs! Voleurs! Vol_...."
 
 "No power on earth can rob you of your genius," shouted Peter Ivanovitch
 in an overpowering bass, but without stirring, without a gesture of any
 kind. A profound silence fell.
 
 Razumov remained outwardly impassive. "What is the meaning of this
 performance?" he was asking himself. But with a preliminary sound
 of bumping outside some door behind him, the lady companion, in a
 threadbare black skirt and frayed blouse, came in rapidly, walking on
 her heels, and carrying in both hands a big Russian samovar, obviously
 too heavy for her. Razumov made an instinctive movement to help, which
 startled her so much that she nearly dropped her hissing burden. She
 managed, however, to land it on the table, and looked so frightened that
 Razumov hastened to sit down. She produced then, from an adjacent room,
 four glass tumblers, a teapot, and a sugar-basin, on a black iron tray.
 
 The rasping voice asked from the sofa abruptly--
 
 "_Les gateaux_? Have you remembered to bring the cakes?"
 
 Peter Ivanovitch, without a word, marched out on to the landing, and
 returned instantly with a parcel wrapped up in white glazed paper, which
 he must have extracted from the interior of his hat. With imperturbable
 gravity he undid the string and smoothed the paper open on a part of the
 table within reach of Madame de S--'s hand. The lady companion poured
 out the tea, then retired into a distant corner out of everybody's
 sight. From time to time Madame de S-- extended a claw-like hand,
 glittering with costly rings, towards the paper of cakes, took up one
 and devoured it, displaying her big false teeth ghoulishly. Meantime she
 talked in a hoarse tone of the political situation in the Balkans. She
--**--**--
 Turks, Bulgarians, Montenegrins, Roumanians, Greeks, Armenians, and
 nondescripts, young and old, the living and the dead. With some money an
 intrigue could be started which would set the Peninsula in a blaze and
 outrage the sentiment of the Russian people. A cry of abandoned brothers
 could be raised, and then, with the nation seething with indignation, a
 couple of regiments or so would be enough to begin a military revolution
 in St. Petersburg and make an end of these thieves....
 
 "Apparently I've got only to sit still and listen," the silent Razumov
 thought to himself. "As to that hairy and obscene brute" (in such terms
 did Mr. Razumov refer mentally to the popular expounder of a feministic
 conception of social state), "as to him, for all his cunning he too
 shall speak out some day."
 
 Razumov ceased to think for a moment. Then a sombre-toned reflection
 formulated itself in his mind, ironical and bitter. "I have the gift of
 inspiring confidence." He heard himself laughing aloud. It was like a
 goad to the painted, shiny-eyed harridan on the sofa.
 
 "You may well laugh!" she cried hoarsely. "What else can one do!
 Perfect swindlers--and what base swindlers at that! Cheap
 Germans--Holstein-Gottorps! Though, indeed, it's hardly safe to say who
 and what they are. A family that counts a creature like Catherine the
 Great in its ancestry--you understand!"
 
 "You are only upsetting yourself," said Peter Ivanovitch, patiently but
 in a firm tone. This admonition had its usual effect on the Egeria. She
 dropped her thick, discoloured eyelids and changed her position on the
 sofa. All her angular and lifeless movements seemed completely automatic
 now that her eyes were closed. Presently she opened them very full.
 Peter Ivanovitch drank tea steadily, without haste.
 
 "Well, I declare!" She addressed Razumov directly. "The people who have
--**--**--
 solemnly. "Effective and universal."
 
 Razumov looked at him suspiciously.
 
 "Some say hunger will do that," he remarked.
 
 "Yes. I know. Our people are starving in heaps. But you can't make
 famine universal. And it is not despair that we want to create. There is
 no moral support to be got out of that. It is indignation...."
 
 Madame de S-- let her thin, extended arm sink on her knees.
 
 "I am not a Mordatiev," began Razumov.
 
 "Bien sur!" murmured Madame de S--.
 
 "Though I too am ready to say extirpate, extirpate! But in my ignorance
 of political work, permit me to ask: A Balkan--well--intrigue, wouldn't
 that take a very long time?"
 
 Peter Ivanovitch got up and moved off quietly, to stand with his face to
 the window. Razumov heard a door close; he turned his head and perceived
 that the lady companion had scuttled out of the room.
 
 "In matters of politics I am a supernaturalist." Madame de S-- broke
 the silence harshly.
 
 Peter Ivanovitch moved away from the window and struck Razumov lightly
 on the shoulder. This was a signal for leaving, but at the same time he
 addressed Madame de S-- in a peculiar reminding tone---
 
 "Eleanor!"
 
 Whatever it meant, she did not seem to hear him. She leaned back in the
 corner of the sofa like a wooden figure. The immovable peevishness of
 the face, framed in the limp, rusty lace, had a character of cruelty.
 
 "As to extirpating," she croaked at the attentive Razumov, "there is
 only one class in Russia which must be extirpated. Only one. And that
 class consists of only one family. You understand me? That one family
 must be extirpated."
 
 Her rigidity was frightful, like the rigor of a corpse galvanized into
 harsh speech and glittering stare by the force of murderous hate. The
--**--**--
 reverberation of the word "driven" along two bare corridors and in the
 great empty hall.
 
 Peter Ivanovitch did not seem startled in the least. The young man
 could not control a dry, uneasy laugh. The great revolutionist remained
 unmoved with an effect of commonplace, homely superiority.
 
 "Curse him," said Razumov to himself, "he is waiting behind his
 spectacles for me to give myself away." Then aloud, with a satanic
 enjoyment of the scorn prompting him to play with the greatness of the
 great man--
 
 "Ah, Peter Ivanovitch, if you only knew the force which drew--no, which
 _drove_ me towards you! The irresistible force."
 
 He did not feel any desire to laugh now. This time Peter Ivanovitch
 moved his head sideways, knowingly, as much as to say, "Don't I?" This
 expressive movement was almost imperceptible. Razumov went on in secret
 derision--
 
 "All these days you have been trying to read me, Peter Ivanovitch. That
 is natural. I have perceived it and I have been frank. Perhaps you may
 think I have not been very expansive? But with a man like you it was not
 needed; it would have looked like an impertinence, perhaps. And besides,
 we Russians are prone to talk too much as a rule. I have always felt
 that. And yet, as a nation, we are dumb. I assure you that I am not
 likely to talk to you so much again--ha! ha!--"
 
 Razumov, still keeping on the lower step, came a little nearer to the
 great man.
 
 "You have been condescending enough. I quite understood it was to lead
 me on. You must render me the justice that I have not tried to please. I
 have been impelled, compelled, or rather sent--let us say sent--towards
 you for a work that no one but myself can do. You would call it a
--**--**--
 formulated his opinion of it in the mental ejaculation: "Beastly!"
 This disgust vanished before a marked uneasiness. "This is an effect of
 nervous exhaustion," he reflected with weary sagacity. "How am I to
 go on day after day if I have no more power of resistance--moral
 resistance?"
 
 He followed the path at the foot of the terrace. "Moral resistance,
 moral resistance;" he kept on repeating these words mentally. Moral
 endurance. Yes, that was the necessity of the situation. An immense
 longing to make his way out of these grounds and to the other end of the
 town, of throwing himself on his bed and going to sleep for hours, swept
 everything clean out of his mind for a moment. "Is it possible that I am
 but a weak creature after all?" he asked himself, in sudden alarm. "Eh!
 What's that?"
 
 He gave a start as if awakened from a dream. He even swayed a little
 before recovering himself.
 
 "Ah! You stole away from us quietly to walk about here," he said.
 
 The lady companion stood before him, but how she came there he had not
 the slightest idea. Her folded arms were closely cherishing the cat.
 
 "I have been unconscious as I walked, it's a positive fact," said
 Razumov to himself in wonder. He raised his hat with marked civility.
 
 The sallow woman blushed duskily. She had her invariably scared
 expression, as if somebody had just disclosed to her some terrible news.
 But she held her ground, Razumov noticed, without timidity. "She is
 incredibly shabby," he thought. In the sunlight her black costume looked
 greenish, with here and there threadbare patches where the stuff seemed
 decomposed by age into a velvety, black, furry state. Her very hair and
 eyebrows looked shabby. Razumov wondered whether she were sixty years
 old. Her figure, though, was young enough. He observed that she did not
--**--**--
 
 She had lowered her eyelids. Razumov looked at her curiously.
 
 "Of course. You hear everything they say."
 
 She murmured without any animosity--
 
 "So do the tables and chairs."
 
 He understood that the bitterness accumulated in the heart of that
 helpless creature had got into her veins, and, like some subtle poison,
 had decomposed her fidelity to that hateful pair. It was a great piece
 of luck for him, he reflected; because women are seldom venal after the
 manner of men, who can be bought for material considerations. She would
 be a good ally, though it was not likely that she was allowed to hear
 as much as the tables and chairs of the Chateau Borel. That could not be
 expected. But still.... And, at any rate, she could be made to talk.
 
 When she looked up her eyes met the fixed stare of Razumov, who began to
 speak at once.
 
 "Well, well, dear...but upon my word, I haven't the pleasure of
 knowing your name yet. Isn't it strange?"
 
 For the first time she made a movement of the shoulders.
 
 "Is it strange? No one is told my name. No one cares. No one talks to
 me, no one writes to me. My parents don't even know if I'm alive. I have
 no use for a name, and I have almost forgotten it myself."
 
 Razumov murmured gravely, "Yes, but still..."
 
 She went on much slower, with indifference--
 
 "You may call me Tekla, then. My poor Andrei called me so. I was devoted
 to him. He lived in wretchedness and suffering, and died in misery. That
 is the lot of all us Russians, nameless Russians. There is nothing else
 for us, and no hope anywhere, unless..."
 
 "Unless what?"
 
 "Unless all these people with names are done away with," she finished,
 blinking and pursing up her lips.
--**--**--
 grass-plot obliquely, without haste. The shorter of the two was buttoned
 up in a narrow overcoat of some thin grey material, which came nearly
 to his heels. His companion, much taller and broader, wore a short,
 close-fitting jacket and tight trousers tucked into shabby top-boots.
 
 The woman, who had sent them out of Razumov's way apparently, spoke in a
 businesslike voice.
 
 "I had to come rushing from Zurich on purpose to meet the train and take
 these two along here to see Peter Ivanovitch. I've just managed it."
 
 "Ah! indeed," Razumov said perfunctorily, and very vexed at her staying
 behind to talk to him "From Zurich--yes, of course. And these two, they
 come from...."
 
 She interrupted, without emphasis--
 
 "From quite another direction. From a distance, too. A considerable
 distance."
 
 Razumov shrugged his shoulders. The two men from a distance, after
 having reached the wall of the terrace, disappeared suddenly at its foot
 as if the earth had opened to swallow them up.
 
 "Oh, well, they have just come from America." The woman in the crimson
 blouse shrugged her shoulders too a little before making that statement.
 "The time is drawing near," she interjected, as if speaking to herself.
 "I did not tell them who you were. Yakovlitch would have wanted to
 embrace you."
 
 "Is that he with the wisp of hair hanging from his chin, in the long
 coat?"
 
 "You've guessed aright. That's Yakovlitch."
 
 "And they could not find their way here from the station without you
 coming on purpose from Zurich to show it to them? Verily, without women
 we can do nothing. So it stands written, and apparently so it is."
 
 He was conscious of an immense lassitude under his effort to be
 sarcastic. And he could see that she had detected it with those steady,
 brilliant black eyes.
--**--**--
 
 "Pardon me," Razumov inquired coldly, "but does it mean that you, for
 instance, think that I am not the right sort?"
 
 She made no protest, gave no sign of having heard the question;
 she continued looking at him in a manner which he judged not to be
 absolutely unfriendly. In Zurich when he passed through she had taken
 him under her charge, in a way, and was with him from morning till night
 during his stay of two days. She took him round to see several people.
 At first she talked to him a great deal and rather unreservedly, but
 always avoiding all reference to herself; towards the middle of the
 second day she fell silent, attending him zealously as before, and even
 seeing him off at the railway station, where she pressed his hand firmly
 through the lowered carriage window, and, stepping back without a word,
 waited till the train moved. He had noticed that she was treated with
 quiet regard. He knew nothing of her parentage, nothing of her private
 history or political record; he judged her from his own private point of
 view, as being a distinct danger in his path. "Judged" is not perhaps
 the right word. It was more of a feeling, the summing up of slight
 impressions aided by the discovery that he could not despise her as he
 despised all the others. He had not expected to see her again so soon.
 
 No, decidedly; her expression was not unfriendly. Yet he perceived an
 acceleration in the beat of his heart. The conversation could not be
 abandoned at that point. He went on in accents of scrupulous inquiry--
 
 "Is it perhaps because I don't seem to accept blindly every development
 of the general doctrine--such for instance as the feminism of our great
 Peter Ivanovitch? If that is what makes me suspect, then I can only say
--**--**--
 sort of mission?"
 
 "Something in the nature of propaganda work."
 
 "Ah! Far away from here?"
 
 "No. Not very far," said Razumov, restraining a sudden desire to laugh,
 although he did not feel joyous in the least.
 
 "So!" she said thoughtfully. "Well, I am not asking questions. It's
 sufficient that Peter Ivanovitch should know what each of us is doing.
 Everything is bound to come right in the end."
 
 "You think so?"
 
 "I don't think, young man. I just simply believe it."
 
 "And is it to Peter Ivanovitch that you owe that faith?"
 
 She did not answer the question, and they stood idle, silent, as if
 reluctant to part with each other.
 
 "That's just like a man," she murmured at last. "As if it were possible
 to tell how a belief comes to one." Her thin Mephistophelian eyebrows
 moved a little. "Truly there are millions of people in Russia who would
 envy the life of dogs in this country. It is a horror and a shame to
 confess this even between ourselves. One must believe for very pity.
 This can't go on. No! It can't go on. For twenty years I have been
 coming and going, looking neither to the left nor to the right....
 What are you smiling to yourself for? You are only at the beginning. You
 have begun well, but you just wait till you have trodden every particle
 of yourself under your feet in your comings and goings. For that is
 what it comes to. You've got to trample down every particle of your own
 feelings; for stop you cannot, you must not. I have been young, too--but
 perhaps you think that I am complaining-eh?"
 
 "I don't think anything of the sort," protested Razumov indifferently.
 
 "I dare say you don't, you dear superior creature. You don't care."
--**--**--
 
 The mysterious positiveness of this assertion startled Razumov. Their
 eyes met. He looked away and, through the bars of the rusty gate, stared
 at the clean, wide road shaded by the leafy trees. An electric tramcar,
 quite empty, ran along the avenue with a metallic rustle. It seemed to
 him he would have given anything to be sitting inside all alone. He
 was inexpressibly weary, weary in every fibre of his body, but he had
 a reason for not being the first to break off the conversation. At any
 instant, in the visionary and criminal babble of revolutionists, some
 momentous words might fall on his ear; from her lips, from anybody's
 lips. As long as he managed to preserve a clear mind and to keep down
 his irritability there was nothing to fear. The only condition of
 success and safety was indomitable will-power, he reminded himself.
 
 He longed to be on the other side of the bars, as though he were
 actually a prisoner within the grounds of this centre of revolutionary
 plots, of this house of folly, of blindness, of villainy and crime.
 Silently he indulged his wounded spirit in a feeling of immense moral
 and mental remoteness. He did not even smile when he heard her repeat
 the words--
 
 "Yes! A strong character."
 
 He continued to gaze through the bars like a moody prisoner, not
 thinking of escape, but merely pondering upon the faded memories of
 freedom.
 
 "If you don't look out," he mumbled, still looking away, "you shall
 certainly miss seeing as much as the mere ghost of that tea."
 
 She was not to be shaken off in such a way. As a matter of fact he had
 not expected to succeed.
 
 "Never mind, it will be no great loss. I mean the missing of her tea and
--**--**--
 "Rot or burn! Powerfully stated. Painted or unpainted. Very vigorous.
 Painted or...Do tell me--she would be infernally jealous of him,
 wouldn't she?"
 
 "Who? What? The Baroness? Eleanor Maximovna? Jealous of Peter
 Ivanovitch? Heavens! Are these the questions the man's mind is running
 on? Such a thing is not to be thought of."
 
 "Why? Can't a wealthy old woman be jealous? Or, are they all pure
 spirits together?"
 
 "But what put it into your head to ask such a question?" she wondered.
 
 "Nothing. I just asked. Masculine frivolity, if you like."
 
 "I don't like," she retorted at once. "It is not the time to be
 frivolous. What are you flinging your very heart against? Or, perhaps,
 you are only playing a part."
 
 Razumov had felt that woman's observation of him like a physical
 contact, like a hand resting lightly on his shoulder. At that moment he
 received the mysterious impression of her having made up her mind for a
 closer grip. He stiffened himself inwardly to bear it without betraying
 himself.
 
 "Playing a Part," he repeated, presenting to her an unmoved profile. "It
 must be done very badly since you see through the assumption."
 
 She watched him, her forehead drawn into perpendicular folds, the thin
 black eyebrows diverging upwards like the antennae of an insect. He
 added hardly audibly--
 
 "You are mistaken. I am doing it no more than the rest of us."
 
 "Who is doing it?" she snapped out.
 
 "Who? Everybody," he said impatiently. "You are a materialist, aren't
 you?"
 
 "Eh! My dear soul, I have outlived all that nonsense."
 
 "But you must remember the definition of Cabanis: 'Man is a digestive
 tube.' I imagine now...."
 
 "I spit on him."
 
 "What? On Cabanis? All right. But you can't ignore the importance of a
 good digestion. The joy of life--you know the joy of life?--depends on
--**--**--
 important things.... That amuses you what? Do you think I am
 boasting?"
 
 "God forbid. I was just only saying to myself that Peter Ivanovitch
 seems to have solved the woman question pretty completely."
 
 Even as he spoke he reproached himself for his words, for his tone. All
 day long he had been saying the wrong things. It was folly, worse than
 folly. It was weakness; it was this disease of perversity overcoming his
 will. Was this the way to meet speeches which certainly contained the
 promise of future confidences from that woman who apparently had a
 great store of secret knowledge and so much influence? Why give her this
 puzzling impression? But she did not seem inimical. There was no anger
 in her voice. It was strangely speculative.
 
 "One does not know what to think, Razumov. You must have bitten
 something bitter in your cradle." Razumov gave her a sidelong glance.
 
 "H'm! Something bitter? That's an explanation," he muttered. "Only it
 was much later. And don't you think, Sophia Antonovna, that you and I
 come from the same cradle?"
 
 The woman, whose name he had forced himself at last to pronounce (he had
 experienced a strong repugnance in letting it pass his lips), the woman
 revolutionist murmured, after a pause--
 
 "You mean--Russia?"
 
 He disdained even to nod. She seemed softened, her black eyes very
 still, as though she were pursuing the simile in her thoughts to all
 its tender associations. But suddenly she knitted her brows in a
 Mephistophelian frown.
 
 "Yes. Perhaps no wonder, then. Yes. One lies there lapped up in evils,
 watched over by beings that are worse than ogres, ghouls, and vampires.
 They must be driven away, destroyed utterly. In regard of that task
 nothing else matters if men and women are determined and faithful.
 That's how I came to feel in the end. The great thing is not to quarrel
--**--**--
 "Well--and then you considered...."
 
 Razumov had it all ready in his head.
 
 "No. I looked at my watch, since you want to know. There was just time.
 I took that notebook, and ran down the stairs on tiptoe. Have you ever
 listened to the pit-pat of a man running round and round the shaft of
 a deep staircase? They have a gaslight at the bottom burning night
 and day. I suppose it's gleaming down there now.... The sound dies
 out--the flame winks...."
 
 He noticed the vacillation of surprise passing over the steady curiosity
 of the black eyes fastened on his face as if the woman revolutionist
 received the sound of his voice into her pupils instead of her ears. He
 checked himself, passed his hand over his forehead, confused, like a man
 who has been dreaming aloud.
 
 "Where could a student be running if not to his lectures in the morning?
 At night it's another matter. I did not care if all the house had been
 there to look at me. But I don't suppose there was anyone. It's best not
 to be seen or heard. Aha! The people that are neither seen nor heard are
 the lucky ones--in Russia. Don't you admire my luck?"
 
 "Astonishing," she said. "If you have luck as well as determination,
 then indeed you are likely to turn out an invaluable acquisition for the
 work in hand."
 
 Her tone was earnest; and it seemed to Razumov that it was speculative,
 even as though she were already apportioning him, in her mind, his share
 of the work. Her eyes were cast down. He waited, not very alert now, but
 with the grip of the ever-present danger giving him an air of
 attentive gravity. Who could have written about him in that letter
 from Petersburg? A fellow student, surely--some imbecile victim of
--**--**--
 "And then one would have lived long enough. White hair won't matter."
 
 Razumov looked at her white hair: and this mark of so many uneasy years
 seemed nothing but a testimony to the invincible vigour of revolt. It
 threw out into an astonishing relief the unwrinkled face, the
 brilliant black glance, the upright compact figure, the simple,
 brisk self-possession of the mature personality--as though in her
 revolutionary pilgrimage she had discovered the secret, not of
 everlasting youth, but of everlasting endurance.
 
 How un-Russian she looked, thought Razumov. Her mother might have been
 a Jewess or an Armenian or devil knew what. He reflected that a
 revolutionist is seldom true to the settled type. All revolt is the
 expression of strong individualism--ran his thought vaguely. One
 can tell them a mile off in any society, in any surroundings. It was
 astonishing that the police....
 
 "We shall not meet again very soon, I think," she was saying. "I am
 leaving to-morrow."
 
 "For Zurich?" Razumov asked casually, but feeling relieved, not from
 any distinct apprehension, but from a feeling of stress as if after a
 wrestling match.
 
 "Yes, Zurich--and farther on, perhaps, much farther. Another journey.
 When I think of all my journeys! The last must come some day. Never
 mind, Razumov. We had to have a good long talk. I would have certainly
 tried to see you if we had not met. Peter Ivanovitch knows where you
 live? Yes. I meant to have asked him--but it's better like this. You
 see, we expect two more men; and I had much rather wait here talking
 with you than up there at the house with...."
 
 Having cast a glance beyond the gate, she interrupted herself. "Here
 they are," she said rapidly. "Well, Kirylo Sidorovitch, we shall have to
 say good-bye, presently."
 
 
 IV
 
 
 In his incertitude of the ground on which he stood Razumov felt
--**--**--
 Antonovna. And at once, her black eyes turned to Razumov, her mind tried
 to get at the heart of that outburst. It had some meaning. No one is
 born an active revolutionist. The change comes disturbingly, with the
 force of a sudden vocation, bringing in its train agonizing doubts,
 assertive violences, an unstable state of the soul, till the final
 appeasement of the convert in the perfect fierceness of conviction. She
 had seen--often had only divined--scores of these young men and young
 women going through an emotional crisis. This young man looked like a
 moody egotist. And besides, it was a special--a unique case. She had
 never met an individuality which interested and puzzled her so much.
 
 "Take care, Razumov, my good friend. If you carry on like this you will
 go mad. You are angry with everybody and bitter with yourself, and on
 the look out for something to torment yourself with."
 
 "It's intolerable!" Razumov could only speak in gasps. "You must admit
 that I can have no illusions on the attitude which...it isn't clear...or
 rather only too clear."
 
 He made a gesture of despair. It was not his courage that failed him.
 The choking fumes of falsehood had taken him by the throat--the thought
 of being condemned to struggle on and on in that tainted atmosphere
 without the hope of ever renewing his strength by a breath of fresh air.
 
 "A glass of cold water is what you want." Sophia Antonovna glanced up
 the grounds at the house and shook her head, then out of the gate at
 the brimful placidity of the lake. With a half-comical shrug of the
 shoulders, she gave the remedy up in the face of that abundance.
 
 "It is you, my dear soul, who are flinging yourself at something which
 does not exist. What is it? Self-reproach, or what? It's absurd. You
--**--**--
 Razumov had listened with a sort of ferocious but amused acquiescence.
 
 "Yes. In the straw. It was probably the cleanest spot in the whole
 house."
 
 "No doubt," assented the woman with that deep frown which seemed to draw
 closer together her black eyes in a sinister fashion. No four-footed
 beast could stand the filth and wretchedness so many human beings were
 condemned to suffer from in Russia. The point of this discovery was that
 it proved Haldin to have been familiar with that horse-owning peasant--a
 reckless, independent, free-living fellow not much liked by the other
 inhabitants of the house. He was believed to have been the associate of
 a band of housebreakers. Some of these got captured. Not while he was
 driving them, however; but still there was a suspicion against the
 fellow of having given a hint to the police and...
 
 The woman revolutionist checked herself suddenly.
 
 "And you? Have you ever heard your friend refer to a certain
 Ziemianitch?"
 
 Razumov was ready for the name. He had been looking out for the
 question. "When it comes I shall own up," he had said to himself. But he
 took his time.
 
 "To be sure!" he began slowly. "Ziemianitch, a peasant owning a team of
 horses. Yes. On one occasion. Ziemianitch! Certainly! Ziemianitch of the
 horses.... How could it have slipped my memory like this? One of the
 last conversations we had together."
 
 "That means,"--Sophia Antonovna looked very grave,--"that means,
 Razumov, it was very shortly before--eh?"
 
 "Before what?" shouted Razumov, advancing at the woman, who looked
 astonished but stood her ground. "Before.... Oh! Of course, it was
 before! How could it have been after? Only a few hours before."
 
 "And he spoke of him favourably?"
 
 "With enthusiasm! The horses of Ziemianitch! The free soul of
 Ziemianitch!"
 
 Razumov took a savage delight in the loud utterance of that name, which
--**--**--
 that house? It was an imbecile thing to do."
 
 A profound disgust came over him. Sophia Antonovna lingered, talking
 in a friendly manner with an evident conciliatory intention. And it was
 still about the famous letter, referring to various minute details
 given by her informant, who had never seen Ziemianitch. The "victim of
 remorse" had been buried several weeks before her correspondent began
 frequenting the house. It--the house--contained very good revolutionary
 material. The spirit of the heroic Haldin had passed through these dens
 of black wretchedness with a promise of universal redemption from all
 the miseries that oppress mankind. Razumov listened without hearing,
 gnawed by the newborn desire of safety with its independence from that
 degrading method of direct lying which at times he found it almost
 impossible to practice.
 
 No. The point he wanted to hear about could never come into this
 conversation. There was no way of bringing it forward. He regretted
 not having composed a perfect story for use abroad, in which his fatal
 connexion with the house might have been owned up to. But when he left
 Russia he did not know that Ziemianitch had hanged himself. And, anyway,
 who could have foreseen this woman's "informant" stumbling upon that
 particular slum, of all the slums awaiting destruction in the purifying
 flame of social revolution? Who could have foreseen? Nobody! "It's a
 perfect, diabolic surprise," thought Razumov, calm-faced in his attitude
 of inscrutable superiority, nodding assent to Sophia Antonovna's remarks
 upon the psychology of "the people," "Oh yes--certainly," rather
 coldly, but with a nervous longing in his fingers to tear some sort of
 confession out of her throat.
 
 Then, at the very last, on the point of separating, the feeling of
 relaxed tension already upon him, he heard Sophia Antonovna allude to
 the subject of his uneasiness. How it came about he could only guess,
--**--**--
 tacked along a wall of bricks. The living had belonged to the family for
 generations; but Jim was one of five sons, and when after a course of
 light holiday literature his vocation for the sea had declared itself,
 he was sent at once to a 'training-ship for officers of the mercantile
 marine.'
 
 He learned there a little trigonometry and how to cross top-gallant
 yards. He was generally liked. He had the third place in navigation
 and pulled stroke in the first cutter. Having a steady head with an
 excellent physique, he was very smart aloft. His station was in the
 fore-top, and often from there he looked down, with the contempt of a
 man destined to shine in the midst of dangers, at the peaceful multitude
 of roofs cut in two by the brown tide of the stream, while scattered
 on the outskirts of the surrounding plain the factory chimneys rose
 perpendicular against a grimy sky, each slender like a pencil, and
 belching out smoke like a volcano. He could see the big ships departing,
 the broad-beamed ferries constantly on the move, the little boats
 floating far below his feet, with the hazy splendour of the sea in the
 distance, and the hope of a stirring life in the world of adventure.
 
 On the lower deck in the babel of two hundred voices he would forget
 himself, and beforehand live in his mind the sea-life of light
 literature. He saw himself saving people from sinking ships, cutting
 away masts in a hurricane, swimming through a surf with a line; or as a
 lonely castaway, barefooted and half naked, walking on uncovered reefs
 in search of shellfish to stave off starvation. He confronted savages on
 tropical shores, quelled mutinies on the high seas, and in a small boat
 upon the ocean kept up the hearts of despairing men--always an example
--**--**--
 only event of their fantastic existence that seemed to have a reasonable
 certitude of achievement. The majority were men who, like himself,
 thrown there by some accident, had remained as officers of country
 ships. They had now a horror of the home service, with its harder
 conditions, severer view of duty, and the hazard of stormy oceans. They
 were attuned to the eternal peace of Eastern sky and sea. They
 loved short passages, good deck-chairs, large native crews, and the
 distinction of being white. They shuddered at the thought of hard work,
 and led precariously easy lives, always on the verge of dismissal,
 always on the verge of engagement, serving Chinamen, Arabs,
 half-castes--would have served the devil himself had he made it easy
 enough. They talked everlastingly of turns of luck: how So-and-so got
 charge of a boat on the coast of China--a soft thing; how this one had
 an easy billet in Japan somewhere, and that one was doing well in the
 Siamese navy; and in all they said--in their actions, in their looks, in
 their persons--could be detected the soft spot, the place of decay, the
 determination to lounge safely through existence.
 
 To Jim that gossiping crowd, viewed as seamen, seemed at first more
 unsubstantial than so many shadows. But at length he found a fascination
 in the sight of those men, in their appearance of doing so well on
 such a small allowance of danger and toil. In time, beside the original
 disdain there grew up slowly another sentiment; and suddenly, giving up
 the idea of going home, he took a berth as chief mate of the Patna.
 
 The Patna was a local steamer as old as the hills, lean like a
 greyhound, and eaten up with rust worse than a condemned water-tank. She
 was owned by a Chinaman, chartered by an Arab, and commanded by a sort
--**--**--
 of light thrown out by the binnacle. Now and then a hand, with black
 fingers alternately letting go and catching hold of revolving spokes,
 appeared in the illumined part; the links of wheel-chains ground heavily
 in the grooves of the barrel. Jim would glance at the compass, would
 glance around the unattainable horizon, would stretch himself till his
 joints cracked, with a leisurely twist of the body, in the very excess
 of well-being; and, as if made audacious by the invincible aspect of the
 peace, he felt he cared for nothing that could happen to him to the end
 of his days. From time to time he glanced idly at a chart pegged
 out with four drawing-pins on a low three-legged table abaft the
 steering-gear case. The sheet of paper portraying the depths of the sea
 presented a shiny surface under the light of a bull's-eye lamp lashed to
 a stanchion, a surface as level and smooth as the glimmering surface of
 the waters. Parallel rulers with a pair of dividers reposed on it; the
 ship's position at last noon was marked with a small black cross, and
 the straight pencil-line drawn firmly as far as Perim figured the course
 of the ship--the path of souls towards the holy place, the promise of
 salvation, the reward of eternal life--while the pencil with its sharp
 end touching the Somali coast lay round and still like a naked ship's
 spar floating in the pool of a sheltered dock. 'How steady she goes,'
 thought Jim with wonder, with something like gratitude for this high
 peace of sea and sky. At such times his thoughts would be full of
 valorous deeds: he loved these dreams and the success of his imaginary
 achievements. They were the best parts of life, its secret truth, its
--**--**--
 cronies for a good few years--serving the same jovial, crafty, old
 Chinaman, with horn-rimmed goggles and strings of red silk plaited into
 the venerable grey hairs of his pigtail. The quay-side opinion in the
 Patna's home-port was that these two in the way of brazen peculation
 'had done together pretty well everything you can think of.' Outwardly
 they were badly matched: one dull-eyed, malevolent, and of soft fleshy
 curves; the other lean, all hollows, with a head long and bony like the
 head of an old horse, with sunken cheeks, with sunken temples, with an
 indifferent glazed glance of sunken eyes. He had been stranded out East
 somewhere--in Canton, in Shanghai, or perhaps in Yokohama; he probably
 did not care to remember himself the exact locality, nor yet the cause
 of his shipwreck. He had been, in mercy to his youth, kicked quietly
 out of his ship twenty years ago or more, and it might have been so much
 worse for him that the memory of the episode had in it hardly a trace
 of misfortune. Then, steam navigation expanding in these seas and men
 of his craft being scarce at first, he had 'got on' after a sort. He
 was eager to let strangers know in a dismal mumble that he was 'an old
 stager out here.' When he moved, a skeleton seemed to sway loose in his
 clothes; his walk was mere wandering, and he was given to wander thus
 around the engine-room skylight, smoking, without relish, doctored
 tobacco in a brass bowl at the end of a cherrywood stem four feet long,
 with the imbecile gravity of a thinker evolving a system of philosophy
 from the hazy glimpse of a truth. He was usually anything but free with
 his private store of liquor; but on that night he had departed from his
--**--**--
 minute, and the damned thing will go down under us like a lump of lead."
 He pushed me away with his right arm and ran before me up the ladder,
 shouting as he climbed. His left arm hung by his side. I followed up in
 time to see the captain rush at him and knock him down flat on his back.
 He did not strike him again: he stood bending over him and speaking
 angrily but quite low. I fancy he was asking him why the devil he didn't
 go and stop the engines, instead of making a row about it on deck. I
 heard him say, "Get up! Run! fly!" He swore also. The engineer slid down
 the starboard ladder and bolted round the skylight to the engine-room
 companion which was on the port side. He moaned as he ran. . . .'
 
 He spoke slowly; he remembered swiftly and with extreme vividness; he
 could have reproduced like an echo the moaning of the engineer for
 the better information of these men who wanted facts. After his first
 feeling of revolt he had come round to the view that only a meticulous
 precision of statement would bring out the true horror behind the
 appalling face of things. The facts those men were so eager to know had
 been visible, tangible, open to the senses, occupying their place in
 space and time, requiring for their existence a fourteen-hundred-ton
 steamer and twenty-seven minutes by the watch; they made a whole that
 had features, shades of expression, a complicated aspect that could be
 remembered by the eye, and something else besides, something invisible,
 a directing spirit of perdition that dwelt within, like a malevolent
 soul in a detestable body. He was anxious to make this clear. This
 had not been a common affair, everything in it had been of the utmost
--**--**--
 abusing the tyrannical institutions of the German empire, and soaking
 himself in beer all day long and day after day in De Jongh's back-shop,
 till De Jongh, who charged a guilder for every bottle without as much
 as the quiver of an eyelid, would beckon me aside, and, with his little
 leathery face all puckered up, declare confidentially, "Business is
 business, but this man, captain, he make me very sick. Tfui!"
 
 'I was looking at him from the shade. He was hurrying on a little in
 advance, and the sunlight beating on him brought out his bulk in a
 startling way. He made me think of a trained baby elephant walking
 on hind-legs. He was extravagantly gorgeous too--got up in a soiled
 sleeping-suit, bright green and deep orange vertical stripes, with a
 pair of ragged straw slippers on his bare feet, and somebody's cast-off
 pith hat, very dirty and two sizes too small for him, tied up with a
 manilla rope-yarn on the top of his big head. You understand a man like
 that hasn't the ghost of a chance when it comes to borrowing clothes.
 Very well. On he came in hot haste, without a look right or left, passed
 within three feet of me, and in the innocence of his heart went on
 pelting upstairs into the harbour office to make his deposition, or
 report, or whatever you like to call it.
 
 'It appears he addressed himself in the first instance to the principal
 shipping-master. Archie Ruthvel had just come in, and, as his story
 goes, was about to begin his arduous day by giving a dressing-down to
 his chief clerk. Some of you might have known him--an obliging little
 Portuguese half-caste with a miserably skinny neck, and always on the
 hop to get something from the shipmasters in the way of eatables--a
--**--**--
 "aguaindt" with not a few of that sort myself. There are times when
 a man must act as though life were equally sweet in any company. I've
 known such a time, and, what's more, I shan't now pretend to pull a long
 face over my necessity, because a good many of that bad company from
 want of moral--moral--what shall I say?--posture, or from some other
 equally profound cause, were twice as instructive and twenty times more
 amusing than the usual respectable thief of commerce you fellows ask
 to sit at your table without any real necessity--from habit, from
 cowardice, from good-nature, from a hundred sneaking and inadequate
 reasons.
 
 '"You Englishmen are all rogues," went on my patriotic Flensborg or
 Stettin Australian. I really don't recollect now what decent little
 port on the shores of the Baltic was defiled by being the nest of that
 precious bird. "What are you to shout? Eh? You tell me? You no better
 than other people, and that old rogue he make Gottam fuss with me." His
 thick carcass trembled on its legs that were like a pair of pillars; it
 trembled from head to foot. "That's what you English always make--make
 a tam' fuss--for any little thing, because I was not born in your
 tam' country. Take away my certificate. Take it. I don't want the
 certificate. A man like me don't want your verfluchte certificate. I
 shpit on it." He spat. "I vill an Amerigan citizen begome," he cried,
 fretting and fuming and shuffling his feet as if to free his ankles from
 some invisible and mysterious grasp that would not let him get away
 from that spot. He made himself so warm that the top of his bullet head
 positively smoked. Nothing mysterious prevented me from going away:
 curiosity is the most obvious of sentiments, and it held me there to see
--**--**--
 strike him. His thick, purplish lips came together without a sound, he
 went off in a resolute waddle to the gharry and began to jerk at the
 door-handle with such a blind brutality of impatience that I expected to
 see the whole concern overturned on its side, pony and all. The driver,
 shaken out of his meditation over the sole of his foot, displayed at
 once all the signs of intense terror, and held with both hands, looking
 round from his box at this vast carcass forcing its way into his
 conveyance. The little machine shook and rocked tumultuously, and the
 crimson nape of that lowered neck, the size of those straining thighs,
 the immense heaving of that dingy, striped green-and-orange back, the
 whole burrowing effort of that gaudy and sordid mass, troubled one's
 sense of probability with a droll and fearsome effect, like one of those
 grotesque and distinct visions that scare and fascinate one in a fever.
 He disappeared. I half expected the roof to split in two, the little box
 on wheels to burst open in the manner of a ripe cotton-pod--but it only
 sank with a click of flattened springs, and suddenly one venetian blind
 rattled down. His shoulders reappeared, jammed in the small opening; his
 head hung out, distended and tossing like a captive balloon, perspiring,
 furious, spluttering. He reached for the gharry-wallah with vicious
 flourishes of a fist as dumpy and red as a lump of raw meat. He roared
 at him to be off, to go on. Where? Into the Pacific, perhaps. The driver
 lashed; the pony snorted, reared once, and darted off at a gallop.
 Where? To Apia? To Honolulu? He had 6000 miles of tropical belt to
 disport himself in, and I did not hear the precise address. A snorting
--**--**--
 any decent sick man would do, I produced the word Patna wrapped up in a
 delicate question as in a wisp of floss silk. I was delicate selfishly;
 I did not want to startle him; I had no solicitude for him; I was not
 furious with him and sorry for him: his experience was of no importance,
 his redemption would have had no point for me. He had grown old in minor
 iniquities, and could no longer inspire aversion or pity. He repeated
 Patna? interrogatively, seemed to make a short effort of memory, and
 said: "Quite right. I am an old stager out here. I saw her go down." I
 made ready to vent my indignation at such a stupid lie, when he added
 smoothly, "She was full of reptiles."
 
 'This made me pause. What did he mean? The unsteady phantom of terror
 behind his glassy eyes seemed to stand still and look into mine
 wistfully. "They turned me out of my bunk in the middle watch to look
 at her sinking," he pursued in a reflective tone. His voice sounded
 alarmingly strong all at once. I was sorry for my folly. There was
 no snowy-winged coif of a nursing sister to be seen flitting in the
 perspective of the ward; but away in the middle of a long row of empty
 iron bedsteads an accident case from some ship in the Roads sat up brown
 and gaunt with a white bandage set rakishly on the forehead. Suddenly my
 interesting invalid shot out an arm thin like a tentacle and clawed
 my shoulder. "Only my eyes were good enough to see. I am famous for my
 eyesight. That's why they called me, I expect. None of them was quick
 enough to see her go, but they saw that she was gone right enough, and
--**--**--
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 6
 
 
 'The authorities were evidently of the same opinion. The inquiry was not
 adjourned. It was held on the appointed day to satisfy the law, and it
 was well attended because of its human interest, no doubt. There was no
 incertitude as to facts--as to the one material fact, I mean. How the
 Patna came by her hurt it was impossible to find out; the court did not
 expect to find out; and in the whole audience there was not a man who
 cared. Yet, as I've told you, all the sailors in the port attended, and
 the waterside business was fully represented. Whether they knew it or
 not, the interest that drew them here was purely psychological--the
 expectation of some essential disclosure as to the strength, the power,
 the horror, of human emotions. Naturally nothing of the kind could be
 disclosed. The examination of the only man able and willing to face
 it was beating futilely round the well-known fact, and the play of
 questions upon it was as instructive as the tapping with a hammer on
 an iron box, were the object to find out what's inside. However, an
 official inquiry could not be any other thing. Its object was not the
 fundamental why, but the superficial how, of this affair.
 
 'The young chap could have told them, and, though that very thing
 was the thing that interested the audience, the questions put to him
 necessarily led him away from what to me, for instance, would have
 been the only truth worth knowing. You can't expect the constituted
 authorities to inquire into the state of a man's soul--or is it only of
 his liver? Their business was to come down upon the consequences, and
 frankly, a casual police magistrate and two nautical assessors are not
 much good for anything else. I don't mean to imply these fellows were
--**--**--
 you mind old Jones, sir; dam' his soul, he's used to it.' I could see
 directly I had shocked his delicate ear, and while we sat at our first
 tiffin together he began to find fault in a nasty manner with this and
 that in the ship. I never heard such a voice out of a Punch and Judy
 show. I set my teeth hard, and glued my eyes to my plate, and held my
 peace as long as I could; but at last I had to say something. Up
 he jumps tiptoeing, ruffling all his pretty plumes, like a little
 fighting-cock. 'You'll find you have a different person to deal with
 than the late Captain Brierly.' 'I've found it,' says I, very glum, but
 pretending to be mighty busy with my steak. 'You are an old ruffian,
 Mister--aw--Jones; and what's more, you are known for an old ruffian
 in the employ,' he squeaks at me. The damned bottle-washers stood about
 listening with their mouths stretched from ear to ear. 'I may be a hard
 case,' answers I, 'but I ain't so far gone as to put up with the sight
 of you sitting in Captain Brierly's chair.' With that I lay down my
 knife and fork. 'You would like to sit in it yourself--that's where the
 shoe pinches,' he sneers. I left the saloon, got my rags together, and
 was on the quay with all my dunnage about my feet before the
 stevedores had turned to again. Yes. Adrift--on shore--after ten years'
 service--and with a poor woman and four children six thousand miles
 off depending on my half-pay for every mouthful they ate. Yes, sir!
 I chucked it rather than hear Captain Brierly abused. He left me his
 night-glasses--here they are; and he wished me to take care of the
--**--**--
 reason, I became positive in my mind that the inquiry was a severe
 punishment to that Jim, and that his facing it--practically of his own
 free will--was a redeeming feature in his abominable case. I hadn't been
 so sure of it before. Brierly went off in a huff. At the time his state
 of mind was more of a mystery to me than it is now.
 
 'Next day, coming into court late, I sat by myself. Of course I could
 not forget the conversation I had with Brierly, and now I had them both
 under my eyes. The demeanour of one suggested gloomy impudence and of
 the other a contemptuous boredom; yet one attitude might not have been
 truer than the other, and I was aware that one was not true. Brierly was
 not bored--he was exasperated; and if so, then Jim might not have been
 impudent. According to my theory he was not. I imagined he was hopeless.
 Then it was that our glances met. They met, and the look he gave me was
 discouraging of any intention I might have had to speak to him. Upon
 either hypothesis--insolence or despair--I felt I could be of no use to
 him. This was the second day of the proceedings. Very soon after that
 exchange of glances the inquiry was adjourned again to the next day. The
 white men began to troop out at once. Jim had been told to stand down
 some time before, and was able to leave amongst the first. I saw his
 broad shoulders and his head outlined in the light of the door, and
 while I made my way slowly out talking with some one--some stranger who
 had addressed me casually--I could see him from within the court-room
 resting both elbows on the balustrade of the verandah and turning his
--**--**--
 exceptionally big, he looked generally fit to demolish a wall. The
 most reassuring symptom I noticed was a kind of slow and ponderous
 hesitation, which I took as a tribute to the evident sincerity of my
 manner and of my tone. We faced each other. In the court the assault
 case was proceeding. I caught the words: "Well--buffalo--stick--in the
 greatness of my fear. . . ."
 
 '"What did you mean by staring at me all the morning?" said Jim at last.
 He looked up and looked down again. "Did you expect us all to sit with
 downcast eyes out of regard for your susceptibilities?" I retorted
 sharply. I was not going to submit meekly to any of his nonsense. He
 raised his eyes again, and this time continued to look me straight
 in the face. "No. That's all right," he pronounced with an air of
 deliberating with himself upon the truth of this statement--"that's all
 right. I am going through with that. Only"--and there he spoke a little
 faster--"I won't let any man call me names outside this court. There was
 a fellow with you. You spoke to him--oh yes--I know; 'tis all very fine.
 You spoke to him, but you meant me to hear. . . ."
 
 'I assured him he was under some extraordinary delusion. I had no
 conception how it came about. "You thought I would be afraid to resent
 this," he said, with just a faint tinge of bitterness. I was interested
 enough to discern the slightest shades of expression, but I was not in
 the least enlightened; yet I don't know what in these words, or perhaps
 just the intonation of that phrase, induced me suddenly to make all
 possible allowances for him. I ceased to be annoyed at my unexpected
 predicament. It was some mistake on his part; he was blundering, and I
--**--**--
 callousness, of a colossal unconsciousness, of a gigantic deception. Who
 can tell! From our tone we might have been discussing a third person,
 a football match, last year's weather. My mind floated in a sea of
 conjectures till the turn of the conversation enabled me, without being
 offensive, to remark that, upon the whole, this inquiry must have been
 pretty trying to him. He darted his arm across the tablecloth, and
 clutching my hand by the side of my plate, glared fixedly. I was
 startled. "It must be awfully hard," I stammered, confused by this
 display of speechless feeling. "It is--hell," he burst out in a muffled
 voice.
 
 'This movement and these words caused two well-groomed male
 globe-trotters at a neighbouring table to look up in alarm from their
 iced pudding. I rose, and we passed into the front gallery for coffee
 and cigars.
 
 'On little octagon tables candles burned in glass globes; clumps of
 stiff-leaved plants separated sets of cosy wicker chairs; and between
 the pairs of columns, whose reddish shafts caught in a long row the
 sheen from the tall windows, the night, glittering and sombre, seemed
 to hang like a splendid drapery. The riding lights of ships winked afar
 like setting stars, and the hills across the roadstead resembled rounded
 black masses of arrested thunder-clouds.
 
 '"I couldn't clear out," Jim began. "The skipper did--that's all very
 well for him. I couldn't, and I wouldn't. They all got out of it in one
 way or another, but it wouldn't do for me."
 
 'I listened with concentrated attention, not daring to stir in my chair;
 I wanted to know--and to this day I don't know, I can only guess. He
 would be confident and depressed all in the same breath, as if some
 conviction of innate blamelessness had checked the truth writhing within
--**--**--
 yourself a--a--cur?"
 
 'And with this--upon my honour!--he looked up at me inquisitively. It
 was a question it appears--a bona fide question! However, he didn't wait
 for an answer. Before I could recover he went on, with his eyes straight
 before him, as if reading off something written on the body of the
 night. "It is all in being ready. I wasn't; not--not then. I don't want
 to excuse myself; but I would like to explain--I would like somebody to
 understand--somebody--one person at least! You! Why not you?"
 
 'It was solemn, and a little ridiculous too, as they always are, those
 struggles of an individual trying to save from the fire his idea of what
 his moral identity should be, this precious notion of a convention, only
 one of the rules of the game, nothing more, but all the same so terribly
 effective by its assumption of unlimited power over natural instincts,
 by the awful penalties of its failure. He began his story quietly
 enough. On board that Dale Line steamer that had picked up these four
 floating in a boat upon the discreet sunset glow of the sea, they had
 been after the first day looked askance upon. The fat skipper told some
 story, the others had been silent, and at first it had been accepted.
 You don't cross-examine poor castaways you had the good luck to save,
 if not from cruel death, then at least from cruel suffering. Afterwards,
 with time to think it over, it might have struck the officers of the
 Avondale that there was "something fishy" in the affair; but of course
 they would keep their doubts to themselves. They had picked up the
 captain, the mate, and two engineers of the steamer Patna sunk at sea,
 and that, very properly, was enough for them. I did not ask Jim about
--**--**--
 jumped off like something alive while I was looking at it." "That made
 you feel pretty bad," I observed casually. "Do you suppose," he said,
 "that I was thinking of myself, with a hundred and sixty people at my
 back, all fast asleep in that fore-'tween-deck alone--and more of them
 aft; more on the deck--sleeping--knowing nothing about it--three times
 as many as there were boats for, even if there had been time? I expected
 to see the iron open out as I stood there and the rush of water going
 over them as they lay. . . . What could I do--what?"
 
 'I can easily picture him to myself in the peopled gloom of the
 cavernous place, with the light of the globe-lamp falling on a small
 portion of the bulkhead that had the weight of the ocean on the other
 side, and the breathing of unconscious sleepers in his ears. I can see
 him glaring at the iron, startled by the falling rust, overburdened by
 the knowledge of an imminent death. This, I gathered, was the second
 time he had been sent forward by that skipper of his, who, I rather
 think, wanted to keep him away from the bridge. He told me that his
 first impulse was to shout and straightway make all those people
 leap out of sleep into terror; but such an overwhelming sense of his
 helplessness came over him that he was not able to produce a sound. This
 is, I suppose, what people mean by the tongue cleaving to the roof of
 the mouth. "Too dry," was the concise expression he used in reference to
 this state. Without a sound, then, he scrambled out on deck through
 the number one hatch. A windsail rigged down there swung against him
 accidentally, and he remembered that the light touch of the canvas on
--**--**--
 
 CHAPTER 8
 
 
 'How long he stood stock-still by the hatch expecting every moment to
 feel the ship dip under his feet and the rush of water take him at the
 back and toss him like a chip, I cannot say. Not very long--two minutes
 perhaps. A couple of men he could not make out began to converse
 drowsily, and also, he could not tell where, he detected a curious
 noise of shuffling feet. Above these faint sounds there was that awful
 stillness preceding a catastrophe, that trying silence of the moment
 before the crash; then it came into his head that perhaps he would have
 time to rush along and cut all the lanyards of the gripes, so that the
 boats would float as the ship went down.
 
 'The Patna had a long bridge, and all the boats were up there, four on
 one side and three on the other--the smallest of them on the port-side
 and nearly abreast of the steering gear. He assured me, with evident
 anxiety to be believed, that he had been most careful to keep them ready
 for instant service. He knew his duty. I dare say he was a good enough
 mate as far as that went. "I always believed in being prepared for the
 worst," he commented, staring anxiously in my face. I nodded my approval
 of the sound principle, averting my eyes before the subtle unsoundness
 of the man.
 
 'He started unsteadily to run. He had to step over legs, avoid stumbling
 against the heads. Suddenly some one caught hold of his coat from below,
 and a distressed voice spoke under his elbow. The light of the lamp he
 carried in his right hand fell upon an upturned dark face whose eyes
 entreated him together with the voice. He had picked up enough of the
--**--**--
 every word my heart, searched by the light of his absurdity, was growing
 heavier in my breast. I had no mind to laugh, and lest I should smile I
 made for myself a stolid face. He gave signs of irritation.
 
 '"It is always the unexpected that happens," I said in a propitiatory
 tone. My obtuseness provoked him into a contemptuous "Pshaw!" I suppose
 he meant that the unexpected couldn't touch him; nothing less than the
 unconceivable itself could get over his perfect state of preparation. He
 had been taken unawares--and he whispered to himself a malediction upon
 the waters and the firmament, upon the ship, upon the men. Everything
 had betrayed him! He had been tricked into that sort of high-minded
 resignation which prevented him lifting as much as his little finger,
 while these others who had a very clear perception of the actual
 necessity were tumbling against each other and sweating desperately over
 that boat business. Something had gone wrong there at the last moment.
 It appears that in their flurry they had contrived in some mysterious
 way to get the sliding bolt of the foremost boat-chock jammed tight, and
 forthwith had gone out of the remnants of their minds over the deadly
 nature of that accident. It must have been a pretty sight, the fierce
 industry of these beggars toiling on a motionless ship that floated
 quietly in the silence of a world asleep, fighting against time for the
 freeing of that boat, grovelling on all-fours, standing up in despair,
 tugging, pushing, snarling at each other venomously, ready to kill,
 ready to weep, and only kept from flying at each other's throats by
 the fear of death that stood silent behind them like an inflexible and
 cold-eyed taskmaster. Oh yes! It must have been a pretty sight. He
--**--**--
 bench, and never looked up at this extraordinary and damning witness
 that seemed possessed of some mysterious theory of defence.
 
 'So these two lascars stuck to the helm of that ship without
 steerage-way, where death would have found them if such had been their
 destiny. The whites did not give them half a glance, had probably
 forgotten their existence. Assuredly Jim did not remember it. He
 remembered he could do nothing; he could do nothing, now he was alone.
 There was nothing to do but to sink with the ship. No use making a
 disturbance about it. Was there? He waited upstanding, without a sound,
 stiffened in the idea of some sort of heroic discretion. The first
 engineer ran cautiously across the bridge to tug at his sleeve.
 
 '"Come and help! For God's sake, come and help!"
 
 'He ran back to the boat on the points of his toes, and returned
 directly to worry at his sleeve, begging and cursing at the same time.
 
 '"I believe he would have kissed my hands," said Jim savagely, "and,
 next moment, he starts foaming and whispering in my face, 'If I had
 the time I would like to crack your skull for you.' I pushed him away.
 Suddenly he caught hold of me round the neck. Damn him! I hit him. I
 hit out without looking. 'Won't you save your own life--you infernal
 coward?' he sobs. Coward! He called me an infernal coward! Ha! ha! ha!
 ha! He called me--ha! ha! ha! . . ."
 
 'He had thrown himself back and was shaking with laughter. I had never
 in my life heard anything so bitter as that noise. It fell like a blight
 on all the merriment about donkeys, pyramids, bazaars, or what not.
 Along the whole dim length of the gallery the voices dropped, the pale
--**--**--
 upon a sea of lead. There was no life in that stir. It managed, though,
 to knock over something in my head. What would you have done? You are
 sure of yourself--aren't you? What would you do if you felt now--this
 minute--the house here move, just move a little under your chair. Leap!
 By heavens! you would take one spring from where you sit and land in
 that clump of bushes yonder."
 
 'He flung his arm out at the night beyond the stone balustrade. I held
 my peace. He looked at me very steadily, very severe. There could be no
 mistake: I was being bullied now, and it behoved me to make no sign lest
 by a gesture or a word I should be drawn into a fatal admission about
 myself which would have had some bearing on the case. I was not disposed
 to take any risk of that sort. Don't forget I had him before me, and
 really he was too much like one of us not to be dangerous. But if you
 want to know I don't mind telling you that I did, with a rapid glance,
 estimate the distance to the mass of denser blackness in the middle of
 the grass-plot before the verandah. He exaggerated. I would have landed
 short by several feet--and that's the only thing of which I am fairly
 certain.
 
 'The last moment had come, as he thought, and he did not move. His feet
 remained glued to the planks if his thoughts were knocking about loose
 in his head. It was at this moment too that he saw one of the men around
 the boat step backwards suddenly, clutch at the air with raised arms,
 totter and collapse. He didn't exactly fall, he only slid gently into a
 sitting posture, all hunched up, and with his shoulders propped against
--**--**--
 to see it still there," he said. That's what he said. What terrified him
 was the thought that the drowning was not over yet. No doubt he wanted
 to be done with that abomination as quickly as possible. Nobody in the
 boat made a sound. In the dark she seemed to fly, but of course she
 could not have had much way. Then the shower swept ahead, and the great,
 distracting, hissing noise followed the rain into distance and died out.
 There was nothing to be heard then but the slight wash about the boat's
 sides. Somebody's teeth were chattering violently. A hand touched his
 back. A faint voice said, "You there?" Another cried out shakily,
 "She's gone!" and they all stood up together to look astern. They saw no
 lights. All was black. A thin cold drizzle was driving into their faces.
 The boat lurched slightly. The teeth chattered faster, stopped, and
 began again twice before the man could master his shiver sufficiently to
 say, "Ju-ju-st in ti-ti-me. . . . Brrrr." He recognised the voice of the
 chief engineer saying surlily, "I saw her go down. I happened to turn my
 head." The wind had dropped almost completely.
 
 'They watched in the dark with their heads half turned to windward as if
 expecting to hear cries. At first he was thankful the night had covered
 up the scene before his eyes, and then to know of it and yet to have
 seen and heard nothing appeared somehow the culminating point of an
 awful misfortune. "Strange, isn't it?" he murmured, interrupting himself
 in his disjointed narrative.
 
 'It did not seem so strange to me. He must have had an unconscious
 conviction that the reality could not be half as bad, not half as
 anguishing, appalling, and vengeful as the created terror of his
--**--**--
 cold too. And I could do nothing. I thought that if I moved I would have
 to go over the side and . . ."
 
 'His hand groped stealthily, came in contact with a liqueur-glass, and
 was withdrawn suddenly as if it had touched a red-hot coal. I pushed the
 bottle slightly. "Won't you have some more?" I asked. He looked at me
 angrily. "Don't you think I can tell you what there is to tell without
 screwing myself up?" he asked. The squad of globe-trotters had gone to
 bed. We were alone but for a vague white form erect in the shadow, that,
 being looked at, cringed forward, hesitated, backed away silently. It
 was getting late, but I did not hurry my guest.
 
 'In the midst of his forlorn state he heard his companions begin to
 abuse some one. "What kept you from jumping, you lunatic?" said a
 scolding voice. The chief engineer left the stern-sheets, and could
 be heard clambering forward as if with hostile intentions against "the
 greatest idiot that ever was." The skipper shouted with rasping effort
 offensive epithets from where he sat at the oar. He lifted his head
 at that uproar, and heard the name "George," while a hand in the dark
 struck him on the breast. "What have you got to say for yourself, you
 fool?" queried somebody, with a sort of virtuous fury. "They were after
 me," he said. "They were abusing me--abusing me . . . by the name of
 George."
 
 'He paused to stare, tried to smile, turned his eyes away and went on.
 "That little second puts his head right under my nose, 'Why, it's that
 blasted mate!' 'What!' howls the skipper from the other end of the boat.
 'No!' shrieks the chief. And he too stooped to look at my face."
--**--**--
 solitary in the long gallery, and the columns had turned black from
 pediment to capital. On the vivid stars the high corner of the Harbour
 Office stood out distinct across the Esplanade, as though the sombre
 pile had glided nearer to see and hear.
 
 'He assumed an air of indifference.
 
 '"I dare say I am less calm now than I was then. I was ready for
 anything. These were trifles. . . ."
 
 '"You had a lively time of it in that boat," I remarked
 
 '"I was ready," he repeated. "After the ship's lights had gone, anything
 might have happened in that boat--anything in the world--and the world
 no wiser. I felt this, and I was pleased. It was just dark enough too.
 We were like men walled up quick in a roomy grave. No concern with
 anything on earth. Nobody to pass an opinion. Nothing mattered." For the
 third time during this conversation he laughed harshly, but there was
 no one about to suspect him of being only drunk. "No fear, no law, no
 sounds, no eyes--not even our own, till--till sunrise at least."
 
 'I was struck by the suggestive truth of his words. There is something
 peculiar in a small boat upon the wide sea. Over the lives borne from
 under the shadow of death there seems to fall the shadow of madness.
 When your ship fails you, your whole world seems to fail you; the world
 that made you, restrained you, took care of you. It is as if the souls
 of men floating on an abyss and in touch with immensity had been set
 free for any excess of heroism, absurdity, or abomination. Of course, as
 with belief, thought, love, hate, conviction, or even the visual aspect
 of material things, there are as many shipwrecks as there are men, and
--**--**--
 Firmness of courage or effort of fear? What do you think? And the
 endurance is undeniable too. Six hours more or less on the defensive;
 six hours of alert immobility while the boat drove slowly or floated
 arrested, according to the caprice of the wind; while the sea, calmed,
 slept at last; while the clouds passed above his head; while the sky
 from an immensity lustreless and black, diminished to a sombre and
 lustrous vault, scintillated with a greater brilliance, faded to the
 east, paled at the zenith; while the dark shapes blotting the low
 stars astern got outlines, relief became shoulders, heads, faces,
 features,--confronted him with dreary stares, had dishevelled hair, torn
 clothes, blinked red eyelids at the white dawn. "They looked as though
 they had been knocking about drunk in gutters for a week," he described
 graphically; and then he muttered something about the sunrise being of a
 kind that foretells a calm day. You know that sailor habit of referring
 to the weather in every connection. And on my side his few mumbled words
 were enough to make me see the lower limb of the sun clearing the
 line of the horizon, the tremble of a vast ripple running over all the
 visible expanse of the sea, as if the waters had shuddered, giving birth
 to the globe of light, while the last puff of the breeze would stir the
 air in a sigh of relief.
 
 '"They sat in the stern shoulder to shoulder, with the skipper in the
 middle, like three dirty owls, and stared at me," I heard him say
 with an intention of hate that distilled a corrosive virtue into the
 commonplace words like a drop of powerful poison falling into a glass
 of water; but my thoughts dwelt upon that sunrise. I could imagine
--**--**--
 
 
 CHAPTER 11
 
 
 'He heard me out with his head on one side, and I had another glimpse
 through a rent in the mist in which he moved and had his being. The dim
 candle spluttered within the ball of glass, and that was all I had to
 see him by; at his back was the dark night with the clear stars, whose
 distant glitter disposed in retreating planes lured the eye into the
 depths of a greater darkness; and yet a mysterious light seemed to show
 me his boyish head, as if in that moment the youth within him had, for
 a moment, glowed and expired. "You are an awful good sort to listen like
 this," he said. "It does me good. You don't know what it is to me. You
 don't" . . . words seemed to fail him. It was a distinct glimpse. He was
 a youngster of the sort you like to see about you; of the sort you like
 to imagine yourself to have been; of the sort whose appearance claims
 the fellowship of these illusions you had thought gone out, extinct,
 cold, and which, as if rekindled at the approach of another flame, give
 a flutter deep, deep down somewhere, give a flutter of light . . . of
 heat! . . . Yes; I had a glimpse of him then . . . and it was not the
 last of that kind. . . . "You don't know what it is for a fellow in my
 position to be believed--make a clean breast of it to an elder man. It
 is so difficult--so awfully unfair--so hard to understand."
 
 'The mists were closing again. I don't know how old I appeared to
 him--and how much wise. Not half as old as I felt just then; not half
--**--**--
 asked, dismayed. "That's what I had to live down. The story didn't
 matter." . . . He clasped his hands for an instant, glanced right and
 left into the gloom: "It was like cheating the dead," he stammered.
 
 '"And there were no dead," I said.
 
 'He went away from me at this. That is the only way I can describe it.
 In a moment I saw his back close to the balustrade. He stood there for
 some time, as if admiring the purity and the peace of the night. Some
 flowering-shrub in the garden below spread its powerful scent through
 the damp air. He returned to me with hasty steps.
 
 '"And that did not matter," he said, as stubbornly as you please.
 
 '"Perhaps not," I admitted. I began to have a notion he was too much for
 me. After all, what did _I_ know?
 
 '"Dead or not dead, I could not get clear," he said. "I had to live;
 hadn't I?"
 
 '"Well, yes--if you take it in that way," I mumbled.
 
 '"I was glad, of course," he threw out carelessly, with his mind fixed
 on something else. "The exposure," he pronounced slowly, and lifted
 his head. "Do you know what was my first thought when I heard? I was
 relieved. I was relieved to learn that those shouts--did I tell you I
 had heard shouts? No? Well, I did. Shouts for help . . . blown along
 with the drizzle. Imagination, I suppose. And yet I can hardly . . . How
 stupid. . . . The others did not. I asked them afterwards. They all
 said No. No? And I was hearing them even then! I might have known--but
 I didn't think--I only listened. Very faint screams--day after day. Then
 that little half-caste chap here came up and spoke to me. 'The
--**--**--
 the most forsaken of human beings say? But she turned her back on them
 as if in disdain of their fate: she had swung round, burdened, to glare
 stubbornly at the new danger of the open sea which she so strangely
 survived to end her days in a breaking-up yard, as if it had been her
 recorded fate to die obscurely under the blows of many hammers. What
 were the various ends their destiny provided for the pilgrims I am
 unable to say; but the immediate future brought, at about nine o'clock
 next morning, a French gunboat homeward bound from Reunion. The report
 of her commander was public property. He had swept a little out of
 his course to ascertain what was the matter with that steamer floating
 dangerously by the head upon a still and hazy sea. There was an ensign,
 union down, flying at her main gaff (the serang had the sense to make a
 signal of distress at daylight); but the cooks were preparing the food
 in the cooking-boxes forward as usual. The decks were packed as close
 as a sheep-pen: there were people perched all along the rails, jammed on
 the bridge in a solid mass; hundreds of eyes stared, and not a sound was
 heard when the gunboat ranged abreast, as if all that multitude of lips
 had been sealed by a spell.
 
 'The Frenchman hailed, could get no intelligible reply, and after
 ascertaining through his binoculars that the crowd on deck did not look
 plague-stricken, decided to send a boat. Two officers came on board,
 listened to the serang, tried to talk with the Arab, couldn't make head
 or tail of it: but of course the nature of the emergency was obvious
 enough. They were also very much struck by discovering a white man, dead
--**--**--
 craft. He was very civil about it in his impassive way. I even fancy
 he went the length of tilting his head in compliment as he repeated,
 breathing visibly the while, "Ah, yes. A little craft painted
 black--very pretty--very pretty (tres coquet)." After a time he twisted
 his body slowly to face the glass door on our right. "A dull town
 (triste ville)," he observed, staring into the street. It was a
 brilliant day; a southerly buster was raging, and we could see the
 passers-by, men and women, buffeted by the wind on the sidewalks, the
 sunlit fronts of the houses across the road blurred by the tall whirls
 of dust. "I descended on shore," he said, "to stretch my legs a little,
 but . . ." He didn't finish, and sank into the depths of his repose.
 "Pray--tell me," he began, coming up ponderously, "what was there at the
 bottom of this affair--precisely (au juste)? It is curious. That dead
 man, for instance--and so on."
 
 '"There were living men too," I said; "much more curious."
 
 '"No doubt, no doubt," he agreed half audibly, then, as if after
 mature consideration, murmured, "Evidently." I made no difficulty in
 communicating to him what had interested me most in this affair. It
 seemed as though he had a right to know: hadn't he spent thirty hours
 on board the Patna--had he not taken the succession, so to speak, had
 he not done "his possible"? He listened to me, looking more priest-like
 than ever, and with what--probably on account of his downcast eyes--had
 the appearance of devout concentration. Once or twice he elevated
 his eyebrows (but without raising his eyelids), as one would say "The
 devil!" Once he calmly exclaimed, "Ah, bah!" under his breath, and when
 I had finished he pursed his lips in a deliberate way and emitted a sort
--**--**--
 
 '"I am glad to see you taking a lenient view," I said. "His own feeling
 in the matter was--ah!--hopeful, and . . ."
 
 'The shuffle of his feet under the table interrupted me. He drew up
 his heavy eyelids. Drew up, I say--no other expression can describe the
 steady deliberation of the act--and at last was disclosed completely to
 me. I was confronted by two narrow grey circlets, like two tiny steel
 rings around the profound blackness of the pupils. The sharp glance,
 coming from that massive body, gave a notion of extreme efficiency, like
 a razor-edge on a battle-axe. "Pardon," he said punctiliously. His right
 hand went up, and he swayed forward. "Allow me . . . I contended that
 one may get on knowing very well that one's courage does not come of
 itself (ne vient pas tout seul). There's nothing much in that to
 get upset about. One truth the more ought not to make life
 impossible. . . . But the honour--the honour, monsieur! . . . The honour
 . . . that is real--that is! And what life may be worth when" . . . he
 got on his feet with a ponderous impetuosity, as a startled ox might
 scramble up from the grass . . . "when the honour is gone--ah
 ca! par exemple--I can offer no opinion. I can offer no
 opinion--because--monsieur--I know nothing of it."
 
 'I had risen too, and, trying to throw infinite politeness into
 our attitudes, we faced each other mutely, like two china dogs on a
 mantelpiece. Hang the fellow! he had pricked the bubble. The blight
 of futility that lies in wait for men's speeches had fallen upon our
 conversation, and made it a thing of empty sounds. "Very well," I said,
 with a disconcerted smile; "but couldn't it reduce itself to not being
--**--**--
 a sort of notion by this time, then I must have been very obscure in
 my narrative, or you too sleepy to seize upon the sense of my words.
 I don't defend my morality. There was no morality in the impulse which
 induced me to lay before him Brierly's plan of evasion--I may call
 it--in all its primitive simplicity. There were the rupees--absolutely
 ready in my pocket and very much at his service. Oh! a loan; a loan of
 course--and if an introduction to a man (in Rangoon) who could put some
 work in his way . . . Why! with the greatest pleasure. I had pen, ink,
 and paper in my room on the first floor And even while I was speaking I
 was impatient to begin the letter--day, month, year, 2.30 A.M. . . . for
 the sake of our old friendship I ask you to put some work in the way of
 Mr. James So-and-so, in whom, &c., &c. . . . I was even ready to write
 in that strain about him. If he had not enlisted my sympathies he had
 done better for himself--he had gone to the very fount and origin of
 that sentiment he had reached the secret sensibility of my egoism. I
 am concealing nothing from you, because were I to do so my action would
 appear more unintelligible than any man's action has the right to be,
 and--in the second place--to-morrow you will forget my sincerity along
 with the other lessons of the past. In this transaction, to speak
 grossly and precisely, I was the irreproachable man; but the subtle
 intentions of my immorality were defeated by the moral simplicity of the
 criminal. No doubt he was selfish too, but his selfishness had a higher
 origin, a more lofty aim. I discovered that, say what I would, he was
--**--**--
 in a drab body with dark heads marching in dusty laced boots, a native
 policeman in a sombre uniform of scanty cut and belted in patent
 leather, who looked up at me with orientally pitiful eyes as though his
 migrating spirit were suffering exceedingly from that unforeseen--what
 d'ye call 'em?--avatar--incarnation. Under the shade of a lonely tree
 in the courtyard, the villagers connected with the assault case sat in a
 picturesque group, looking like a chromo-lithograph of a camp in a book
 of Eastern travel. One missed the obligatory thread of smoke in the
 foreground and the pack-animals grazing. A blank yellow wall rose behind
 overtopping the tree, reflecting the glare. The court-room was sombre,
 seemed more vast. High up in the dim space the punkahs were swaying
 short to and fro, to and fro. Here and there a draped figure, dwarfed
 by the bare walls, remained without stirring amongst the rows of empty
 benches, as if absorbed in pious meditation. The plaintiff, who had
 been beaten,--an obese chocolate-coloured man with shaved head, one
 fat breast bare and a bright yellow caste-mark above the bridge of his
 nose,--sat in pompous immobility: only his eyes glittered, rolling
 in the gloom, and the nostrils dilated and collapsed violently as he
 breathed. Brierly dropped into his seat looking done up, as though
 he had spent the night in sprinting on a cinder-track. The pious
 sailing-ship skipper appeared excited and made uneasy movements, as
 if restraining with difficulty an impulse to stand up and exhort
 us earnestly to prayer and repentance. The head of the magistrate,
 delicately pale under the neatly arranged hair, resembled the head of a
 hopeless invalid after he had been washed and brushed and propped up in
 bed. He moved aside the vase of flowers--a bunch of purple with a few
--**--**--
 "Cannibal?--well, they used to give him the name years and years ago.
 You remember the story? A shipwreck on the west side of Stewart Island;
 that's right; seven of them got ashore, and it seems they did not get
 on very well together. Some men are too cantankerous for anything--don't
 know how to make the best of a bad job--don't see things as they are--as
 they _are_, my boy! And then what's the consequence? Obvious! Trouble,
 trouble; as likely as not a knock on the head; and serve 'em right too.
 That sort is the most useful when it's dead. The story goes that a boat
 of Her Majesty's ship Wolverine found him kneeling on the kelp, naked as
 the day he was born, and chanting some psalm-tune or other; light snow
 was falling at the time. He waited till the boat was an oar's length
 from the shore, and then up and away. They chased him for an hour up and
 down the boulders, till a marihe flung a stone that took him behind
 the ear providentially and knocked him senseless. Alone? Of course. But
 that's like that tale of sealing-schooners; the Lord God knows the right
 and the wrong of that story. The cutter did not investigate much. They
 wrapped him in a boat-cloak and took him off as quick as they could,
 with a dark night coming on, the weather threatening, and the ship
 firing recall guns every five minutes. Three weeks afterwards he was as
 well as ever. He didn't allow any fuss that was made on shore to upset
 him; he just shut his lips tight, and let people screech. It was bad
 enough to have lost his ship, and all he was worth besides, without
 paying attention to the hard names they called him. That's the man for
--**--**--
 what it is you want?" "Buy twenty hotels like that," he growled to
 himself; "and every joker boarding in them too--twenty times over." He
 lifted his head smartly "I want that young chap." "I don't understand,"
 I said. "He's no good, is he?" said Chester crisply. "I know nothing
 about it," I protested. "Why, you told me yourself he was taking it to
 heart," argued Chester. "Well, in my opinion a chap who . . . Anyhow, he
 can't be much good; but then you see I am on the look-out for somebody,
 and I've just got a thing that will suit him. I'll give him a job on
 my island." He nodded significantly. "I'm going to dump forty coolies
 there--if I've to steal 'em. Somebody must work the stuff. Oh! I mean
 to act square: wooden shed, corrugated-iron roof--I know a man in Hobart
 who will take my bill at six months for the materials. I do. Honour
 bright. Then there's the water-supply. I'll have to fly round and get
 somebody to trust me for half-a-dozen second-hand iron tanks. Catch
 rain-water, hey? Let him take charge. Make him supreme boss over the
 coolies. Good idea, isn't it? What do you say?" "There are whole years
 when not a drop of rain falls on Walpole," I said, too amazed to laugh.
 He bit his lip and seemed bothered. "Oh, well, I will fix up something
 for them--or land a supply. Hang it all! That's not the question."
 
 'I said nothing. I had a rapid vision of Jim perched on a shadowless
 rock, up to his knees in guano, with the screams of sea-birds in his
 ears, the incandescent ball of the sun above his head; the empty sky and
 the empty ocean all a-quiver, simmering together in the heat as far as
--**--**--
 boatmen quarrelling over five annas were making an awful row at his
 elbow. He didn't hear me come up, but spun round as if the slight
 contact of my finger had released a catch. "I was looking," he
 stammered. I don't remember what I said, not much anyhow, but he made no
 difficulty in following me to the hotel.
 
 'He followed me as manageable as a little child, with an obedient air,
 with no sort of manifestation, rather as though he had been waiting
 for me there to come along and carry him off. I need not have been so
 surprised as I was at his tractability. On all the round earth, which to
 some seems so big and that others affect to consider as rather smaller
 than a mustard-seed, he had no place where he could--what shall I
 say?--where he could withdraw. That's it! Withdraw--be alone with his
 loneliness. He walked by my side very calm, glancing here and there, and
 once turned his head to look after a Sidiboy fireman in a cutaway coat
 and yellowish trousers, whose black face had silky gleams like a lump
 of anthracite coal. I doubt, however, whether he saw anything, or even
 remained all the time aware of my companionship, because if I had not
 edged him to the left here, or pulled him to the right there, I believe
 he would have gone straight before him in any direction till stopped by
 a wall or some other obstacle. I steered him into my bedroom, and sat
 down at once to write letters. This was the only place in the world
 (unless, perhaps, the Walpole Reef--but that was not so handy) where he
 could have it out with himself without being bothered by the rest of
 the universe. The damned thing--as he had expressed it--had not made
--**--**--
 remained invulnerably ignorant and completely uninteresting.
 
 'But he was too interesting or too unfortunate to be thrown to the dogs,
 or even to Chester. I felt this while I sat with my face over the paper
 and he fought and gasped, struggling for his breath in that terribly
 stealthy way, in my room; I felt it when he rushed out on the verandah
 as if to fling himself over--and didn't; I felt it more and more all the
 time he remained outside, faintly lighted on the background of night, as
 if standing on the shore of a sombre and hopeless sea.
 
 'An abrupt heavy rumble made me lift my head. The noise seemed to roll
 away, and suddenly a searching and violent glare fell on the blind face
 of the night. The sustained and dazzling flickers seemed to last for an
 unconscionable time. The growl of the thunder increased steadily while I
 looked at him, distinct and black, planted solidly upon the shores of a
 sea of light. At the moment of greatest brilliance the darkness leaped
 back with a culminating crash, and he vanished before my dazzled eyes as
 utterly as though he had been blown to atoms. A blustering sigh passed;
 furious hands seemed to tear at the shrubs, shake the tops of the
 trees below, slam doors, break window-panes, all along the front of
 the building. He stepped in, closing the door behind him, and found me
 bending over the table: my sudden anxiety as to what he would say was
 very great, and akin to a fright. "May I have a cigarette?" he asked. I
 gave a push to the box without raising my head. "I want--want--tobacco,"
 he muttered. I became extremely buoyant. "Just a moment." I grunted
 pleasantly. He took a few steps here and there. "That's over," I heard
--**--**--
 muttered through my teeth with unreasonable animosity. "Don't reckon too
 much on it."
 
 '"Jove! I feel as if nothing could ever touch me," he said in a tone
 of sombre conviction. "If this business couldn't knock me over, then
 there's no fear of there being not enough time to--climb out, and . . ."
 He looked upwards.
 
 'It struck me that it is from such as he that the great army of waifs
 and strays is recruited, the army that marches down, down into all the
 gutters of the earth. As soon as he left my room, that "bit of shelter,"
 he would take his place in the ranks, and begin the journey towards the
 bottomless pit. I at least had no illusions; but it was I, too, who a
 moment ago had been so sure of the power of words, and now was afraid to
 speak, in the same way one dares not move for fear of losing a slippery
 hold. It is when we try to grapple with another man's intimate need that
 we perceive how incomprehensible, wavering, and misty are the beings
 that share with us the sight of the stars and the warmth of the sun. It
 is as if loneliness were a hard and absolute condition of existence; the
 envelope of flesh and blood on which our eyes are fixed melts before the
 outstretched hand, and there remains only the capricious, unconsolable,
 and elusive spirit that no eye can follow, no hand can grasp. It was
 the fear of losing him that kept me silent, for it was borne upon me
 suddenly and with unaccountable force that should I let him slip away
 into the darkness I would never forgive myself.
 
 '"Well. Thanks--once more. You've been--er--uncommonly--really there's
 no word to . . . Uncommonly! I don't know why, I am sure. I am afraid
--**--**--
 accept my help; I argued reasonably: and every time I looked up at that
 absorbed smooth face, so grave and youthful, I had a disturbing sense of
 being no help but rather an obstacle to some mysterious, inexplicable,
 impalpable striving of his wounded spirit.
 
 '"I suppose you intend to eat and drink and to sleep under shelter in
 the usual way," I remember saying with irritation. "You say you won't
 touch the money that is due to you." . . . He came as near as his sort
 can to making a gesture of horror. (There were three weeks and five
 days' pay owing him as mate of the Patna.) "Well, that's too little to
 matter anyhow; but what will you do to-morrow? Where will you turn? You
 must live . . ." "That isn't the thing," was the comment that escaped
 him under his breath. I ignored it, and went on combating what I assumed
 to be the scruples of an exaggerated delicacy. "On every conceivable
 ground," I concluded, "you must let me help you." "You can't," he said
 very simply and gently, and holding fast to some deep idea which I
 could detect shimmering like a pool of water in the dark, but which
 I despaired of ever approaching near enough to fathom. I surveyed his
 well-proportioned bulk. "At any rate," I said, "I am able to help what
 I can see of you. I don't pretend to do more." He shook his head
 sceptically without looking at me. I got very warm. "But I can," I
 insisted. "I can do even more. I _am_ doing more. I am trusting
 you . . ." "The money . . ." he began. "Upon my word you deserve being
 told to go to the devil," I cried, forcing the note of indignation. He
--**--**--
 head to cross the room with no other purpose but to open a door for
 me; and I felt more in touch with mankind than I had been for years.
 Ridiculous, isn't it? Of course I guess there is something--some awful
 little scrape--which you know all about--but if I am sure that it is
 terribly heinous, I fancy one could manage to forgive it. For my part,
 I declare I am unable to imagine him guilty of anything much worse than
 robbing an orchard. Is it much worse? Perhaps you ought to have told me;
 but it is such a long time since we both turned saints that you may have
 forgotten we, too, had sinned in our time? It may be that some day I
 shall have to ask you, and then I shall expect to be told. I don't care
 to question him myself till I have some idea what it is. Moreover, it's
 too soon as yet. Let him open the door a few times more for me. . . ."
 Thus my friend. I was trebly pleased--at Jim's shaping so well, at the
 tone of the letter, at my own cleverness. Evidently I had known what
 I was doing. I had read characters aright, and so on. And what if
 something unexpected and wonderful were to come of it? That evening,
 reposing in a deck-chair under the shade of my own poop awning (it
 was in Hong-Kong harbour), I laid on Jim's behalf the first stone of a
 castle in Spain.
 
 'I made a trip to the northward, and when I returned I found another
 letter from my friend waiting for me. It was the first envelope I tore
 open. "There are no spoons missing, as far as I know," ran the first
 line; "I haven't been interested enough to inquire. He is gone, leaving
--**--**--
 a raw-boned, heavy Scandinavian, with a busy manner and immense blonde
 whiskers, went on directing his people, checking parcels, making out
 bills or writing letters at a stand-up desk in the shop, and comported
 himself in that clatter exactly as though he had been stone-deaf. Now
 and again he would emit a bothered perfunctory "Sssh," which neither
 produced nor was expected to produce the slightest effect. "They are
 very decent to me here," said Jim. "Blake's a little cad, but Egstrom's
 all right." He stood up quickly, and walking with measured steps to a
 tripod telescope standing in the window and pointed at the roadstead,
 he applied his eye to it. "There's that ship which has been becalmed
 outside all the morning has got a breeze now and is coming in," he
 remarked patiently; "I must go and board." We shook hands in silence,
 and he turned to go. "Jim!" I cried. He looked round with his hand on
 the lock. "You--you have thrown away something like a fortune." He came
 back to me all the way from the door. "Such a splendid old chap," he
 said. "How could I? How could I?" His lips twitched. "Here it does not
 matter." "Oh! you--you--" I began, and had to cast about for a suitable
 word, but before I became aware that there was no name that would just
 do, he was gone. I heard outside Egstrom's deep gentle voice saying
 cheerily, "That's the Sarah W. Granger, Jimmy. You must manage to be
 first aboard"; and directly Blake struck in, screaming after the manner
 of an outraged cockatoo, "Tell the captain we've got some of his mail
 here. That'll fetch him. D'ye hear, Mister What's-your-name?" And there
 was Jim answering Egstrom with something boyish in his tone. "All right.
 I'll make a race of it." He seemed to take refuge in the boat-sailing
--**--**--
 Patna; he had done some repairs for him once, and from that he went on
 to tell us what an old ruin she was, and the money that had been made
 out of her. He came to mention her last voyage, and then we all struck
 in. Some said one thing and some another--not much--what you or any
 other man might say; and there was some laughing. Captain O'Brien of the
 Sarah W. Granger, a large, noisy old man with a stick--he was sitting
 listening to us in this arm-chair here--he let drive suddenly with his
 stick at the floor, and roars out, 'Skunks!' . . . Made us all jump.
 Vanlo's manager winks at us and asks, 'What's the matter, Captain
 O'Brien?' 'Matter! matter!' the old man began to shout; 'what are you
 Injuns laughing at? It's no laughing matter. It's a disgrace to human
 natur'--that's what it is. I would despise being seen in the same room
 with one of those men. Yes, sir!' He seemed to catch my eye like, and
 I had to speak out of civility. 'Skunks!' says I, 'of course, Captain
 O'Brien, and I wouldn't care to have them here myself, so you're quite
 safe in this room, Captain O'Brien. Have a little something cool to
 drink.' 'Dam' your drink, Egstrom,' says he, with a twinkle in his eye;
 'when I want a drink I will shout for it. I am going to quit. It stinks
 here now.' At this all the others burst out laughing, and out they go
 after the old man. And then, sir, that blasted Jim he puts down the
 sandwich he had in his hand and walks round the table to me; there was
 his glass of beer poured out quite full. 'I am off,' he says--just like
--**--**--
 a face fit to scare little children."
 
 'Egstrom snorted bitterly, and combed one auburn whisker with knotty
 fingers. "Haven't been able to get a man that was any good since. It's
 nothing but worry, worry, worry in business. And where might you have
 come across him, captain, if it's fair to ask?"
 
 '"He was the mate of the Patna that voyage," I said, feeling that I
 owed some explanation. For a time Egstrom remained very still, with his
 fingers plunged in the hair at the side of his face, and then exploded.
 "And who the devil cares about that?" "I daresay no one," I began . . .
 "And what the devil is he--anyhow--for to go on like this?" He stuffed
 suddenly his left whisker into his mouth and stood amazed. "Jee!" he
 exclaimed, "I told him the earth wouldn't be big enough to hold his
 caper."'
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 19
 
 
 'I have told you these two episodes at length to show his manner of
 dealing with himself under the new conditions of his life. There were
 many others of the sort, more than I could count on the fingers of my
 two hands. They were all equally tinged by a high-minded absurdity of
 intention which made their futility profound and touching. To fling away
 your daily bread so as to get your hands free for a grapple with a ghost
 may be an act of prosaic heroism. Men had done it before (though we who
 have lived know full well that it is not the haunted soul but the hungry
 body that makes an outcast), and men who had eaten and meant to eat
 every day had applauded the creditable folly. He was indeed unfortunate,
 for all his recklessness could not carry him out from under the shadow.
 There was always a doubt of his courage. The truth seems to be that
--**--**--
 altogether; try California or the West Coast? I'll see what I can
 do . . ." He interrupted me a little scornfully. "What difference would
 it make?" . . . I felt at once convinced that he was right. It would make
 no difference; it was not relief he wanted; I seemed to perceive dimly
 that what he wanted, what he was, as it were, waiting for, was something
 not easy to define--something in the nature of an opportunity. I had
 given him many opportunities, but they had been merely opportunities to
 earn his bread. Yet what more could any man do? The position struck me
 as hopeless, and poor Brierly's saying recurred to me, "Let him creep
 twenty feet underground and stay there." Better that, I thought, than
 this waiting above ground for the impossible. Yet one could not be sure
 even of that. There and then, before his boat was three oars' lengths
 away from the quay, I had made up my mind to go and consult Stein in the
 evening.
 
 'This Stein was a wealthy and respected merchant. His "house" (because
 it was a house, Stein & Co., and there was some sort of partner who,
 as Stein said, "looked after the Moluccas") had a large inter-island
 business, with a lot of trading posts established in the most
 out-of-the-way places for collecting the produce. His wealth and his
 respectability were not exactly the reasons why I was anxious to seek
 his advice. I desired to confide my difficulty to him because he was
 one of the most trustworthy men I had ever known. The gentle light of a
 simple, unwearied, as it were, and intelligent good-nature illumined his
 long hairless face. It had deep downward folds, and was pale as of a
 man who had always led a sedentary life--which was indeed very far from
--**--**--
 '"Marvellous!" he repeated, looking up at me. "Look! The beauty--but
 that is nothing--look at the accuracy, the harmony. And so fragile! And
 so strong! And so exact! This is Nature--the balance of colossal forces.
 Every star is so--and every blade of grass stands so--and the mighty
 Kosmos ib perfect equilibrium produces--this. This wonder; this
 masterpiece of Nature--the great artist."
 
 '"Never heard an entomologist go on like this," I observed cheerfully.
 "Masterpiece! And what of man?"
 
 '"Man is amazing, but he is not a masterpiece," he said, keeping his
 eyes fixed on the glass case. "Perhaps the artist was a little mad. Eh?
 What do you think? Sometimes it seems to me that man is come where he is
 not wanted, where there is no place for him; for if not, why should
 he want all the place? Why should he run about here and there making
 a great noise about himself, talking about the stars, disturbing the
 blades of grass? . . ."
 
 '"Catching butterflies," I chimed in.
 
 'He smiled, threw himself back in his chair, and stretched his legs.
 "Sit down," he said. "I captured this rare specimen myself one very fine
 morning. And I had a very big emotion. You don't know what it is for a
 collector to capture such a rare specimen. You can't know."
 
 'I smiled at my ease in a rocking-chair. His eyes seemed to look far
 beyond the wall at which they stared; and he narrated how, one night,
 a messenger arrived from his "poor Mohammed," requiring his presence
 at the "residenz"--as he called it--which was distant some nine or ten
 miles by a bridle-path over a cultivated plain, with patches of forest
 here and there. Early in the morning he started from his fortified
 house, after embracing his little Emma, and leaving the "princess," his
--**--**--
 what a rare and so extraordinary perfect specimen I had, my head went
 round and my legs became so weak with emotion that I had to sit on the
 ground. I had greatly desired to possess myself of a specimen of that
 species when collecting for the professor. I took long journeys and
 underwent great privations; I had dreamed of him in my sleep, and here
 suddenly I had him in my fingers--for myself! In the words of the poet"
 (he pronounced it "boet")--
 
      "'So halt' ich's endlich denn in meinen Handen,
      Und nenn' es in gewissem Sinne mein.'"
 
 He gave to the last word the emphasis of a suddenly lowered voice, and
 withdrew his eyes slowly from my face. He began to charge a long-stemmed
 pipe busily and in silence, then, pausing with his thumb on the orifice
 of the bowl, looked again at me significantly.
 
 '"Yes, my good friend. On that day I had nothing to desire; I had
 greatly annoyed my principal enemy; I was young, strong; I had
 friendship; I had the love" (he said "lof") "of woman, a child I had,
 to make my heart very full--and even what I had once dreamed in my sleep
 had come into my hand too!"
 
 'He struck a match, which flared violently. His thoughtful placid face
 twitched once.
 
 '"Friend, wife, child," he said slowly, gazing at the small
 flame--"phoo!" The match was blown out. He sighed and turned again to
 the glass case. The frail and beautiful wings quivered faintly, as if
 his breath had for an instant called back to life that gorgeous object
 of his dreams.
 
 '"The work," he began suddenly, pointing to the scattered slips, and in
 his usual gentle and cheery tone, "is making great progress. I have been
 this rare specimen describing. . . . Na! And what is your good news?"
--**--**--
 magnificent butterfly finds a little heap of dirt and sits still on it;
 but man he will never on his heap of mud keep still. He want to be so,
 and again he want to be so. . . ." He moved his hand up, then down. . . .
 "He wants to be a saint, and he wants to be a devil--and every time he
 shuts his eyes he sees himself as a very fine fellow--so fine as he can
 never be. . . . In a dream. . . ."
 
 'He lowered the glass lid, the automatic lock clicked sharply, and
 taking up the case in both hands he bore it religiously away to its
 place, passing out of the bright circle of the lamp into the ring of
 fainter light--into shapeless dusk at last. It had an odd effect--as
 if these few steps had carried him out of this concrete and perplexed
 world. His tall form, as though robbed of its substance, hovered
 noiselessly over invisible things with stooping and indefinite
 movements; his voice, heard in that remoteness where he could be
 glimpsed mysteriously busy with immaterial cares, was no longer
 incisive, seemed to roll voluminous and grave--mellowed by distance.
 
 '"And because you not always can keep your eyes shut there comes the
 real trouble--the heart pain--the world pain. I tell you, my friend, it
 is not good for you to find you cannot make your dream come true, for
 the reason that you not strong enough are, or not clever enough. . . .
 Ja! . . . And all the time you are such a fine fellow too! Wie? Was?
 Gott im Himmel! How can that be? Ha! ha! ha!"
 
 'The shadow prowling amongst the graves of butterflies laughed
 boisterously.
 
 '"Yes! Very funny this terrible thing is. A man that is born falls into
--**--**--
 new, entirely remarkable. And he got hold of them in a remarkable way.
 
 'Stein was the man who knew more about Patusan than anybody else. More
 than was known in the government circles I suspect. I have no doubt he
 had been there, either in his butterfly-hunting days or later on, when
 he tried in his incorrigible way to season with a pinch of romance the
 fattening dishes of his commercial kitchen. There were very few places
 in the Archipelago he had not seen in the original dusk of their being,
 before light (and even electric light) had been carried into them for
 the sake of better morality and--and--well--the greater profit, too.
 It was at breakfast of the morning following our talk about Jim that he
 mentioned the place, after I had quoted poor Brierly's remark: "Let him
 creep twenty feet underground and stay there." He looked up at me with
 interested attention, as though I had been a rare insect. "This could be
 done, too," he remarked, sipping his coffee. "Bury him in some sort,"
 I explained. "One doesn't like to do it of course, but it would be the
 best thing, seeing what he is." "Yes; he is young," Stein mused. "The
 youngest human being now in existence," I affirmed. "Schon. There's
 Patusan," he went on in the same tone. . . . "And the woman is dead
 now," he added incomprehensibly.
 
 'Of course I don't know that story; I can only guess that once before
 Patusan had been used as a grave for some sin, transgression, or
 misfortune. It is impossible to suspect Stein. The only woman that
 had ever existed for him was the Malay girl he called "My wife the
 princess," or, more rarely, in moments of expansion, "the mother of my
 Emma." Who was the woman he had mentioned in connection with Patusan I
--**--**--
 inseparable part of our knowledge. I did not know so much more about
 myself. And then, I repeat, I was going home--to that home distant
 enough for all its hearthstones to be like one hearthstone, by which the
 humblest of us has the right to sit. We wander in our thousands over the
 face of the earth, the illustrious and the obscure, earning beyond the
 seas our fame, our money, or only a crust of bread; but it seems to me
 that for each of us going home must be like going to render an account.
 We return to face our superiors, our kindred, our friends--those whom we
 obey, and those whom we love; but even they who have neither, the most
 free, lonely, irresponsible and bereft of ties,--even those for whom
 home holds no dear face, no familiar voice,--even they have to meet the
 spirit that dwells within the land, under its sky, in its air, in its
 valleys, and on its rises, in its fields, in its waters and its trees--a
 mute friend, judge, and inspirer. Say what you like, to get its joy,
 to breathe its peace, to face its truth, one must return with a clear
 conscience. All this may seem to you sheer sentimentalism; and indeed
 very few of us have the will or the capacity to look consciously under
 the surface of familiar emotions. There are the girls we love, the men
 we look up to, the tenderness, the friendships, the opportunities, the
 pleasures! But the fact remains that you must touch your reward with
 clean hands, lest it turn to dead leaves, to thorns, in your grasp. I
 think it is the lonely, without a fireside or an affection they may call
 their own, those who return not to a dwelling but to the land itself, to
--**--**--
 were no externals. Thirty miles of forest shut it off from the sight of
 an indifferent world, and the noise of the white surf along the coast
 overpowered the voice of fame. The stream of civilisation, as if divided
 on a headland a hundred miles north of Patusan, branches east and
 south-east, leaving its plains and valleys, its old trees and its old
 mankind, neglected and isolated, such as an insignificant and crumbling
 islet between the two branches of a mighty, devouring stream. You find
 the name of the country pretty often in collections of old voyages. The
 seventeenth-century traders went there for pepper, because the passion
 for pepper seemed to burn like a flame of love in the breast of Dutch
 and English adventurers about the time of James the First. Where
 wouldn't they go for pepper! For a bag of pepper they would cut each
 other's throats without hesitation, and would forswear their souls,
 of which they were so careful otherwise: the bizarre obstinacy of that
 desire made them defy death in a thousand shapes--the unknown seas, the
 loathsome and strange diseases; wounds, captivity, hunger, pestilence,
 and despair. It made them great! By heavens! it made them heroic; and
 it made them pathetic too in their craving for trade with the inflexible
 death levying its toll on young and old. It seems impossible to believe
 that mere greed could hold men to such a steadfastness of purpose, to
 such a blind persistence in endeavour and sacrifice. And indeed those
 who adventured their persons and lives risked all they had for a slender
 reward. They left their bones to lie bleaching on distant shores, so
 that wealth might flow to the living at home. To us, their less tried
 successors, they appear magnified, not as agents of trade but as
--**--**--
 
 'Upon every other point I was perfectly frank with him, and I even (as
 I believed at the time) exaggerated the danger of the undertaking. As
 a matter of fact I did not do it justice; his first day in Patusan was
 nearly his last--would have been his last if he had not been so reckless
 or so hard on himself and had condescended to load that revolver. I
 remember, as I unfolded our precious scheme for his retreat, how his
 stubborn but weary resignation was gradually replaced by surprise,
 interest, wonder, and by boyish eagerness. This was a chance he had been
 dreaming of. He couldn't think how he merited that I . . . He would be
 shot if he could see to what he owed . . . And it was Stein, Stein the
 merchant, who . . . but of course it was me he had to . . . I cut him
 short. He was not articulate, and his gratitude caused me inexplicable
 pain. I told him that if he owed this chance to any one especially, it
 was to an old Scot of whom he had never heard, who had died many years
 ago, of whom little was remembered besides a roaring voice and a rough
 sort of honesty. There was really no one to receive his thanks. Stein
 was passing on to a young man the help he had received in his own young
 days, and I had done no more than to mention his name. Upon this he
 coloured, and, twisting a bit of paper in his fingers, he remarked
 bashfully that I had always trusted him.
 
 'I admitted that such was the case, and added after a pause that I
 wished he had been able to follow my example. "You think I don't?" he
--**--**--
 
 'He did not flinch, and went on with heat, "Forget everything,
 everybody, everybody." . . . His voice fell. . . "But you," he added.
 
 '"Yes--me too--if it would help," I said, also in a low tone. After this
 we remained silent and languid for a time as if exhausted. Then he began
 again, composedly, and told me that Mr. Stein had instructed him to wait
 for a month or so, to see whether it was possible for him to remain,
 before he began building a new house for himself, so as to avoid
 "vain expense." He did make use of funny expressions--Stein did. "Vain
 expense" was good. . . . Remain? Why! of course. He would hang on. Let
 him only get in--that's all; he would answer for it he would remain.
 Never get out. It was easy enough to remain.
 
 '"Don't be foolhardy," I said, rendered uneasy by his threatening tone.
 "If you only live long enough you will want to come back."
 
 '"Come back to what?" he asked absently, with his eyes fixed upon the
 face of a clock on the wall.
 
 'I was silent for a while. "Is it to be never, then?" I said. "Never,"
 he repeated dreamily without looking at me, and then flew into sudden
 activity. "Jove! Two o'clock, and I sail at four!"
 
 'It was true. A brigantine of Stein's was leaving for the westward that
 afternoon, and he had been instructed to take his passage in her, only
 no orders to delay the sailing had been given. I suppose Stein forgot.
 He made a rush to get his things while I went aboard my ship, where
 he promised to call on his way to the outer roadstead. He turned up
 accordingly in a great hurry and with a small leather valise in his
--**--**--
 'The coast of Patusan (I saw it nearly two years afterwards) is straight
 and sombre, and faces a misty ocean. Red trails are seen like cataracts
 of rust streaming under the dark-green foliage of bushes and creepers
 clothing the low cliffs. Swampy plains open out at the mouth of rivers,
 with a view of jagged blue peaks beyond the vast forests. In the offing
 a chain of islands, dark, crumbling shapes, stand out in the everlasting
 sunlit haze like the remnants of a wall breached by the sea.
 
 'There is a village of fisher-folk at the mouth of the Batu Kring branch
 of the estuary. The river, which had been closed so long, was open then,
 and Stein's little schooner, in which I had my passage, worked her
 way up in three tides without being exposed to a fusillade from
 "irresponsive parties." Such a state of affairs belonged already to
 ancient history, if I could believe the elderly headman of the fishing
 village, who came on board to act as a sort of pilot. He talked to me
 (the second white man he had ever seen) with confidence, and most of his
 talk was about the first white man he had ever seen. He called him Tuan
 Jim, and the tone of his references was made remarkable by a strange
 mixture of familiarity and awe. They, in the village, were under that
 lord's special protection, which showed that Jim bore no grudge. If
 he had warned me that I would hear of him it was perfectly true. I was
 hearing of him. There was already a story that the tide had turned
 two hours before its time to help him on his journey up the river. The
 talkative old man himself had steered the canoe and had marvelled at the
--**--**--
 in his stammerings. He had still his old trick of stubborn blushing. Now
 and then, though, a word, a sentence, would escape him that showed how
 deeply, how solemnly, he felt about that work which had given him the
 certitude of rehabilitation. That is why he seemed to love the land
 and the people with a sort of fierce egoism, with a contemptuous
 tenderness.'
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 25
 
 
 '"This is where I was prisoner for three days," he murmured to me (it
 was on the occasion of our visit to the Rajah), while we were making our
 way slowly through a kind of awestruck riot of dependants across Tunku
 Allang's courtyard. "Filthy place, isn't it? And I couldn't get anything
 to eat either, unless I made a row about it, and then it was only
 a small plate of rice and a fried fish not much bigger than a
 stickleback--confound them! Jove! I've been hungry prowling inside this
 stinking enclosure with some of these vagabonds shoving their mugs right
 under my nose. I had given up that famous revolver of yours at the first
 demand. Glad to get rid of the bally thing. Look like a fool walking
 about with an empty shooting-iron in my hand." At that moment we came
 into the presence, and he became unflinchingly grave and complimentary
 with his late captor. Oh! magnificent! I want to laugh when I think of
 it. But I was impressed, too. The old disreputable Tunku Allang could
 not help showing his fear (he was no hero, for all the tales of his hot
 youth he was fond of telling); and at the same time there was a wistful
 confidence in his manner towards his late prisoner. Note! Even where he
 would be most hated he was still trusted. Jim--as far as I could follow
--**--**--
 he said. He reached and grabbed desperately with his hands, and only
 succeeded in gathering a horrible cold shiny heap of slime against his
 breast--up to his very chin. It seemed to him he was burying himself
 alive, and then he struck out madly, scattering the mud with his fists.
 It fell on his head, on his face, over his eyes, into his mouth. He told
 me that he remembered suddenly the courtyard, as you remember a place
 where you had been very happy years ago. He longed--so he said--to be
 back there again, mending the clock. Mending the clock--that was the
 idea. He made efforts, tremendous sobbing, gasping efforts, efforts that
 seemed to burst his eyeballs in their sockets and make him blind, and
 culminating into one mighty supreme effort in the darkness to crack the
 earth asunder, to throw it off his limbs--and he felt himself creeping
 feebly up the bank. He lay full length on the firm ground and saw the
 light, the sky. Then as a sort of happy thought the notion came to him
 that he would go to sleep. He will have it that he _did_ actually go to
 sleep; that he slept--perhaps for a minute, perhaps for twenty seconds,
 or only for one second, but he recollects distinctly the violent
 convulsive start of awakening. He remained lying still for a while, and
 then he arose muddy from head to foot and stood there, thinking he
 was alone of his kind for hundreds of miles, alone, with no help, no
 sympathy, no pity to expect from any one, like a hunted animal. The
 first houses were not more than twenty yards from him; and it was the
 desperate screaming of a frightened woman trying to carry off a child
 that started him again. He pelted straight on in his socks, beplastered
--**--**--
 bush-folk, as Jim himself called them) to rise, and had established
 himself in a fortified camp on the summit of one of the twin hills. He
 hung over the town of Patusan like a hawk over a poultry-yard, but he
 devastated the open country. Whole villages, deserted, rotted on their
 blackened posts over the banks of clear streams, dropping piecemeal into
 the water the grass of their walls, the leaves of their roofs, with a
 curious effect of natural decay as if they had been a form of vegetation
 stricken by a blight at its very root. The two parties in Patusan were
 not sure which one this partisan most desired to plunder. The Rajah
 intrigued with him feebly. Some of the Bugis settlers, weary with
 endless insecurity, were half inclined to call him in. The younger
 spirits amongst them, chaffing, advised to "get Sherif Ali with his wild
 men and drive the Rajah Allang out of the country." Doramin restrained
 them with difficulty. He was growing old, and, though his influence had
 not diminished, the situation was getting beyond him. This was the state
 of affairs when Jim, bolting from the Rajah's stockade, appeared before
 the chief of the Bugis, produced the ring, and was received, in a manner
 of speaking, into the heart of the community.'
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 26
 
 
 'Doramin was one of the most remarkable men of his race I had ever seen.
 His bulk for a Malay was immense, but he did not look merely fat; he
 looked imposing, monumental. This motionless body, clad in rich stuffs,
 coloured silks, gold embroideries; this huge head, enfolded in a
 red-and-gold headkerchief; the flat, big, round face, wrinkled,
 furrowed, with two semicircular heavy folds starting on each side of
 wide, fierce nostrils, and enclosing a thick-lipped mouth; the throat
--**--**--
 exchange for that ring, you know. Used to belong to good old McNeil. God
 only knows how _he_ came by them. There he sat, moving neither hand nor
 foot, a flame of dry brushwood behind him, and lots of people rushing
 about, shouting and pulling round him--the most solemn, imposing old
 chap you can imagine. He wouldn't have had much chance if Sherif Ali had
 let his infernal crew loose at us and stampeded my lot. Eh? Anyhow, he
 had come up there to die if anything went wrong. No mistake! Jove! It
 thrilled me to see him there--like a rock. But the Sherif must have
 thought us mad, and never troubled to come and see how we got on. Nobody
 believed it could be done. Why! I think the very chaps who pulled and
 shoved and sweated over it did not believe it could be done! Upon my
 word I don't think they did. . . ."
 
 'He stood erect, the smouldering brier-wood in his clutch, with a smile
 on his lips and a sparkle in his boyish eyes. I sat on the stump of a
 tree at his feet, and below us stretched the land, the great expanse of
 the forests, sombre under the sunshine, rolling like a sea, with glints
 of winding rivers, the grey spots of villages, and here and there a
 clearing, like an islet of light amongst the dark waves of continuous
 tree-tops. A brooding gloom lay over this vast and monotonous landscape;
 the light fell on it as if into an abyss. The land devoured the
 sunshine; only far off, along the coast, the empty ocean, smooth and
 polished within the faint haze, seemed to rise up to the sky in a wall
 of steel.
 
 'And there I was with him, high in the sunshine on the top of that
--**--**--
 shouts of the crowd reached him in bursts of faint roaring. A lot of
 streamers made a flutter as of little white, red, yellow birds amongst
 the brown ridges of roofs. "You must have enjoyed it," I murmured,
 feeling the stir of sympathetic emotion.
 
 '"It was . . . it was immense! Immense!" he cried aloud, flinging his
 arms open. The sudden movement startled me as though I had seen him bare
 the secrets of his breast to the sunshine, to the brooding forests, to
 the steely sea. Below us the town reposed in easy curves upon the banks
 of a stream whose current seemed to sleep. "Immense!" he repeated for a
 third time, speaking in a whisper, for himself alone.
 
 'Immense! No doubt it was immense; the seal of success upon his words,
 the conquered ground for the soles of his feet, the blind trust of
 men, the belief in himself snatched from the fire, the solitude of his
 achievement. All this, as I've warned you, gets dwarfed in the telling.
 I can't with mere words convey to you the impression of his total and
 utter isolation. I know, of course, he was in every sense alone of his
 kind there, but the unsuspected qualities of his nature had brought him
 in such close touch with his surroundings that this isolation seemed
 only the effect of his power. His loneliness added to his stature. There
 was nothing within sight to compare him with, as though he had been one
 of those exceptional men who can be only measured by the greatness of
 their fame; and his fame, remember, was the greatest thing around for
 many a day's journey. You would have to paddle, pole, or track a long
 weary way through the jungle before you passed beyond the reach of its
--**--**--
 Our common fate . . . for where is the man--I mean a real sentient
 man--who does not remember vaguely having been deserted in the fullness
 of possession by some one or something more precious than life? . . .
 our common fate fastens upon the women with a peculiar cruelty. It
 does not punish like a master, but inflicts lingering torment, as if to
 gratify a secret, unappeasable spite. One would think that, appointed
 to rule on earth, it seeks to revenge itself upon the beings that come
 nearest to rising above the trammels of earthly caution; for it is
 only women who manage to put at times into their love an element just
 palpable enough to give one a fright--an extra-terrestrial touch. I ask
 myself with wonder--how the world can look to them--whether it has the
 shape and substance _we_ know, the air _we_ breathe! Sometimes I fancy
 it must be a region of unreasonable sublimities seething with the
 excitement of their adventurous souls, lighted by the glory of all
 possible risks and renunciations. However, I suspect there are very few
 women in the world, though of course I am aware of the multitudes of
 mankind and of the equality of sexes--in point of numbers, that is. But
 I am sure that the mother was as much of a woman as the daughter seemed
 to be. I cannot help picturing to myself these two, at first the young
 woman and the child, then the old woman and the young girl, the awful
 sameness and the swift passage of time, the barrier of forest, the
 solitude and the turmoil round these two lonely lives, and every word
 spoken between them penetrated with sad meaning. There must have
 been confidences, not so much of fact, I suppose, as of innermost
--**--**--
 janissary, with kriss, chopper, and lance (besides carrying Jim's gun);
 even Tamb' Itam allowed himself to put on the airs of uncompromising
 guardianship, like a surly devoted jailer ready to lay down his life for
 his captive. On the evenings when we sat up late, his silent, indistinct
 form would pass and repass under the verandah, with noiseless footsteps,
 or lifting my head I would unexpectedly make him out standing rigidly
 erect in the shadow. As a general rule he would vanish after a time,
 without a sound; but when we rose he would spring up close to us as if
 from the ground, ready for any orders Jim might wish to give. The girl
 too, I believe, never went to sleep till we had separated for the night.
 More than once I saw her and Jim through the window of my room come out
 together quietly and lean on the rough balustrade--two white forms very
 close, his arm about her waist, her head on his shoulder. Their soft
 murmurs reached me, penetrating, tender, with a calm sad note in the
 stillness of the night, like a self-communion of one being carried on
 in two tones. Later on, tossing on my bed under the mosquito-net, I
 was sure to hear slight creakings, faint breathing, a throat cleared
 cautiously--and I would know that Tamb' Itam was still on the prowl.
 Though he had (by the favour of the white lord) a house in the compound,
 had "taken wife," and had lately been blessed with a child, I believe
 that, during my stay at all events, he slept on the verandah every
 night. It was very difficult to make this faithful and grim retainer
 talk. Even Jim himself was answered in jerky short sentences, under
 protest as it were. Talking, he seemed to imply, was no business of his.
--**--**--
 absolutely courting death by this proof of devotion to Mr. Stein's young
 friend. The sight of his abject grimacing was--Jim told me--very hard
 to bear: he clutched at his hair, beat his breast, rocked himself to
 and fro with his hands pressed to his stomach, and actually pretended to
 shed tears. "Your blood be on your own head," he squeaked at last, and
 rushed out. It is a curious question how far Cornelius was sincere in
 that performance. Jim confessed to me that he did not sleep a wink after
 the fellow had gone. He lay on his back on a thin mat spread over the
 bamboo flooring, trying idly to make out the bare rafters, and listening
 to the rustlings in the torn thatch. A star suddenly twinkled through a
 hole in the roof. His brain was in a whirl; but, nevertheless, it was on
 that very night that he matured his plan for overcoming Sherif Ali. It
 had been the thought of all the moments he could spare from the hopeless
 investigation into Stein's affairs, but the notion--he says--came to him
 then all at once. He could see, as it were, the guns mounted on the top
 of the hill. He got very hot and excited lying there; sleep was out of
 the question more than ever. He jumped up, and went out barefooted
 on the verandah. Walking silently, he came upon the girl, motionless
 against the wall, as if on the watch. In his then state of mind it did
 not surprise him to see her up, nor yet to hear her ask in an anxious
 whisper where Cornelius could be. He simply said he did not know. She
 moaned a little, and peered into the campong. Everything was very quiet.
 He was possessed by his new idea, and so full of it that he could not
--**--**--
 wondered greatly at himself. He watched for a while. Not a stir, not a
 sound. "Exactly as if the chap had died while I had been making all that
 noise," he said. He was so ashamed of himself that he went indoors in a
 hurry without another word, and flung himself down again. The row seemed
 to have done him good though, because he went to sleep for the rest of
 the night like a baby. Hadn't slept like that for weeks. "But _I_ didn't
 sleep," struck in the girl, one elbow on the table and nursing her
 cheek. "I watched." Her big eyes flashed, rolling a little, and then she
 fixed them on my face intently.'
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 31
 
 
 'You may imagine with what interest I listened. All these details were
 perceived to have some significance twenty-four hours later. In the
 morning Cornelius made no allusion to the events of the night. "I
 suppose you will come back to my poor house," he muttered, surlily,
 slinking up just as Jim was entering the canoe to go over to Doramin's
 campong. Jim only nodded, without looking at him. "You find it good fun,
 no doubt," muttered the other in a sour tone. Jim spent the day with the
 old nakhoda, preaching the necessity of vigorous action to the principal
 men of the Bugis community, who had been summoned for a big talk. He
 remembered with pleasure how very eloquent and persuasive he had been.
 "I managed to put some backbone into them that time, and no mistake," he
 said. Sherif Ali's last raid had swept the outskirts of the settlement,
 and some women belonging to the town had been carried off to the
 stockade. Sherif Ali's emissaries had been seen in the market-place the
 day before, strutting about haughtily in white cloaks, and boasting of
--**--**--
 which he must be given all due credit.
 
 'Be it as it may, Jim's slumbers were disturbed by a dream of heavens
 like brass resounding with a great voice, which called upon him to
 Awake! Awake! so loud that, notwithstanding his desperate determination
 to sleep on, he did wake up in reality. The glare of a red spluttering
 conflagration going on in mid-air fell on his eyes. Coils of black thick
 smoke curved round the head of some apparition, some unearthly being,
 all in white, with a severe, drawn, anxious face. After a second or so
 he recognised the girl. She was holding a dammar torch at arm's-length
 aloft, and in a persistent, urgent monotone she was repeating, "Get up!
 Get up! Get up!"
 
 'Suddenly he leaped to his feet; at once she put into his hand a
 revolver, his own revolver, which had been hanging on a nail, but loaded
 this time. He gripped it in silence, bewildered, blinking in the light.
 He wondered what he could do for her.
 
 'She asked rapidly and very low, "Can you face four men with this?"
 He laughed while narrating this part at the recollection of his polite
 alacrity. It seems he made a great display of it. "Certainly--of
 course--certainly--command me." He was not properly awake, and had a
 notion of being very civil in these extraordinary circumstances, of
 showing his unquestioning, devoted readiness. She left the room, and
 he followed her; in the passage they disturbed an old hag who did the
 casual cooking of the household, though she was so decrepit as to be
 hardly able to understand human speech. She got up and hobbled behind
 them, mumbling toothlessly. On the verandah a hammock of sail-cloth,
 belonging to Cornelius, swayed lightly to the touch of Jim's elbow. It
 was empty.
--**--**--
 dangers except--in her. "I thought," he said to me, "that if I went
 away from her it would be the end of everything somehow." Only as they
 couldn't stop there for ever in the middle of that courtyard, he made
 up his mind to go and look into the storehouse. He let her follow
 him without thinking of any protest, as if they had been indissolubly
 united. "I am fearless--am I?" he muttered through his teeth. She
 restrained his arm. "Wait till you hear my voice," she said, and,
 torch in hand, ran lightly round the corner. He remained alone in the
 darkness, his face to the door: not a sound, not a breath came from
 the other side. The old hag let out a dreary groan somewhere behind his
 back. He heard a high-pitched almost screaming call from the girl. "Now!
 Push!" He pushed violently; the door swung with a creak and a clatter,
 disclosing to his intense astonishment the low dungeon-like interior
 illuminated by a lurid, wavering glare. A turmoil of smoke eddied down
 upon an empty wooden crate in the middle of the floor, a litter of rags
 and straw tried to soar, but only stirred feebly in the draught. She had
 thrust the light through the bars of the window. He saw her bare round
 arm extended and rigid, holding up the torch with the steadiness of
 an iron bracket. A conical ragged heap of old mats cumbered a distant
 corner almost to the ceiling, and that was all.
 
 'He explained to me that he was bitterly disappointed at this. His
 fortitude had been tried by so many warnings, he had been for weeks
 surrounded by so many hints of danger, that he wanted the relief of
 some reality, of something tangible that he could meet. "It would have
--**--**--
 and certain. He let him come on because it did not matter. A dead man,
 anyhow. He noticed the dilated nostrils, the wide eyes, the intent,
 eager stillness of the face, and then he fired.
 
 'The explosion in that confined space was stunning. He stepped back a
 pace. He saw the man jerk his head up, fling his arms forward, and drop
 the kriss. He ascertained afterwards that he had shot him through the
 mouth, a little upwards, the bullet coming out high at the back of the
 skull. With the impetus of his rush the man drove straight on, his face
 suddenly gaping disfigured, with his hands open before him gropingly, as
 though blinded, and landed with terrific violence on his forehead, just
 short of Jim's bare toes. Jim says he didn't lose the smallest detail
 of all this. He found himself calm, appeased, without rancour, without
 uneasiness, as if the death of that man had atoned for everything. The
 place was getting very full of sooty smoke from the torch, in which
 the unswaying flame burned blood-red without a flicker. He walked in
 resolutely, striding over the dead body, and covered with his revolver
 another naked figure outlined vaguely at the other end. As he was about
 to pull the trigger, the man threw away with force a short heavy spear,
 and squatted submissively on his hams, his back to the wall and his
 clasped hands between his legs. "You want your life?" Jim said. The
 other made no sound. "How many more of you?" asked Jim again. "Two more,
 Tuan," said the man very softly, looking with big fascinated eyes into
 the muzzle of the revolver. Accordingly two more crawled from under the
 mats, holding out ostentatiously their empty hands.'
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 32
 
 
 'Jim took up an advantageous position and shepherded them out in a bunch
--**--**--
 greatness. I don't know why, listening to him, I should have noted
 so distinctly the gradual darkening of the river, of the air; the
 irresistible slow work of the night settling silently on all the visible
 forms, effacing the outlines, burying the shapes deeper and deeper, like
 a steady fall of impalpable black dust.
 
 '"Jove!" he began abruptly, "there are days when a fellow is too absurd
 for anything; only I know I can tell you what I like. I talk about
 being done with it--with the bally thing at the back of my head . . .
 Forgetting . . . Hang me if I know! I can think of it quietly. After
 all, what has it proved? Nothing. I suppose you don't think so . . ."
 
 'I made a protesting murmur.
 
 '"No matter," he said. "I am satisfied . . . nearly. I've got to
 look only at the face of the first man that comes along, to regain my
 confidence. They can't be made to understand what is going on in me.
 What of that? Come! I haven't done so badly."
 
 '"Not so badly," I said.
 
 '"But all the same, you wouldn't like to have me aboard your own ship
 hey?"
 
 '"Confound you!" I cried. "Stop this."
 
 '"Aha! You see," he said, crowing, as it were, over me placidly. "Only,"
 he went on, "you just try to tell this to any of them here. They would
 think you a fool, a liar, or worse. And so I can stand it. I've done a
 thing or two for them, but this is what they have done for me."
 
 '"My dear chap," I cried, "you shall always remain for them an insoluble
 mystery." Thereupon we were silent.
 
 '"Mystery," he repeated, before looking up. "Well, then let me always
--**--**--
 had withdrawn her hand in haste. She was audacious and shrinking. She
 feared nothing, but she was checked by the profound incertitude and the
 extreme strangeness--a brave person groping in the dark. I belonged to
 this Unknown that might claim Jim for its own at any moment. I was,
 as it were, in the secret of its nature and of its intentions--the
 confidant of a threatening mystery--armed with its power perhaps! I
 believe she supposed I could with a word whisk Jim away out of her very
 arms; it is my sober conviction she went through agonies of apprehension
 during my long talks with Jim; through a real and intolerable anguish
 that might have conceivably driven her into plotting my murder, had the
 fierceness of her soul been equal to the tremendous situation it had
 created. This is my impression, and it is all I can give you: the whole
 thing dawned gradually upon me, and as it got clearer and clearer I was
 overwhelmed by a slow incredulous amazement. She made me believe her,
 but there is no word that on my lips could render the effect of the
 headlong and vehement whisper, of the soft, passionate tones, of the
 sudden breathless pause and the appealing movement of the white arms
 extended swiftly. They fell; the ghostly figure swayed like a slender
 tree in the wind, the pale oval of the face drooped; it was impossible
 to distinguish her features, the darkness of the eyes was unfathomable;
 two wide sleeves uprose in the dark like unfolding wings, and she stood
 silent, holding her head in her hands.'
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 33
 
 
 'I was immensely touched: her youth, her ignorance, her pretty beauty,
 which had the simple charm and the delicate vigour of a wild-flower,
 her pathetic pleading, her helplessness, appealed to me with almost
--**--**--
 peace out of that honest affection. She had not the knowledge--not the
 skill perhaps. The night had come on apace; it had grown pitch-dark
 where we were, so that without stirring she had faded like the
 intangible form of a wistful and perverse spirit. And suddenly I heard
 her quiet whisper again, "Other men had sworn the same thing." It was
 like a meditative comment on some thoughts full of sadness, of awe. And
 she added, still lower if possible, "My father did." She paused the
 time to draw an inaudible breath. "Her father too." . . . These were the
 things she knew! At once I said, "Ah! but he is not like that." This,
 it seemed, she did not intend to dispute; but after a time the strange
 still whisper wandering dreamily in the air stole into my ears. "Why
 is he different? Is he better? Is he . . ." "Upon my word of honour," I
 broke in, "I believe he is." We subdued our tones to a mysterious pitch.
 Amongst the huts of Jim's workmen (they were mostly liberated slaves
 from the Sherif's stockade) somebody started a shrill, drawling song.
 Across the river a big fire (at Doramin's, I think) made a glowing
 ball, completely isolated in the night. "Is he more true?" she murmured.
 "Yes," I said. "More true than any other man," she repeated in
 lingering accents. "Nobody here," I said, "would dream of doubting his
 word--nobody would dare--except you."
 
 'I think she made a movement at this. "More brave," she went on in a
 changed tone. "Fear will never drive him away from you," I said a little
 nervously. The song stopped short on a shrill note, and was succeeded by
 several voices talking in the distance. Jim's voice too. I was struck
--**--**--
 absurd, or futile. To discover that she had a voice at all was enough
 to strike awe into the heart. Had a spurned stone cried out in pain it
 could not have appeared a greater and more pitiful miracle. These few
 sounds wandering in the dark had made their two benighted lives tragic
 to my mind. It was impossible to make her understand. I chafed silently
 at my impotence. And Jim, too--poor devil! Who would need him? Who would
 remember him? He had what he wanted. His very existence probably had
 been forgotten by this time. They had mastered their fates. They were
 tragic.
 
 'Her immobility before me was clearly expectant, and my part was to
 speak for my brother from the realm of forgetful shade. I was deeply
 moved at my responsibility and at her distress. I would have given
 anything for the power to soothe her frail soul, tormenting itself in
 its invincible ignorance like a small bird beating about the cruel
 wires of a cage. Nothing easier than to say, Have no fear! Nothing more
 difficult. How does one kill fear, I wonder? How do you shoot a spectre
 through the heart, slash off its spectral head, take it by its spectral
 throat? It is an enterprise you rush into while you dream, and are glad
 to make your escape with wet hair and every limb shaking. The bullet is
 not run, the blade not forged, the man not born; even the winged words
 of truth drop at your feet like lumps of lead. You require for such a
 desperate encounter an enchanted and poisoned shaft dipped in a lie too
 subtle to be found on earth. An enterprise for a dream, my masters!
 
 'I began my exorcism with a heavy heart, with a sort of sullen anger in